{'21-393': Course('Operations Research II', '21-393', 9, 'Building on an understanding of Linear Programming developed in 21-292 Operations Research I, this course introduces more advanced topics.  Integer programming, including cutting planes and branch and bound.  Dynamic programming.  An introduction to Combinatorial Optimization including optimal spanning trees, shortest paths, the assignment problem and max-flow/min-cut.  The traveling salesman problem and NP-completeness. An important goal of this course is for the student to gain experience with the process of working in a group to apply operations research methods to solve a problem.  A portion of the course is devoted to a group project based upon case studies and the methods presented. 36-410 recommended. 3 hrs. lec.', '(21-228 or 15-251) and 21-292', None), '21-499': Course('Undergraduate Research  Topic', '21-499', 9, 'This course affords undergraduates to pursue elementary research topics in the area of expertise of the instructor.  The prerequisites will depend on the content of the course.', '', None), '21-325': Course('Probability', '21-325', 9, 'This course focuses on  the understanding of basic concepts in probability theory and illustrates how these concepts can be applied to develop and analyze a variety of models arising in computational biology, finance, engineering and computer science. The firm grounding in the fundamentals is aimed at providing students the flexibility to build and analyze models from diverse applications as well as preparing the interested student for advanced work in these areas.  The course will cover core concepts such as probability spaces, random variables, random vectors, multivariate densities, distributions, expectations, sampling and simulation; independence, conditioning, conditional distributions and expectations;  limit theorems such as the strong law of large numbers and the central limit theorem; as well as additional topics such as large deviations, random walks and Markov chains, as time permits. 3 hrs. lec.', '21-259 or 21-268 or 21-269', None), '21-374': Course('Field Theory', '21-374', 9, 'The purpose of this course is to provide a successor to Algebraic Structures, with an emphasis on applications of groups and rings within algebra to some major classical problems. These include constructions with a ruler and compass, and the solvability or unsolvability of equations by radicals. It also offers an opportunity to see group theory and basic ring theory "in action", and introduces several powerful number theoretic techniques. The basic ideas and methods required to study finite fields will also be introduced. These ideas have recently been applied in a number of areas of theoretical computer science including primality testing and cryptography.  3 hrs. lec.', '21-373', None), '21-440': Course('Selected Topics in Algebra', '21-440', 9, 'Typical courses that might be offered from time to time are algebraic geometry, elliptic curves, commutative algebra, and theory of Boolean functions.  The prerequisites will depend on the content of the course.', '21-373', None), '21-105': Course('Pre-Calculus', '21-105', 9, 'Review of basic concepts, logarithms, functions and graphs, inequalities, polynomial functions, complex numbers, and trigonometric functions and identities. Special summer program only. 3 hrs lec., 1 hr.rec.', '', None), '21-370': Course('Discrete Time Finance', '21-370', 9, 'This course introduces the Black-Scholes option pricing formula, shows how the binomial model provides a discretization of this formula, and uses this connection to fit the binomial model to data. It then sets the stage for Continuous-Time Finance by discussing in the binomial model the mathematical technology of filtrations, martingales, Markov processes and risk-neutral measures. Additional topics are American options, expected utility maximization, the Fundamental Theorems of Asset Pricing in a multi-period setting, and term structure modeling, including the Heath-Jarrow-Morton model. Students in 21-370 are expected to read and write proofs. 3 hrs lec.', '(70-492 or 21-270) and (21-256 or 21-259 or 21-268 or 21-269', '21-325 or 70-207 or 36-217 or 36-225'), '21-371': Course('Functions of a Complex Variable', '21-371', 9, "This course provides an introduction to one of the basic topics of both pure and applied mathematics and is suitable for those with both practical and theoretical interests. Algebra and geometry of complex numbers; complex differentiation and integration. Cauchy's theorem and applications; conformal mapping; applications. 21-268 or 21-269 are recommended rather than 21-259. 3 hrs. lec.", '21-259 or 21-268 or 21-269', None), '21-101': Course('Freshman Mathematics Seminar', '21-101', 3, "This course is offered in the Fall semester for first semester Freshmen interested in majoring in mathematics. Topics vary from year to year. Recent topics have included Fermat's last theorem, finite difference equations, convexity, and fractals. 3 hrs. lec.", '', None), '21-373': Course('Algebraic Structures', '21-373', 9, "Groups: Homomorphisms. Subgroups, cosets, Lagrange's theorem. Conjugation. Normal subgroups, quotient groups, first isomorphism theorem. Group actions, Cauchy's Theorem. Dihedral and alternating groups. The second and third isomorphism theorems. Rings:  Subrings, ideals, quotient rings, first isomorphism theorem. Polynomial rings. Prime and maximal ideals, prime and irreducible elements. PIDs and UFDs. Noetherian domains. Gauss' lemma. Eisenstein criterion. Fields:  Field of fractions of an integral domain. Finite fields. Applications to coding theory, cryptography, number theory. 3 hrs lec.", '21-127 and (21-241 or 21-242)', None), '21-228': Course('Discrete Mathematics', '21-228', 9, "The techniques of discrete mathematics arise in every application of mathematics, which is not purely continuous, for example in computer science, economics, and general problems of optimization. This course introduces two of the fundamental areas of discrete mathematics: enumeration and graph theory. The introduction to enumeration includes permutations, combinations, and topics such as discrete probability, combinatorial distributions, recurrence relations, generating functions, Ramsey's Theorem, and the principle of inclusion and exclusion. The introduction to graph theory includes topics such as paths, walks, connectivity, Eulerian and Hamilton cycles, planar graphs, Euler's Theorem, graph coloring, matchings, networks, and trees. 3 hrs. lec, 1 hr. rec.", '21-127', None), '21-350': Course('History of Mathematics', '21-350', 9, 'Mathematics has a long and interesting history, and there is much insight into both mathematics and history to be gained from its study. The emphasis here will be on learning the mathematics with the added value of appreciating it in historical context. Selected topics may range from early number systems, the development of geometry, the emergence of the ideas of analysis, through to the origins of modern set theory. 3 hrs. lec.', '', None), '21-201': Course('Undergraduate Colloquium', '21-201', 1, 'All mathematics majors meet for one hour each week to hear discussions on current research by faculty or students, presentations on mathematics from mathematicians outside academia, and expository talks on selected mathematical topics not part of the usual curricula. Also will include topics of special interest to undergraduates such as preparation for graduate school.', '', None), '21-476': Course('Introduction to Dynamical Systems', '21-476', 9, "This course is an introduction to differentiable dynamical systems. The material includes basic properties of dynamical systems, including the existence and uniqueness theory, continuation, singular points, orbits, and their classification.  The Poincare'-Bendixson theorem and typical applications, like Lienard equations and Lotka-Volterra are also covered. An introduction to chaos as time permits.    3 hrs. lec.", '(21-241 or 21-242) and 21-261', None), '21-450': Course('Topics in Geometry', '21-450', 9, 'Typical of courses, which are offered from time to time are convex sets, projective geometry, and classical geometry. The prerequisites will depend on the content of the course. 3 hrs. lec.', '', None), '21-268': Course('Multidimensional Calculus', '21-268', 10, "A serious introduction to multidimensional calculus that makes use of matrices and linear transformation. Results will be stated carefully and rigorously. Students will be expected to write some proofs; however, some of the deeper results will be presented without proofs. Topics to be covered include: functions of several variables, regions and domains, limits and continuity, partial derivatives, linearization and Jacobian matrices, chain rules, inverse and implicit functions, geometric applications, higher derivatives, Taylor's theorem, optimization, vector fields, multiple integrals and change of variables, Leibnitz's rule, line integrals, Green's theorem, path independence and connectedness, conservative vector fields, surfaces and orientability, surface integrals, divergence theorem and Stokes's theorem. 3 hrs. lec.", '21-122 and (21-241 or 21-242)', None), '21-269': Course('Vector Analysis', '21-269', 10, "An honors version of 21-268 for students of greater aptitude and motivation. More emphasis will be placed on writing proofs. Topics to be covered include: basic geometry and topology of Euclidean space, curves in space, arclength, curvature and torsion, functions on Euclidean spaces, limits and continuity, partial derivatives, gradients and linearization, chain rules, inverse and implicit function theorems, geometric applications, higher derivatives, Taylor's theorem, optimization, vector fields, multiple integrals and change of variables, Leibnitz's rule, conservative and solenoidal vector fields, divergence and curl, surfaces and orientability, surface integrals, Gauss-Green theorems and Stokes's theorem. 3 hrs. lec.", '21-242', None), '21-240': Course('Matrix Algebra with Applications', '21-240', 10, 'Vectors and matrices, the solution of linear systems of equations, vector spaces and subspaces, orthogonality, determinants, real and complex eigenvalues and eigenvectors, linear transformations.  The course is intended for students in Economics, Statistics, Information Systems, and it will focus on topics relevant to these fields.  3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '', None), '21-241': Course('Matrices and Linear Transformations', '21-241', 10, 'A first course in linear algebra intended for scientists, engineers, mathematicians and computer scientists.  Students will be required to write some straightforward proofs.  Topics to be covered: complex numbers, real and complex vectors and matrices, rowspace and columnspace of a matrix, rank and nullity, solving linear systems by row reduction of a matrix, inverse matrices and determinants, change of basis, linear transformations, inner product of vectors, orthonormal bases and the Gram-Schmidt process, eigenvectors and eigenvalues, diagonalization of a matrix, symmetric and orthogonal matrices. 21-127 is strongly recommended. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '', None), '21-242': Course('Matrix Theory', '21-242', 10, 'An honors version of 21-241 (Matrix Algebra and Linear Transformations) for students of greater aptitude and motivation.  More emphasis will be placed on writing proofs.  Topics to be covered: complex numbers, real and complex vectors and matrices, rowspace and columnspace of a matrix, rank and nullity, solving linear systems by row reduction of a matrix, inverse matrices and determinants, change of basis, linear transformations, inner product of vectors, orthonormal bases and the Gram-Schmidt process, eigenvectors and eigenvalues, diagonalization of a matrix, symmetric and orthogonal matrices, hermitian and unitary matrices, quadratic forms.  3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '', None), '21-126': Course('Introduction to Mathematical Software', '21-126', 3, 'This course provides an introduction to the use of several software packages, which are useful to mathematics students. Among the packages are Maple and Mathematica for symbolic computing, TeX and LaTeX for mathematical documents, and Matlab for numerical computing. The course will also introduce the mathematical facilities built into spreadsheets such as Excel. The aim of the course is to provide the student with some basic skills in the use of this software without attempting complete coverage. A deeper knowledge of the software will be easy to obtain after completing this course. There are no prerequisites for the course, other than basic computer literacy and a knowledge of elementary mathematics. It is suggested that the course should be taken during the first two years of undergraduate studies.', '', None), '21-356': Course('Principles of Real Analysis II', '21-356', 9, "This course provides a rigorous and proof-based treatment of functions of several real variables. Topology in metric spaces, specialization to finite dimensional normed linear spaces. Vector differential calculus: continuity and the total derivative, partial derivatives, directional derivatives, gradients, Jacobians, the chain rule, implicit function theorem. Vector integral calculus: double and triple integrals, arclength and surface area, line integrals, Green's Theorem, surface integrals, Divergence and Stokes Theorems. If time permits: trigonometric series, Fourier series for orthonormal bases, minimization of square error. The course presumes some mathematical sophistication including the ability to recognize, read, and write proofs. 21-268 or 21-269 are strongly recommended rather than 21-259. 3 hrs lec.", '(21-259 or 21-268 or 21-269) and 21-241 and 21-355', None), '21-120': Course('Differential and Integral Calculus', '21-120', 10, "Functions, limits, derivatives, logarithmic, exponential, and trigonometric functions, inverse functions; L'Hospital's Rule, curve sketching, Mean Value Theorem, related rates, linear and quadratic approximations, maximum-minimum problems, inverse functions, definite and indefinite integrals, and hyperbolic functions; applications of integration, integration by substitution and by parts.  3 hrs lec., 2 hrs. rec.", '', None), '21-260': Course('Differential Equations', '21-260', 9, 'Ordinary differential equations: first and second order equations, applications, Laplace transforms; partial differential equations: partial derivatives, separation of variables, Fourier series; systems of ordinary differential equations; applications. 21-259 or 21-268 or 21-269 are recommended. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '21-122', None), '21-122': Course('Integration, Differential Equations and Approximation', '21-122', 10, "Integration by trigonometric substitution and partial fractions; arclength; improper integrals; Simpson's and Trapezoidal Rules for numerical integration; separable differential equations, Newton's method, Euler's method, Taylor's Theorem including a discussion of the remainder, sequences, series, power series. Parametric curves, polar coordinates, vectors, dot product. 3 hrs lec., 2 hrs. rec.", '21-112 or 21-120', None), '21-355': Course('Principles of Real Analysis I', '21-355', 9, "This course provides a rigorous and proof-based treatment of functions of one real variable. The Real Number System:  Field and order axioms, sups and infs, completeness, integers and rational numbers. Real Sequences:  Limits, cluster points, limsup and liminf, subsequences, monotonic sequences, Cauchy's criterion, Bolzano-Weierstrass Theorem. Topology of the Real Line: Open sets, closed sets, density, compactness, Heine-Borel Theorem. Continuity: attainment of extrema, Intermediate Value Theorem, uniform continuity. Differentiation:  Chain Rule, local extrema, Mean-Value Theorems, L'Hospital's Rule, Taylor's Theorem. Riemann Integration:  Partitions, upper and lower integrals, sufficient conditions for integrability, Fundamental Theorem of Calculus. Sequences of Functions:  Pointwise convergence, uniform convergence, interchanging the order of limits.  The course presumes some mathematical sophistication including the ability to recognize, read, and write proofs.  3 hrs lec.", '21-122 and 21-127', None), '21-329': Course('Set Theory', '21-329', 9, "Set theory was invented about 110 years ago by George Cantor as an instrument to understand infinite objects and to compare different sizes of infinite sets. Since then set theory has come to play an important role in several branches of modern mathematics, and serves as a foundation of mathematics. Contents: Basic properties of natural numbers, countable and uncountable sets, construction of the real numbers, some basic facts about the topology of the real line, cardinal numbers and cardinal arithmetic, the continuum hypothesis, well ordered sets, ordinal numbers and transfinite induction, the axiom of choice, Zorn's lemma. Optional topics if time permits: Infinitary combinatorics, filters and large cardinals, Borel and analytic sets of reals. 3 hrs. lec.", '21-127', None), '21-441': Course('Number Theory', '21-441', 9, "Number theory deals with the integers, the most basic structures of mathematics. It is one of the most ancient, beautiful, and well-studied branches of mathematics, and has recently found surprising new applications in communications and cryptography. Course contents: Structure of the integers, greatest common divisiors, prime factorization. Modular arithmetic, Fermat's Theorem, Chinese Remainder Theorem. Number theoretic functions, e.g. Euler's function, Mobius functions, and identities. Diophantine equations, Pell's Equation, continued fractions. Modular polynomial equations, quadratic reciprocity.  3 hrs. lec.", '(21-241 or 21-242) and 21-373', None), '21-341': Course('Linear Algebra', '21-341', 9, '21-341 Linear Algebra. A mathematically rigorous treatment of Linear Algebra over an arbitrary field. Topics studied will include abstract vector spaces, linear  transformations, determinants, eigenvalues, eigenvectors, inner products, invariant subspaces, canonical forms, the spectral theorem and the singular value decomposition. 21-373 recommended. 3 hrs. lec.', '21-241 or 21-242', None), '21-484': Course('Graph Theory', '21-484', 9, "Graph theory uses basic concepts to approach a diversity of problems and nontrivial applications in operations research, computer science and other disciplines. It is one of the very few mathematical areas where one is always close to interesting unsolved problems. Topics include graphs and subgraphs, trees, connectivity, Euler tours and Hamilton cycles, matchings, graph colorings, planar graphs and Euler's Formula, directed graphs, network flows, counting arguments, and graph algorithms.  3 hrs. lec.", '(21-228 or 15-251) and (21-241 or 21-242)', None), '21-124': Course('Calculus II for Biologists and Chemists', '21-124', 10, 'This is intended as a second calculus course for biology and chemistry majors.  It uses a variety of computational techniques based around the use of MATLAB or a similar system. In addition to major topics from calculus and linear algebra there is a substantial statistical component in the course. 3 hours lecture, 2 hours recitation. Prerequisite: 21-112 or 21-120.', '21-112 or 21-120', None), '21-420': Course('Continuous-Time Finance', '21-420', 9, "This course begins with Brownian motion, stochastic integration,and Ito's formula from stochastic calculus. This theory is used to develop the Black-Scholes option pricing formula and the Black-Scholes partial differential equation. Additional topics may include models of credit risk, simulation, and expected utility maximization. 3 hrs lec.", '(18-202 or 21-260) and 21-370 and (21-325 or 36-217 or 36-225)', None), '21-127': Course('Concepts of Mathematics', '21-127', 10, 'This course introduces the basic concepts, ideas and tools involved in doing mathematics. As such, its main focus is on presenting informal logic, and the methods of mathematical proof. These subjects are closely related to the application of mathematics in many areas, particularly computer science. Topics discussed include a basic introduction to elementary number theory, induction, the algebra of sets, relations, equivalence relations, congruences, partitions, and functions, including injections, surjections, and bijections.  A prerequisite for 15-211. 3 hrs. lec., 2 hrs. rec.', '', None), '21-470': Course('Selected Topics in Analysis', '21-470', 9, 'Typical of courses, which are offered from time to time are finite difference equations, calculus of variations, and applied control theory. The prerequisites will depend on the content of the course. 3 hrs. lec.', '', None), '21-300': Course('Basic Logic', '21-300', 9, 'Propositional and predicate logic: Syntax, proof theory and semantics up to completeness theorem, Lowenheim Skolem theorems, and applications of the compactness theorem. 3 hrs. lec.', '15-251 or 21-228 or 21-373', None), '21-257': Course('Models and Methods for Optimization', '21-257', 9, 'Introduces basic methods of operations research and is intended primarily for Business Administration and Economics majors. Review of linear systems; linear programming, including the simplex algorithm, duality, and sensitivity analysis; the transportation problem; the critical path method; the knapsack problem, traveling salesman problem, and an introduction to set covering models. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '06-262 or 18-202 or 21-240 or 21-241 or 21-242 or 21-256', None), '21-256': Course('Multivariate Analysis', '21-256', 9, 'This course is designed for students in Economics or Business Administration. Matrix algebra: vectors, matrices, systems of equations, dot product, cross product, lines and planes. Optimization: partial derivatives, the chain rule, gradient, unconstrained optimization, constrained optimization (Lagrange multipliers and the Kuhn-Tucker Theorem). Improper integrals. Multiple integration: iterated integrals, probability applications, triple integrals, change of variables. 3 hrs lec., 1 hr rec.', '21-112 or 21-120', None), '21-467': Course('Differential Geometry', '21-467', 9, 'This course will provide a thorough and rigorous introduction to differential geometry on manifolds. Contents: Differentiable manifolds; tangent spaces; vector fields and n-forms; integral curves; cotangent vectors; tensors; Riemannian metrics; connection; parallel transport; geodesics and convex neighborhoods; sectional, Ricci, scalar curvatures; tensors on Riemannian manifolds; Lie groups; transformation groups.', '21-373 and 21-356', None), '21-235': Course('Mathematical Studies Analysis I', '21-235', 10, "An honors version of 21-355 for students of greater aptitude and motivation.  Topics to be covered include: The Real Number System: sups and infs, completeness, integers and rational numbers. Metric spaces, normed spaces, inner product spaces and their specialization to the Euclidean space. Topological properties of metric spaces (open sets, closed sets, density, compactness, Heine-Borel Theorem). Sequences and convergence; completeness.  Baire Category Theorem. Real sequences: limsup and liminf, subsequences, monotonic sequences, Bolzano-Weierstrass Theorem. Real series (criteria for convergence).  Continuity, limits of functions, attainment of extrema, Intermediate Value Theorem, uniform continuity. Differentiation of functions of one variable: Chain Rule, local extrema, Mean-Value Theorems, L'Ho'pital's Rule, Taylor's Theorem. Riemann Integration: Partitions, upper and lower integrals, sufficient conditions for integrability, Fundamental Theorem of Calculus.  3 hrs. lec.", '21-127 and 21-269', None), '21-365': Course('Projects in Applied Mathematics', '21-365', 9, 'This course provides students with an opportunity to solve problems posed by area companies. It is also designed to provide experience working as part of a team to solve problems for a client. The background needed might include linear programming, simulation, data analysis, scheduling, numerical techniques, etc.', '', None), '21-237': Course('Mathematical Studies Algebra I', '21-237', 10, "An honors version of 21-373 Algebraic structures for students of greater aptitude and motivation.  Abstract algebra is the study of algebraic systems by the axiomatic method, and it is one of the core areas of modern mathematics. This course is a rigorous and fast-paced introduction to the basic objects in abstract algebra. Topics to be covered include: Homomorphisms. Subgroups, cosets, Lagrange's theorem. Conjugation. Normal subgroups, quotient groups, first isomorphism theorem. Automorphisms, the automorphism group, characteristic subgroups. Group actions, Cauchy's Theorem, Sylow's theorem. Normalisers and centralisers, class equation, finite p-groups. Dihedral and alternating groups. The second and third isomorphism theorems. Simple groups, statement of Jordan-Holder theorem, semidirect product of groups. Subrings, ideals, quotient rings, first isomorphism theorem. Polynomial rings. Zorn's Lemma. Prime and maximal ideals, prime and irreducible elements. PIDs and UFDs. Noetherian domains. Hilbert Basis Theorem. Gauss' lemma. Eisenstein criterion. Field of fractions of an integral domain. k a field implies k[x] a PID, R a UFD implies R[x] a UFD. Finite fields and applications.  3 hrs. lec.", '21-127 and 21-269', None), '21-236': Course('Mathematical Studies Analysis II', '21-236', 10, "An honors version of 21-356 for students of greater aptitude and motivation.  Topics to be covered include: Vector differential calculus: differentiability, partial derivatives, directional derivatives, gradients, Jacobians, the chain rule, implicit function theorem, inverse function theorem. Local extrema, constrained problems (Lagrange multipliers). Integration of differential forms: Manifolds, Differential forms (properties, differentiation, change of variables), partition of unity, integration, volume form, area form, Stokes' theorem. Sequences of Functions: Pointwise convergence, uniform convergence, Arzela-Ascoli, Weierstrass approximation theorem. Series of functions:  Power series, Fourier series, orthonormal bases.  3 hrs. lec.", '21-235 and 21-24', '21-238'), '21-238': Course('Mathematical Studies Algebra II', '21-238', 10, "An honors version of 21-341 Linear Algebra for students of greater aptitude and motivation.   Linear algebra is a crucial tool in pure and applied mathematics. This course aims to introduce the main ideas at a high level of rigour and generality. The course starts with the study of (potentially) infinite-dimensional vector spaces over an arbitrary field, continues with the theory of modules (where the role of the field is now played by an arbitrary ring), and concludes with the development of real and complex inner product spaces. Topics to be covered include: Review of fields. Review of Zorn's Lemma. Vector spaces (possibly in finite dimensional) over an arbitrary field. Independent sets, bases, existence of a basis, exchange lemma, dimension. Linear transformations, dual space. Multilinear maps, tensor product, exterior power, determinant of a transformation. Eigenvalues, eigenvectors, characteristic and minimal polynomial of a transformation, Cayley-Hamilton theorem. Review of commutative rings. R-modules. Sums and quotients of modules. Free modules. Structure theorem for fg modules over a PID and applications (Jordan and rational canonical form, structure theory of fg abelian groups). Review of real and complex numbers. Real and complex inner product spaces. Orthonormal sets, orthonormal bases, Gram-Schmidt. Examples: F^n and l^2(F) for F = R; C. Operators: Symmetric/Hermitian and Orthogonal/Unitary operators. Spectral theorem. Quadratic forms. Singular value decomposition. Possible additional topics (time permitting): applications to combinatorics, category theory, representations of finite groups, normed spaces.  3 hrs. lec.", '21-237 and 21-242', None), '21-369': Course('Numerical Methods', '21-369', 9, 'This course provides an introduction to the use of computers to solve scientific problems. Methods for the computational solution of linear algebra systems, nonlinear equations, the interpolation and approximation of functions, differentiation and integration, and ordinary differential equations. Analysis of roundoff and discretization errors and programming techniques. 21-268 or 21-269 are recommended. 3 hrs. lec.', '15-110 and (21-259 or 21-268 or 21-269)', None), '21-366': Course('Topics in Applied Mathematics', '21-366', 9, 'Typical of courses that might be offered from time to time are game theory, non-linear optimization, and dynamic programming. Prerequisites will depend on the content of the course. 3 hrs. lec.', '', None), '21-259': Course('Calculus in Three Dimensions', '21-259', 9, 'Vectors, lines, planes, quadratic surfaces, polar, cylindrical and spherical coordinates, partial derivatives, directional derivatives, gradient, divergence, curl, chain rule, maximum-minimum problems, multiple integrals, parametric surfaces and curves, line integrals, surface integrals, Green-Gauss theorems. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '21-122', None), '21-270': Course('Introduction to Mathematical Finance', '21-270', 9, 'This is a first course for those considering majoring or minoring in Computational Finance. The theme of this course is pricing derivative securities by replication. The simplest case of this idea, static hedging, is used to discuss net present value of a non-random cash flow, internal rate of return, and put-call option parity. Pricing by replication is then considered in a one-period random model. Risk-neutral probability measures, the Fundamental Theorems of Asset Pricing, and an introduction to expected utility maximization and mean-variance analysis are presented in this model.  Finally, replication is studied in a multi-period binomial model. Within this model, the replicating strategies for European and American options are determined. 3 hrs. lec.', '21-120 or 21-112', None), '21-292': Course('Operations Research I', '21-292', 9, 'Operations research offers a scientific approach to decision making, most commonly involving the allocation of scarce resources. This course develops some of the fundamental methods used. Linear programming: the simplex method and its linear algebra foundations, duality, post-optimality and sensitivity analysis; the transportation problem; the critical path method; non-linear programming methods. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '21-122 and (21-241 or 21-242)', None), '21-465': Course('Topology', '21-465', 9, "Metric spaces. Topological spaces. Separation axioms. Open, closed and compact sets. Continuous functions. Product spaces, subspaces, quotient spaces.  Connectedness and path-connectedness. Homotopy. Fundamental group of a pointed space. Simply connected spaces. Winding number, the fundamental group of the circle. Functorial property of the fundamental group. Brouwer fixed point theorem. Covering spaces. van Kampen's theorem. 2-manifolds. Triangulations.  Euler characteristic. Surgery, classification of compact 2-manifolds. 3 hrs lec.", '21-355 and 21-373', None), '21-301': Course('Combinatorics', '21-301', 9, 'A major part of the course concentrates on algebraic methods, which are relevant in the study of error correcting codes, and other areas. Topics covered in depth include permutations and combinations, generating functions, recurrence relations, the principle of inclusion and exclusion, and the Fibonacci sequence and the harmonic series. Additional topics may include existence proofs, partitions, finite calculus, generating combinatorial objects, Polya theory, codes, probabilistic methods. 3 hrs. lec', '21-122 and (21-228 or 15-251)', None), '21-296': Course('Millennium Problems Seminar', '21-296', 3, 'This seminar course will discuss some of the most important unsolved problems of mathematics (as deemed in 2000 by an international committee of mathematicians): The Riemann Hypothesis; Yang-Mills Theory and the Mass Gap Hypothesis; the P. vs. NP Problem; smoothness of solutions of the Navier-Stokes Equations; the Hodge Conjecture; the Birch and Swinnerton-Dyer Conjecture. If the time allows, the Poincare conjecture will also be discussed.  1 hr. lec.', '', None), '21-295': Course('Putnam Seminar', '21-295', 3, 'A problem solving seminar designed to prepare students to participate in the annual William Lowell Putnam Mathematical Competition.  Students solve and present their solutions to problems posed.', '', None), '21-372': Course('Partial Differential Equations and Fourier Analysis', '21-372', 9, 'This course provides an introduction to partial differential equations and is recommended for majors in mathematics, physical science, or engineering. Boundary value problems on an interval, Fourier series, uniform convergence, the heat, wave, and potential equations on bounded domains, general theory of eigenfunction expansion, the Fourier integral applied to problems on unbounded domains, introduction to numerical methods.  3 hrs. lec.', '(21-259 or 21-268 or 21-269) and 21-260', None), '21-110': Course('Problem Solving in Recreational Mathematics', '21-110', 9, 'The emphasis is on learning to solve problems in elementary mathematics. Topics may vary among offerings of the course, but typically include puzzles, algebraic problems, number theory, and graph theory. 3 hrs. lec.', '', None), '21-111': Course('Calculus I', '21-111', 10, 'Review of basic algebra, functions, limits, derivatives of algebraic, exponential and logarithmic functions, curve sketching, applications with emphasis on economic models.  Successful completion of 21-111 and 21-112 entitles a student to enroll in any mathematics course for which 21-120 is a prerequisite.  3 hrs. lec., 2 hrs. rec.', '', None), '21-112': Course('Calculus II', '21-112', 10, "Indefinite integral, definite integral and applications, techniques of integration, trigonometric functions, functions of several variables, partial derivatives, maximum-minimum problems, Lagrange multipliers, geometric series, Newton's method, applications. Successful completion of 21-111 and 21-112 entitles a student to enroll in any mathematics course for which 21-120 is a prerequisite. 3 hrs. lec., 2 hrs. rec.", '21-111', None), '21-261': Course('Introduction to Ordinary Differential Equations', '21-261', 10, 'A first course in ordinary differential equations intended primarily for math majors and for those students interested in a more conceptual treatment of the subject. One of the goals of this course is to prepare students for upper level courses on differential equations, mathematical analysis and applied mathematics. Students will be required to write rigorous arguments. Topics to be covered: Ordinary differential equations: first and second order equations, applications, Laplace transform, systems of linear ordinary differential equations; systems of nonlinear ordinary differential equations, equilibria and stability, applications. Note:  Courses 21-259, or 21-268, or 21-269 are recommended. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '21-12', '21-127 and 21-241'), '21-115': Course('Basic Differential Calculus', '21-115', 5, 'Functions, limits, derivatives, curve sketching, Mean Value Theorem, trigonometric functions, related rates, linear and quadratic approximations, maximum-minimum problems. Special summer program only.', '', None), '21-320': Course('Symbolic Programming Methods', '21-320', 9, 'The objective of this course is to learn to program in Maple, a powerful symbolic mathematics package available on many platforms at Carnegie Mellon. After learning what Maple can do with the commands provided with the package, students will learn to develop their own Maple functions to accomplish extended mathematical computations. Grades in the course will be based mostly on project work. Projects may come from any relevant field and may be graphical, numerical, or symbolic or all three. The course will involve online demonstrations in most classes.  3 hrs. lec.', '21-122 and 21-127', None),'15-348': Course('Embedded Systems', '15-348', 9, 'This course is ONLY offered at Carnegie Mellon in Qatar.  This course covers the broad range of foundational skills that apply across all embedded computer system application areas, from thermostats to self-driving vehicles. The emphasis is at the layer where hardware meets software. Topics include microcontroller hardware, assembly language, embedded C programming, analog I/O, timers, code optimization, interrupts, and concurrency. Real world engineering practices, constraints, and example applications are integrated throughout the course. Weekly hands-on hardware and software experiences with an industry-strength automotive embedded controller are coordinated with the lecture content to reinforce core skills.', '15-123', None), '15-349': Course('Introduction to Computer and Network Security', '15-349', 9, 'This course is ONLY offered at Carnegie Mellon in Qatar.  This course is meant to offer Computer Science undergraduate students in their junior or senior year a broad overview of the field of computer security. Students will learn the basic concepts in computer security including software vulnerability analysis and defense, networking and wireless security, applied cryptography, as well as ethical, legal, social and economic facets of security. Students will also learn the fundamental methodology for how to design and analyze security critical systems.', '15-123', None), '15-221': Course('Technical Communication for Computer Scientists', '15-221', 9, 'The course is designed for sophomore computer science majors to improve their abilities in practical, professional communications (both written and oral). It aims to help students compose clear, concise technical writings and oral presentations for multi-level audiences.  Assignments include technical definitions, descriptions, instructions, process explanations, abstracts, memos, and research reports.  Assignments may incorporate recent computer science research at Carnegie Mellon, projects in related technical courses, and professional case studies.  Sophomores will likely find the course more useful if they have either had an internship or faculty-supervised research, including SURG projects prior to enrollment.', '76-101', None), '15-359': Course('Probability and Computing', '15-359', 12, 'Probability theory has become indispensable in computer science.  In areas such as artificial intelligence and computer science theory, probabilistic methods and ideas based on randomization are central. In other areas such as networks and systems, probability is becoming an increasingly useful framework for handling uncertainty and modeling the patterns of data that occur in complex systems.  This course gives an introduction to probability as it is used in computer science theory and practice, drawing on applications and current research developments as motivation and context. Topics include combinatorial probability and random graphs, heavy tail distributions, concentration inequalities, various randomized algorithms, sampling random variables and computer simulation, and Markov chains and their many applications, from Web search engines to models of network protocols. The course will assume familiarity with 3-D calculus and linear algebra.', '15-251 and 21-259 and 21-241', None), '15-437': Course('Web Application Development', '15-437', 12, 'This course will introduce concepts in programming web application servers. We will study the fundamental architectural elements of programming web sites that produce content dynamically. The primary technology introduced will be Java Servlets and Java Server Pages (JSPs), but we will cover related topics as necessary so that students can build significant applications. Such topics include: HTTP, HTML and XML, JavaBeans, Design Patterns, Tag Libraries, Relational Databases, Object-Relation Mapping tools, Security, Web Services, Frameworks, Internationalization, and Scalability and Performance  Issues.  This course is recommended for students contemplating enrollment in 15-413 (the Software Engineering Project), since many of the projects in 15-413 are expected to be web-based. Students must be comfortable programming in Java to register for this course. Students must provide their own computer hardware for this course. Please see the Related URL above for more information.', '15-214', None), '15-121': Course('Introduction to Data Structures', '15-121', 10, 'A continuation of the process of program design and analysis for  students with some prior programming experience (functions, loops, and  arrays, not necessarily in Java). The course reinforces object-oriented  programming techniques in Java and covers data aggregates, data  structures (e.g., linked lists, stacks, queues, trees, and graphs), and  an introduction to the analysis of algorithms that operate on those data  structures.  ', '15-112 or 15-110', None), '15-122': Course('Principles of Imperative Computation', '15-122', 10, 'For students with a basic understanding of programming (variables, expressions, loops, arrays, functions). Teaches imperative programming and methods for ensuring the correctness of programs.  Students will learn the process and concepts needed to go from high-level descriptions of algorithms to correct imperative implementations, with specific application to basic data structures and algorithms.  Much of the course will be conducted in a subset of C amenable to verification, with a transition to full C near the end. This course prepares students for 15-213 and 15-210.  NOTE: students must achieve a C or better in order to use  this course to satisfy the pre-requisite for any subsequent Computer  Science course.', '15-112', '21-127'), '15-451': Course('Algorithm Design and Analysis', '15-451', 12, 'This course is about the design and analysis of algorithms. We study specific algorithms for a variety of problems, as well as general design and analysis techniques. Specific topics include searching, sorting, algorithms for graph problems, efficient data structures, lower bounds and NP-completeness. A variety of other topics may be covered at the discretion of the instructor. These include parallel algorithms, randomized algorithms, geometric algorithms, low level techniques for efficient programming, cryptography, and cryptographic protocols.', '15-251 and 15-210 and 21-241', None), '15-455': Course('Undergraduate Complexity Theory', '15-455', 9, 'Complexity theory is the study of how much of a resource (such as time, space, parallelism, or randomness) is required to perform some of the computations that interest us the most. In a standard algorithms course, one concentrates on giving resource efficient methods to solve interesting problems. In this course, we concentrate on techniques that prove or suggest that there are no efficient methods to solve many important problems.  We will develop the theory of various complexity classes, such as P, NP, co-NP, PH, #P, PSPACE, NC, AC, L, NL, UP, RP, BPP, IP, and PCP. We will study techniques to classify problems according to our available taxonomy. By developing a subtle pattern of reductions between classes we will suggest an (as yet unproven!) picture of how by using limited amounts of various resources, we limit our computational power.', '15-251', None), '15-390': Course('Entrepreneurship for Computer Science', '15-390', 9, 'This course is an introduction to Entrepreneurship designed to develop skills related to entrepreneurship and innovation for non-business undergraduate and graduate students in the School of Computer Science.  The course assumes no background courses in business and is appropriate for those who are interested in bringing innovations to market either through new companies or existing companies.   The course provides an overview of entrepreneurship and innovation, develops an entrepreneurial frame of mind, and provides a framework for learning the rudiments of how to generate ideas.  Students come up with or are presented with potential ideas and learn how to develop these ideas into opportunities, and to explore their potential for becoming viable businesses.  They learn how to do market research, to develop go-to-market strategies, value propositions and to differentiate their products or services from potential competitors.  The focus is on understanding and developing strategies for approaching the key elements of the entrepreneurial process...opportunity, resources and team. The course consists of a balance of lectures, case studies and encounters with entrepreneurs, investors and business professionals.  The students are exposed to financial and intellectual property issues, and encounter a real world perspective on entrepreneurship, innovation and leadership.  The output of the course is a mini-business plan or venture opportunity screening document that can be developed into a business plan in a subsequent course entitled New Venture Creation or through independent study.', '', None), '15-128': Course('Freshman Immigration Course', '15-128', 1, 'The Freshman Immigration Course is taken by first-semester Computer Science majors on the Pittsburgh campus. The course is designed to acquaint incoming majors with computer science at CMU. Talks range from historical perspectives in the field to descriptions of the cutting edge research being conducted in the School of Computer Science. 15-128 is a one unit course and is graded pass/fail. Enrollment is limited to SCS Freshmen ONLY.', '', None), '15-129': Course('Freshman Immigration Course II', '15-129', 3, 'This course is ONLY offered at Carnegie Mellon in Qatar.  Students and instructors will solve different problems each week by searching the Web and other likely places for answers. The problems will be submitted by other faculty who will grade the quality of the answers. Students will learn strategies and techniques for finding information on the Web more efficiently; learn when to start with a search engine, a subject-oriented directory, or other tools; explore and practice using advanced search syntax for major search engines; experience specialized search engines for images, sound, multimedia, newsgroups, and discussion lists as well as subject-specific search engines; discover valuable resources to help keep you up-to-date in this fast-changing environment.', '', None), '15-321': Course('Research Methods for Experimental Computer Science', '15-321', 9, 'The success or failure of an experiment can turn on the details of how the experiment was performed &#8212; the experimental method. It is critical that the methodology be consistent with whatever research hypothesis is being pursued.  The goal of this project-based course is to give students familiarity with and appreciation for the subtleties of a range of experimental techniques essential to high-quality empirical research.  The course is based on a project that will illustrate important concepts of research methods.  Example topics include user-study design and operation, data gathering, data diagnosis, experiment design and execution, signal detection, performance evaluation, error analysis, reporting results, etc.  The project will explore the challenging open problem of keystroke dynamics, a biometric regime which seeks to identify/authenticate/discriminate users on the basis of their typing styles.  In this context, numerous methodological issues provide the stimulus for learning how to perform empirical research from the beginning to the end of a project.  Lectures will present necessary background material about the problem area and experimental methods; homework assignments and a team project will give students guided, hands-on, research and practical experience.  At the end of the course, students will be acquainted with the basic issues in experimental methods, and will be able to perform independent work using the lessons learned and resources provided.  Enrollment is limited to graduate students, juniors, and seniors. It will be helpful for students to have some experience with scripting languages (e.g., Perl, Python, Tcl, etc), statistically-oriented packages (e.g., R, Matlab, Weka) or other implementations of various machine-learning-type classifiers.  This course can be used to satisfy the Lab requirement for the Computer Science major.', '15-213', None), '15-418': Course('Parallel Computer Architecture and Programming', '15-418', 12, 'The fundamental principles and engineering tradeoffs involved in designing modern parallel computers, as well as the programming techniques to effectively utilize these machines. Topics include naming shared data, synchronizing threads, and the latency and bandwidth associated with communication. Case studies on shared-memory, message-passing, data-parallel and dataflow machines will be used to illustrate these techniques and tradeoffs. Programming assignments will be performed on one or more commercial multiprocessors, and there will be a significant course project.', '15-213', None), '15-381': Course('Artificial Intelligence: Representation and Problem Solving', '15-381', 9, 'This course is about the theory and practice of Artificial Intelligence. We will study modern techniques for computers to represent task-relevant information and make intelligent (i.e. satisficing or optimal) decisions towards the achievement of goals. The search and problem solving methods are applicable throughout a large range of industrial, civil, medical, financial, robotic, and information systems.  We will investigate questions about AI systems such as: how to represent knowledge, how to effectively generate appropriate sequences of actions and how to search among alternatives to find optimal or near-optimal solutions.  We will also explore how to deal with uncertainty in the world, how to learn from experience, and how to learn decision rules from data.  We expect that by the end of the course students will have a thorough understanding of the algorithmic foundations of AI, how probability and AI are closely interrelated, and how automated agents learn.  We also expect students to acquire a strong appreciation of the big-picture aspects of developing fully autonomous intelligent agents.  Other lectures will introduce additional aspects of AI, including natural language processing, web-based search engines, industrial applications, autonomous robotics, and economic/game-theoretic decision making.', '15-122 or 15-211', None), '15-383': Course('Introduction to Text Processing', '15-383', 6, 'Text processing is a mini-course about text basic techniques of processing human language in text format.  The course has theoretical and hands-on components. In the theoretical component, the course will discuss challenges in processing human languages, and review the  basics of statistics and probability theory and their application to language problems.  In the hands-on part, students will learn about Python programming and use it to process large volumes of text using various techniques. The processing will range from simple steps such as tokenization and part-of-speech tagging to full-fledged  applications such as  statistical machine translation,  search and document/topic classification.  The course is suited for junior and senior students in CS and IS.', '15-121 or 15-122', None), '15-385': Course('Introduction to Computer Vision', '15-385', 6, 'An introduction to the science and engineering of computer vision, i.e.  the analysis of the patterns in visual images with the view to understanding the objects and processes in the world that generate them.  Major topics include image formation and sensing, fourier analysis, edge and contour detection, inference of depth, shape and motion, classification, recognition, tracking, and active vision. The emphasis is on the learning of fundamental mathematical concepts and techniques and applying them to solve real vision problems. The discussion will also include comparison with human and animal vision from psychological and biological perspectives. Students will learn to think mathematically and develop skills in translating ideas and mathematical thoughts into programs to solve real vision problems.', '(18-202 and 15-122) or (21-259 and 15-122 and 21-241)', None), '15-386': Course('Neural Computation', '15-386', 9, 'Computational neuroscience is an interdisciplinary science that seeks to understand how the brain computes  to achieve  natural intelligence.  It seeks to understand the computational principles and mechanisms of intelligent behaviors and mental abilities &#8212; such as perception, language, motor control, and learning &#8212; by building artificial systems and computational models with the same capabilities. This course explores how neurons encode and process information, adapt and learn, communicate, cooperate, compete and compute at the individual level as well as at the levels of networks and systems. It will introduce basic concepts in computational modeling, information theory, signal processing, system analysis, statistical and probabilistic inference. Concrete examples will be drawn from the visual system and the motor systems,  and studied from computational, psychological and biological perspectives. Students will learn to perform computational experiments using Matlab and quantitative studies of neurons and neuronal networks.', '21-122 and 15-112', None), '15-387': Course('Computational Perception', '15-387', 9, 'In this course, we will first cover the biological and psychological foundational knowledge of biological perceptual systems, and then apply computational thinking to investigate the principles and mechanisms underlying natural perception. The course will focus on vision this year, but will also touch upon other sensory modalities. You will learn how to reason scientifically and computationally about problems and issues in perception, how to extract the essential computational properties of those abstract ideas, and finally how to convert these into explicit mathematical models and computational algorithms. Topics include perceptual representation and inference, perceptual organization, perceptual constancy, object recognition, learning and scene analysis. Prerequisites: First year college calculus, some basic knowledge of linear algebra and probability and some programming experience are desirable.', 'First year college calculus, some basic knowledge of linear algebra and probability and some programming experience are desirable', None), '15-410': Course('Operating System Design and Implementation', '15-410', 12, 'Operating System Design and Implementation is a rigorous hands-on introduction to the principles and practice of operating systems. The core experience is writing a small Unix-inspired OS kernel, in C with some x86 assembly language, which runs on a PC hardware simulator (and on actual PC hardware if you wish).  Work is done in two-person teams, and "team programming" skills (source control, modularity, documentation) are emphasized.  The size and scope of the programming assignments typically result in students significantly developing their design, implementation, and debugging abilities. Core concepts include the process model, virtual memory, threads, synchronization, and deadlock; the course also surveys higher-level OS topics including file systems, interprocess communication, networking, and security.  Students, especially graduate students, who have not satisfied the prerequisite at Carnegie Mellon are strongly cautioned - to enter the class you must be able to write a storage allocator in C, use a debugger, understand 2\'s-complement arithmetic, and translate between C and x86 assembly language.  The instructor may require you to complete a skills assessment exercise before the first week of the semester in order to remain registered in the class.  Auditing:  this course is usually full, and we generally receive many more requests to audit than we can accept.  If you wish to audit, please have your advisor contact us before the semester begins to discuss your educational goals.', '15-213', None), '15-322': Course('Introduction to Computer Music', '15-322', 9, 'Computers are used to synthesize sound, process signals, and compose music. Personal computers have replaced studios full of sound recording and processing equipment, completing a revolution that began with recording and electronics. In this course, students will learn the fundamentals of digital audio, basic sound synthesis algorithms, and techniques for digital audio effects and processing. Students will apply their knowledge in programming assignments using a very high-level programming language for sound synthesis and composition. In a final project, students will demonstrate their mastery of tools and techniques through music composition or by the implementation of a significant sound-processing technique.', '15-112', None), '15-412': Course('Operating System Practicum', '15-412', 9, 'The goal of this class is for students to acquire hands-on experience with operating-system code as it is developed and deployed in the real world.  Groups of two to four students will select, build, install, and become familiar with an open-source operating system project; propose a significant extension or upgrade to that project; and develop a production-quality implementation meeting the coding standards of that project.  Unless infeasible, the results will be submitted to the project for inclusion in the code base.  Variations on this theme are possible at the discretion of the instructor.  For example, it may be possible to work within the context of a non-operating-system software infrastructure project (window system, web server, or embedded network device kernel) or to extend a 15-410 student kernel.  In some situations students may work alone.  Group membership and unit count (9 units versus 12) will be decided by the third week of the semester.  Contributing to a real-world project will involve engaging in some mixture of messy, potentially open-ended activities such as: learning a revision control system, writing a short design document, creating and updating a simple project plan, participating in an informal code review, synthesizing scattered information about hardware and software, classifying and/or reading large amounts of code written by various people over a long period of time, etc.', '15-410', None), '15-413': Course('Software Engineering Practicum', '15-413', 12, 'This course is modeled after the successful MSE studio and MSIT practicum experiences used in the ISR software engineering masters programs.  Students will carry out a semester-long project for a real client in small teams.  A few lectures at the beginning of the course will introduce the process, tools, and documents to be used in the course, all of which will be specified by the instructors.  Throughout the project, groups will be mentored through weekly team meetings with faculty.  Teams will make regular presentations on the following topics: risk management, project planning, requirements, architecture, detailed design, quality assurance, final product presentations, and reflections on the experience.  Teams will also deliver documents on each of the above topics.  Evaluation will be based on the in-class presentations, process and product documentation deliverables, how well the teams follow SE practices as judged by their mentor, and finally the client&#8217;s satisfaction with the product.  Individual grades within a team will be influenced by peer reviews, individual reflection documents, mentor impressions, and presentation performance.  Students will leave the course with a firsthand understanding of the software engineering realities that drive SE practices.  They will have concrete experience with these practices, and will have engaged in active reflection on this experience.  They will have teamwork, process, and product skills to support immediate competency in a software engineering organization, along with a deeper understanding that prepares them to evaluate the new processes and techniques they will encounter in the workplace.', '15-313', None), '15-414': Course('Bug Catching: Automated Program Verification and Testing', '15-414', 9, 'Many CS and ECE students will be developing software and hardware that must be ultra reliable at some point in their careers. Logical errors in such designs can be costly, even life threatening. There have already been a number of well publicized errors like the Intel Pentium floating point error and the Arian 5 crash. In this course we will study tools for finding and preventing logical errors. Three types of tools will be studied: automated theorem proving, state exploration techniques like model checking and tools based on static program analysis. Although students will learn the theoretical basis for such tools, the emphasis will be on actually using them on real examples.  This course can be used to satisfy the Logic &amp; Languages requirement for the Computer Science major.', '(15-122 or 15-211) and 15-251', None), '15-415': Course('Database Applications', '15-415', 12, 'This course covers the fundamental topics for Database Management  Systems: Database System Architectural Principles (ACID properties; data abstraction; external, conceptual, and internal schemata; data  independence; data definition and data manipulation languages), Data  models (entity-relationship and relational data models; data  structures, integrity constraints, and operations for each data  model; relational query languages: SQL, algebra, calculus), Theory of  database design (functional dependencies; normal forms; dependency  preservation; information loss), Query Optimization (equivalence of  expressions, algebraic manipulation; optimization of selections and  joins), Storage Strategies (indices, B-trees, hashing), Query Processing (execution of sort, join, and aggregation operators), and Transaction Processing (recovery and concurrency control).', '15-210 or (15-211 and 15-213)', None), '15-323': Course('Computer Music Systems and Information Processing', '15-323', 9, 'This course presents concepts and techniques for representing and manipulating discrete music information, both in real time and off line. Representations of music as explicitly timed event sequences will be introduced, and students will learn how to build efficient run-time systems for event scheduling, tempo control, and interactive processing. The MIDI protocol is used to capture real-time performance information and to generate sound. The course will also cover non-real-time processing of music data, including Markov models, style recognition, computer accompaniment, query-by-humming, and algorithmic composition. This course is independent of, and complementary to 15-322, Introduction to Computer Music, which focuses on sound synthesis and signal processing.', '15-122', None), '15-491': Course('Special Topic: CMRoboBits: Creating Intelligent Robots', '15-491', 12, 'Creating intelligent robots can be viewed as the integration of many pieces - "bits" - "RoboBits". This course will teach students such "RoboBits" for creating both single and groups of intelligent robots, with perception, cognition, and action. Students in the course work with real functional mobile robots, equipped with RGB and RGB+D cameras, different types of actuation, namely wheeled and legged robots, and computation onboard. Students learn effective vision processing algorithms for object recognition, motion modeling and planning, robot localization and planning algorithms, and multi-robot communication for shared sensing and teamwork.  We will further study cognitive architectures, learning, and human-robot interaction. 15-491 is a PROJECT-BASED course, which runs in the CORAL research lab in GHC 3201. The course has three major projects with specific tasks that incrementally lead to the research and development of complete intelligent robots. The projects are decomposed in weekly tasks. The class meets twice a week, and the students have access to the lab for further work as needed. Evaluation is based on class participation, weekly progress, and project reports, presentations, and outcomes.', '15-122', None), '15-492': Course('Special Topic: Speech Processing', '15-492', 12, 'Speech Processing offers a practical and theoretical understanding of how human speech can be processed by computers. It covers speech recognition, speech synthesis and spoken dialog systems. The course involves practicals where the student will build working speech recognition systems, build their own synthetic voice and build a complete telephone spoken dialog system. This work will be based on existing toolkits. Details of algorithms, techniques and limitations of state of the art speech systems will also be presented. This course is designed for students wishing understand how to process real data for real applications, applying statistical and machine learning techniques as well as working with limitations in the technology.', '15-122', None), '15-494': Course('Special Topic: Cognitive Robotics', '15-494', 12, 'Cognitive robotics is a new approach to robot programming based on   high level primitives for perception and action. These primitives draw   inspiration from ideas in cognitive science combined with state of the   art robotics algorithms. Students will experiment with these   primitives and help develop new ones using the Tekkotsu software   framework on the Calliope robot, which includes a 5 degree-of-freedom   arm with gripper, a Kinect camera on a pan/tilt mount, and Ubuntu   Linux on a dual-core on-board netbook. Prior robotics experience is   not necessary, but strong programming skills are required.', '15-214', None), '15-453': Course('Formal Languages, Automata, and Computability', '15-453', 9, 'An introduction to the fundamental ideas and models underlying computing: finite automata, regular sets, pushdown automata, context-free grammars, Turing machines, undecidability, and complexity theory.', '21-228 or 15-251', None), '15-463': Course('Computational Photography', '15-463', 12, 'Computational Photography is an emerging new field created by the convergence of computer graphics, computer vision and photography. Its role is to overcome the limitations of the traditional camera by using computational techniques to produce a richer, more vivid, perhaps more perceptually meaningful representation of our visual world.  The aim of this advanced undergraduate course is to study ways in which samples from the real world (images and video) can be used to generate compelling computer graphics imagery. We will learn how to acquire, represent, and render scenes from digitized photographs. Several popular image-based algorithms will be presented, with an emphasis on using these techniques to build practical systems. This hands-on emphasis will be reflected in the programming assignments, in which students will have the opportunity to acquire their own images of indoor and outdoor scenes and develop the image analysis and synthesis tools needed to render and view the scenes on the computer.', '15-213 and (21-241 or 18-202)', None), '15-424': Course('Special Topic: Foundations of Cyber-Physical Systems', '15-424', 12, 'Cyber-physical systems (CPSs) combine cyber effects (computation and/or communication) with physical effects (motion or other physical processes). Designing algorithms to control CPSs, such as those in cars, aircraft and robots, is challenging due to their tight coupling with physical behavior. At the same time, it is vital that these algorithms be correct, since we rely on CPSs for safety-critical tasks like keeping aircraft from colliding.  Students in this course will understand the core principles behind CPSs, develop models and controls, identify safety specifications and critical properties of CPSs, understand abstraction and system architectures, learn how to design by invariant, reason rigorously about CPS models, verify CPS models of appropriate scale, understand the semantics of a CPS model and develop an intuition for operational effects. Students will write hybrid programs (HPs), which capture relevant dynamical aspects of CPSs in a simple programming language with a simple semantics, allowing the programmer to refer to real-valued variables representing real quantities and specify their dynamics as part of the HP.', '15-122 and 15-251 and 21-122', None), '15-317': Course('Constructive Logic', '15-317', 9, 'This multidisciplinary junior-level course is designed to provide a thorough introduction to modern constructive logic, its roots in philosophy, its numerous applications in computer science, and its mathematical properties. Some of the topics to be covered are intuitionistic logic, inductive definitions, functional programming, type theory, realizability, connections between classical and constructive logic, decidable classes. This course counts as a Fundamentals course in the Computer Science major.', '15-210', None), '15-213': Course('Introduction to Computer Systems', '15-213', 12, "This course provides a programmer's view of how computer systems execute programs, store information, and communicate. It enables students to become more effective programmers, especially in dealing with issues of performance, portability and robustness. It also serves as a foundation for courses on compilers, networks, operating systems, and computer architecture, where a deeper understanding of systems-level issues is required. Topics covered include: machine-level code and its generation by optimizing compilers, performance evaluation and optimization, computer arithmetic, memory organization and management, networking technology and protocols, and supporting concurrent computation.  NOTE: students must achieve a C or better in order to use this course to satisfy the pre-requisite for any subsequent Computer Science course.", '15-122', None), '15-210': Course('Parallel and Sequential Data Structures and Algorithms', '15-210', 12, 'Teaches students about how to design, analyze, and program algorithms and data structures.  The course emphasizes parallel algorithms and analysis, and how sequential algorithms can be considered a special case.  The course goes into more theoretical content on algorithm analysis than 15-122 and 15-150 while still including a significant programming component and covering a variety of practical applications such as problems in data analysis, graphics, text processing, and the computational sciences.  NOTE: students must achieve a C or better in order to use  this course to satisfy the pre-requisite for any subsequent Computer  Science course.', '15-150 and 15-122', None), '15-211': Course('Fundamental Data Structures and Algorithms', '15-211', 12, 'Fundamental programming concepts are presented together with supporting theoretical foundations and practical applications. This course emphasizes the practical application of techniques for writing and analyzing programs: data abstraction, program verification, and performance analysis. These techniques are applied in the design and analysis of fundamental algorithms and data structures. The course is currently taught in Java.  NOTE: students must achieve a C or better in order to use this course to satisfy the pre-requisite for any subsequent Computer Science course.', '21-127 and 15-121', None), '15-313': Course('Foundations of Software Engineering', '15-313', 12, 'Students gain exposure to the fundamentals of modern software engineering.  This includes both core CS technical knowledge and the means by which this knowledge can be applied in the practical engineering of complex software.  Topics related to software artifacts include design models, patterns, coding, static and dynamic analysis, testing and inspection, measurement, and software architecture and frameworks.  Topics related to software process include modeling, requirements engineering, process models and evaluation, team development, and supply chain issues including outsourcing and open source.  This course has a strong technical focus, and will include both written and programming assignments.  Students will get experience with modern software engineering tools.', '15-214', None), '15-312': Course('Foundations of Programming Languages', '15-312', 12, 'This course discusses in depth many of the concepts underlying the design, definition, implementation, and use of modern programming languages. Formal approaches to defining the syntax and semantics are used to describe the fundamental concepts underlying programming languages. A variety of programming paradigms are covered such as imperative, functional, logic, and concurrent programming. In addition to the formal studies, experience with programming in the languages is used to illustrate how different design goals can lead to radically different languages and models of computation.', '15-210 and 15-251', None), '15-214': Course('Principles of Software Construction: Objects, Design, and Concurrency', '15-214', 12, 'Software engineers today are less likely to design data structures and algorithms from scratch and more likely to build systems from library and framework components. In this course, students engage with concepts related to the construction of software systems at scale, building on their understanding of the basic building blocks of data structures, algorithms, program structures, and computer structures. The course covers technical topics in four areas: (1) concepts of design for complex systems, (2) object oriented programming, (3) static and dynamic analysis for programs, and (4) concurrent and distributed software. Student assignments involve engagement with complex software such as distributed massively multi-player game systems and frameworks for graphical user interaction.', '(15-121 or 15-122) and 21-127', None), '15-237': Course('Special Topic: Cross-Platform Mobile Web Apps', '15-237', 12, 'An introduction to writing cross-platform mobile web apps.  Using a tool chain based on HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, and a variety of supporting frameworks, we will write apps that are effectively designed both for desktop and mobile browsers, and which can be converted into native apps for Android, iOS, and Windows Phone 7 devices.  Additional topics will include designing user interfaces for mobile devices, accessing mobile device API&#8217;s (such as accelerometer, GPS, compass, or camera), and power management issues.  While this course focuses on browser-side technologies, we will briefly explore JavaScript-based server-side technologies (though students should consider 15-437 for extensive treatment of server-side topics).  Note that we will not be writing native apps in Objective-C for iOS nor in Java for Android, though we may include some brief exposure to these technologies near the end of the course.', '15-112', None), '15-090': Course('Computer Science Practicum', '15-090', 3, "This course is for international students who are interested in working for Curricular Practical Training (CPT). Such students interested in CPT must first be authorized by the Office of International Education before being able to enroll in the Practicum course. More information on CPT is available on OIE's Foreign Student Employment page and at the CS Undergraduate Office.", '', None), '15-319': Course('Cloud Computing', '15-319', 9, 'This on-line course gives students an overview of the field of Cloud Computing, its enabling technologies, main building blocks, and hands-on experience through 4 projects utilizing a public cloud (Amazon Web Services). Cloud computing services are being adopted widely across a variety of organizations and in many domains. Simply, cloud computing is the delivery of computing as a service over a network, whereby distributed resources are rented, rather than owned, by an end user as a utility. The course will introduce this domain and cover the topics of data centers, resource management, cloud storage, and programming models. As an introduction, we will discuss the motivating factors, benefits, challenges, and service models. Modern data centers enable many of the economic and technological benefits of the cloud paradigm; hence, we will describe several concepts behind data center design and management. Next, we will focus on existing approaches for resource management including resource abstraction, sharing and virtualization technologies.  Students will learn about different cloud storage concepts including data distribution, durability, consistency and redundancy. HDFS, PVFS, HBase, Cassandra and S3 will be presented as examples of underlying distributed file systems. Students will understand the details of the MapReduce programming model and gain a broad overview of alternative programming models such as Pregel, and GraphLab. Students will work with a public cloud service (such as Amazon Web Services), use it to rent and provision compute resources and then program and deploy applications that run on these resources. Students will work with cloud storage systems and learn to develop applications in the MapReduce programming paradigm.', '15-213', None), '15-354': Course('Computational Discrete Mathematics', '15-354', 12, 'This course is about the computational aspects of some of the standard concepts of discrete mathematics (relations, functions, logic, graphs, algebra, automata), with emphasis on efficient algorithms.  We begin with a brief introduction to computability and computational complexity. Other topics include: iteration, orbits and fixed points, order and equivalence relations, propositional logic and satisfiability testing, finite fields and shift register sequences, finite state machines, and cellular automata.  Computational support for some of the material is available in the form of a Mathematica package.', '15-251', None), '15-131': Course('Great Practical Ideas for Computer Scientists', '15-131', 2, 'THIS COURSE IS OPEN TO CS FRESHMAN ONLY. Throughout your education as a Computer Scientist at Carnegie Mellon, you will take courses on programming, theoretical ideas, logic, systems, etc. As you progress, you will be expected to pick up the so-called "tools of the trade." This course is intended to help you learn what you need to know in a friendly, low-stress, high-support way. We will discuss UNIX, LaTeX, debugging and many other essential tools. Laptop required. (Laptops will be available for those without their own laptops.).', '', None), '15-462': Course('Computer Graphics', '15-462', 12, 'This course provides a comprehensive introduction to computer graphics modeling, animation, and rendering. Topics covered include basic image processing, geometric transformations, geometric modeling of curves and surfaces, animation, 3-D viewing, visibility algorithms, shading, and ray tracing.', '(21-259 and 15-213 and 21-241) or (15-213 and 18-202)', None), '15-417': Course('HOT Compilation', '15-417', 12, 'The course covers the implementation of compilers for higher-order, typed languages such as ML and Haskell, and gives an introduction to type-preserving compilation.  Topics covered include type inference, elaboration, CPS conversion, closure conversion, garbage collection, phase splitting, and typed assembly language.', '15-312 or 15-317', None), '15-355': Course('Modern Computer Algebra', '15-355', 9, 'The goal of this course is to investigate the relationship between algebra and computation. The course is designed to expose students to algorithms used for symbolic computation, as well as to the concepts from modern algebra which are applied to the development of these algorithms. This course provides a hands-on introduction to many of the most important ideas used in symbolic mathematical computation, which involves solving system of polynomial equations (via Groebner bases), analytic integration, and solving linear difference equations. Throughout the course the computer algebra system Mathematica will be used for computation.', '15-251', None), '15-466': Course('Computer Game Programming', '15-466', 12, 'The goal of the course is two-fold. The first goal is to teach students some of the higher-level techniques that are necessary to implement interesting computer games. In particular, a large emphasis will be on game AI. The class will also cover such topics as game networking, scheduling of tasks in computationally intensive games, and game design. The class will also briefly cover few selected topics such as collision detection and physically-based animation that are good to know even if one is developing games using a game engine. The second goal of the class is to get students familiar with programming games on various platforms using state-of-the-art game engines. To this end, the course will have a heavy programming focus. It will have a number of projects requiring students to apply the learned material to develop games using Unity 3D game engine. The students will develop games that run on a standalone PC, games that run on an Android platform and games that work in a multi-user mode. In addition to learning the material and learning how to use game engines, the projects will provide students with portfolios of games they have developed. Such a portfolio is important in getting a job in game industry.  Prerequisite is 15-462 or contact the instructor for permission.', '15-462', None), '15-441': Course('Computer Networks', '15-441', 12, 'The emphasis in this course will be on the basic performance and engineering trade-offs in the design and implementation of computer networks. To make the issues more concrete, the class includes several multi-week projects requiring significant design and implementation.  The goal is for students to learn not only what computer networks are and how they work today, but also why they are designed the way they are and how they are likely to evolve in the future. We will draw examples primarily from the Internet. Topics to be covered include: network architecture, routing, congestion/flow/error control, naming and addressing, peer-to-peer and the web, internetworking, and network security.', '15-213', None), '15-440': Course('Distributed Systems', '15-440', 12, 'The goals of this course are twofold: First, for students to gain an understanding of the principles and techniques behind the design of distributed systems, such as locking, concurrency, scheduling, and communication across the network. Second, for students to gain practical experience designing, implementing, and debugging real distributed systems.  The major themes this course will teach include scarcity, scheduling, concurrency and concurrent programming, naming, abstraction and modularity, imperfect communication and other types of failure, protection from accidental and malicious harm, optimism, and the use of instrumentation and monitoring and debugging tools in problem solving. As the creation and management of software systems is a fundamental goal of any undergraduate systems course, students will design, implement, and debug large programming projects.   As a consequence, competency in both the C and Java programming languages is required.', '15-213', None), '15-251': Course('Great Theoretical Ideas in Computer Science', '15-251', 12, 'This course is about how to use theoretical ideas to formulate and solve problems in computer science. It integrates mathematical material with general problem solving techniques and computer science applications. Examples are drawn from Algorithms, Complexity Theory, Game Theory, Probability Theory, Graph Theory, Automata Theory, Algebra, Cryptography, and Combinatorics. Assignments involve both mathematical proofs and programming.  NOTE: students must achieve a C or better in order to use this course to satisfy the pre-requisite for any subsequent Computer Science course.', '15-112 and 21-127', None), '15-050': Course('Study Abroad', '15-050', None, "Students who are interested in studying abroad should first contact the Office of International Education. More information on Study Abroad is available on OIE's Study Abroad page and at the CS Undergraduate Office.", '', None), '15-075': Course('Computer Science Co-Op', '15-075', None, 'Students who are interested in a Co-Op experience with an external employer typically do so in their Junior year. A Co-Op is distinguished from a summer internship in that it encompasses a summer and a contiguous semester, either Spring-Summer or Summer-Fall. A list of companies who are interested in hiring Co-Op students is available from the SCS Career Consultant at the Career Center. More information on the Computer Science Co-Op program is available at the CS Undergraduate Office.', '', None), '15-150': Course('Principles of Functional Programming', '15-150', 10, 'An introduction to programming based on a "functional" model of computation.  The functional model is a natural generalization of algebra in which programs are formulas that describe the output of a computation in terms of its inputs&#8212;-that is, as a function.  But instead of being confined to real- or complex-valued functions, the functional model extends the algebraic view to a very rich class of data types, including not only aggregates built up from other types, but also functions themselves as values.  This course is an introduction to programming that is focused on the central concepts of function and type.  One major theme is the interplay between inductive types, which are built up incrementally; recursive functions, which compute over inductive types by decomposition; and proof by structural induction, which is used to prove the correctness and time complexity of a recursive function.  Another major theme is the role of types in structuring large programs into separate modules, and the integration of imperative programming through the introduction of data types whose values may be altered during computation.  NOTE: students must achieve a C or better in order to use  this course to satisfy the pre-requisite for any subsequent Computer  Science course.', '21-127 and 15-112', None), '15-110': Course('Principles of Computing', '15-110', 10, 'A course in fundamental computing principles for students with minimal or no computing background. Programming constructs: sequencing, selection, iteration, and recursion. Data organization: arrays and lists. Use of abstraction in computing: data representation, computer organization, computer networks, functional decomposition, and application programming interfaces. Use of computational principles in problem-solving: divide and conquer, randomness, and concurrency. Classification of computational problems based on complexity, non-computable functions, and using heuristics to find reasonable solutions to complex problems. Social, ethical and legal issues associated with the development of new computational artifacts will also be discussed.', '', None), '15-112': Course('Fundamentals of Programming and Computer Science', '15-112', 12, 'A technical introduction to the fundamentals of programming with an emphasis on producing clear, robust, and reasonably efficient code using top-down design, informal analysis, and effective testing and debugging. Starting from first principles, we will cover a large subset of the Python programming language, including its standard libraries and programming paradigms.  We will also target numerous deployment scenarios, including standalone programs, shell scripts, and web-based applications. This course assumes no prior programming experience. Even so, it is a fast-paced and rigorous preparation for 15-122.  Students seeking a more gentle introduction to computer science should consider first taking 15-110.  NOTE: students must achieve a C or better in order to use  this course to satisfy the pre-requisite for any subsequent Computer  Science course.', '', None), '15-421': Course('Information Security and Privacy', '15-421', 12, 'The objective of this course is to introduce students to the technologies of Web Commerce, Security and Privacy as well as to related business, policy and usability issues. Content: Over the past 15 years, the Web has become an integral part of our daily life, whether at home or at work. This course provides students with an overview of the technologies and practices associated with Web Security, Privacy and Commerce. In the process, students will learn what it takes to design and develop successful web applications and services, reconciling security, privacy, usability and business considerations. The course is organized around two parts: Part I - Web Security &amp; Privacy Technologies The big picture, gentle introduction to cryptography, digital signatures, key management, authentication, Internet security protocols, certificates &amp; PKI, decentralized trust management, privacy enhancing technologies, electronic payments. Part II - Web Commerce The big picture, Internet marketing &amp; personalization, search engines, B2B and electronic markets, P2P, Web 2.0, Mobile Commerce, social networking. Format: Lectures (including guest lectures), discussions, student presentations, and class projects. Prerequisites: 15122 or 15211', '15122 or 1521', None), '15-392': Course('Special Topic: Secure Programming', '15-392', 9, 'This course provides a detailed explanation of common programming errors in C and C++ and describes how these errors can lead to software systems that are vulnerable to exploitation. The course concentrates on security issues intrinsic to the C and C++ programming languages and associated libraries. It does not emphasize security issues involving interactions with external systems such as databases and web servers, as these are rich topics on their own. Topics to be covered include the secure and insecure use of integers, arrays, strings, dynamic memory, formatted input/output functions, and file I/O.', '15-213', None), '15-295': Course('Competition Programming and Problem Solving', '15-295', 6, 'Each year, Carnegie Mellon fields two teams for participation in the ACM-ICPC Regional Programming Contest. During many recent years, one of those teams has earned the right to represent Carnegie Mellon at the ACM-ICPC World Finals.  This course is a vehicle for those who consistently and rigorously train in preparation for the contests to earn course credit for their effort and achievement.  Preparation involves the study of algorithms, the practice of programming and debugging, the development of test sets, and the growth of team, communication, and problem solving skills.  Neither the course grade nor the number of units earned are dependent on ranking in any contest.  Students are not required to earn course credit to participate in practices or to compete in ACM-ICPC events.  Consistent, disciplined participation in team practices and associated individual preparation earns three (3) units of credit.  Six (6) units of credit are possible for those who routinely complete significant homework and/or teamwork assignments outside of normal group meetings.  Students interested in the course should attend during the first week of classes to discuss enrollment details.', '15-122', None), '15-411': Course('Compiler Design', '15-411', 12, 'This course covers the design and implementation of compiler and run-time systems for high-level languages, and examines the interaction between language design, compiler design, and run-time organization. Topics covered include syntactic and lexical analysis, handling of user-defined types and type-checking, context analysis, code generation and optimization, and memory management and run-time organization.', '15-213 or 15-312', None), '15-486': Course('Artificial Neural Networks', '15-486', 12, 'Artificial neural networks combine ideas from machine learning, statistics, and pattern recognition.  They draw inspiration from, and provide simplified formalizations of, theories about the workings of the brain.  This course offers an introduction to neural networks for computer scientists and engineers.  Prerequisites are undergraduate calculus and linear algebra, and solid programming skills.  An undergraduate course in artificial intelligence or machine learning would provide helpful background but is not required.  The course provides hands-on experience with a variety of neural network architectures implemented in MATLAB, and an in-depth look at problems in pattern recognition and knowledge representation.  Topics covered include perceptrons, the LMS learning rule, fundamentals of pattern recognition, backpropagation learning, forward and inverse models in control theory, competitive learning, self-organizing feature maps, radial basis functions, the EM algorithm, Hopfield networks, Boltzmann machines, Helmholtz machines, and general recurrent networks.', '18-202 or 21-241', None), '15-465': Course('Animation Art and Technology', '15-465', 12, 'Animation Art and Technology is an interdisciplinary course cross-listed between Art and Computer Science. Faculty and teaching assistants from computer science and art teach the class as a team. It is a project-based course in which four to five interdisciplinary teams of students produce animations. Most of the animations have a substantive technical component and the students are challenged to consider innovation with content to be equal with the technical. The class includes basic tutorials for work in Maya leading toward more advanced applications and extensions of the software such as motion capture and algorithms for animating cloth, hair, particles, and grouping behaviors. The first class will meet in CFA room 303.', '15-462', None), '15-464': Course('Technical Animation', '15-464', 12, 'This course introduces techniques for computer animation such as keyframing, procedural methods, motion capture, and simulation. The course also includes a brief overview of story-boarding, scene composition, lighting and sound track generation. The second half of the course will explore current research topics in computer animation such as dynamic simulation of flexible and rigid objects,automatically generated control systems, and evolution of behaviors. The course should be appropriate for graduate students in all areas and for advanced undergraduates.', '15-462', None), '21-127': Course('Concepts of Mathematics', '21-127', 10, 'This course introduces the basic concepts, ideas and tools involved in doing mathematics. As such, its main focus is on presenting informal logic, and the methods of mathematical proof. These subjects are closely related to the application of mathematics in many areas, particularly computer science. Topics discussed include a basic introduction to elementary number theory, induction, the algebra of sets, relations, equivalence relations, congruences, partitions, and functions, including injections, surjections, and bijections.  A prerequisite for 15-211. 3 hrs. lec., 2 hrs. rec.', '', None), '18-200': Course('Emerging Trends in Electrical and Computer Engineering', '18-200', 1, 'This class consists of a series of individual lectures given by different faculty members and distinguished alumni. The lectures are designed to serve the following purposes: 1) provide students a good understanding of our curriculum structure and the courses in each of our five principle subject areas; 2) introduce to students the emerging trends in electrical and computer engineering and the relevance of our courses; 3) present to students our faculty&#8217;s research fields; 4) discuss basic learning and working ethics; 5) prepare students career-making skills;  6) introduce new undergraduate courses and  research opportunities. The class will contain 12 lectures from faculty members, 2 lectures on learning and working ethics, and 2 lectures from our alumni. Students are required to attend each lecture. An award for the best lecturer, selected by students, will be given at the end of the semester. 1 credit, 1 hr per week, pass/fail, required to graduate. Sophomore standing required.', '18-100', None), '18-345': Course('Introduction to Telecommunication Networks', '18-345', 12, 'This course introduces the fundamental concepts of telecommunication networks. Underlying engineering principles of telephone networks, computer networks and integrated digital networks are discussed. Topics in the course include: telephone and data networks overview; OSI layers; data link protocol; flow control, congestion control, routing; local area networks; transport layer; introduction to high-speed networks; performance evaluation techniques. The course also reviews important aspects of network security and widely used classes of Internet application and services, such as peer-to-peer, content delivery networks, and video streaming.', '(36-217 or 36-212 or 36-226) and 18-213', None), '18-202': Course('Mathematical Foundations of Electrical Engineering', '18-202', 12, "This course covers topics from engineering mathematics that serve as foundations for descriptions of electrical engineering devices and systems. It is the corequisite mathematics course for 18-220, Fundamentals of Electrical Engineering. The topics include: (1) MATLAB as a robust computational tool, used to reinforce, enrich and integrate ideas throughout the course, including software exercises and projects in combination with homework assignments, (2) Complex Analysis, including rectangular and polar representations in the complex plane with associated forms of complex arithmetic, powers, roots and complex logarithms, complex differentiation, analytic functions and Cauchy-Riemann equations, complex Taylor series, complex exponential, sinusoidal and hyperbolic functions, and Euler's formula, (3) Fourier Analysis, including orthogonality of sinusoids, trigonometric and exponential forms of Fourier series, Fourier integrals and Fourier transforms, (4) Linear, Constant-Coefficient Differential Equations, including complex exponential solutions to homogeneous equations and particular solutions with polynomial and sinusoidal driving functions described by phasors, (5) Difference Equations, with emphasis upon their relationship to differential equations, and (6) Linear Algebra and Matrices, including matrix arithmetic, linear systems of equations and Gaussian elimination, vector spaces and rank of matrices, matrix inverses and determinants, eigenvalue problems and their relationship to systems of homogeneous differential equations. 4 hrs. lec., 1hr. rec.", '21-122', None), '18-341': Course('Logic Design Using Simulation, Synthesis, and Verification Techniques', '18-341', 12, 'This course is a second level logic design course, studying the techniques of designing at the register-transfer and logic levels of complex digital systems using modern simulation, synthesis, and verification tools. Topics will include register-transfer level systems (i.e., finite state machines and datapaths), bus and communication system interfacing (such as a simplified USB), asynchronous state machines, discrete-event simulation, debugging and testbench strategies, and assertion-based verification. Design examples will be drawn from bus and communication interfaces, and computation systems, emphasizing how these systems are designed and debugged, and how their functionality can be verified. A modern hardware description language, SystemVerilog, will serve as the basis for uniting these topics. Quizzes, homeworks and design projects will serve to exercise these topics.  3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.  Prerequisite: 18-240', '18-24', None), '18-340': Course('Digital Computation', '18-340', 12, 'In this course we will explore the techniques for designing high-performance digital circuits for computation along with methods for evaluating their properties. We begin by quickly reviewing number systems and digital arithmetic along with basic arithmetic circuits such as ripple-carry adders. We then focus on formal techniques and theory for analyzing the functionality, timing, power consumption, and chip area properties of these basic circuits and ones yet to be presented. From there, we move to more complex adders (carry-lookahead, carry-skip, carry_bypass, Wallace trees, and hybrid techniques) and multipliers (sequential, array, Booth, and others) along with various divider circuits. Floating point units are then built upon the concepts introduced for adder, multipliers, and dividers. Finally, we will investigate the design and implementation of digital filter circuits. For each circuit introduced, we will develop techniques for evaluating their functionality, their speed, power consumption, and silicon area requirements. In addition, we will utilize various CAD tools to design and evaluate most of the computation circuits discussed. After successful completion of the course, students will not only have an understanding of complex computation circuits, but subtle concepts that include hazards, metastability, false paths, inertial delay, sticky bits, clock skew/jitter, dynamic and static sensitization, and many others. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '18-240', None), '18-220': Course('Electronic Devices and Analog Circuits', '18-220', 12, 'This course covers fundamental topics that are common to a wide variety of electrical engineering devices and systems. The topics include an introduction to semiconductor devices and technology, DC circuit analysis techniques, operational amplifiers, energy storage elements, sinusoidal steady-state response, frequency domain analysis, filters, and transient response of first- and second-order systems. The laboratories allow students to use modern electronic instrumentation and to build and operate circuits that address specific concepts covered in the lectures, including semiconductor devices and sensors, layout, operational amplifiers, filters, signal detection and processing, power converters and circuit transients.  3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec., 3 hrs. lab.', '18-100', '18-202 and 33-107'), '18-342': Course('Fundamentals of Embedded Systems', '18-342', 12, 'This practical, hands-on course introduces students to the basic building-blocks and the underlying scientific principles of embedded systems. The course covers both the hardware and software aspects of embedded procesor architectures, along with operating system fundamentals, such as virtual memory, concurrency, task scheduling and synchronization. Through a series of laboratory projects involving state-of-the-art processors, students will learn to understand implementation details and to write assembly-language and C programs that implement core embedded OS functionality, and that control/debug features such as timers, interrupts, serial communications, flash memory, device drivers and other components used in typical embedded applications. Relevant topics, such as optimization, profiling, digital signal processing, feedback control, real-time operating systems and embedded middleware, will also be discussed.  This course is intended for INI students.   Anti-requisites:  18348 or 18349', '18-240', None), '18-300': Course('Fundamentals of Electromagnetics', '18-300', 12, 'This course introduces electromagnetic principles and describes ways in which those principles are applied in engineering devices and systems. Topics include: vector calculus as a mathematical foundation for field descriptions, Maxwell&#8217;s equations in integral and differential forms with associated boundary conditions as descriptions of all electromagnetic principles, quasistatic electric fields in free space and in materials, superposition for known charge sources, conduction and polarization, resistance and capacitance, charge relaxation, analytic and numerical methods for electric field boundary value problems, quasistatic magnetic fields in free space and in materials, superposition for known current sources, magnetization, inductance, magnetic diffusion, and analytic and numerical methods for magnetic field boundary value problems. 4 hrs. lec.', '18-220', None), '18-496': Course('Introduction to Biomedical Imaging and Image Analysis', '18-496', 12, 'Bioimage Informatics (formerly Bioimaging)  This course gives an overview of tools and tasks in various biological and biomedical imaging modalities, such as fluorescence microscopy, electron microscopy, magnetic resonance imaging, ultrasound and others. The major focus will be on automating and solving the fundamental tasks required for interpreting these images, including (but not restricted to) deconvolution, registration, segmentation, pattern recognition, and modeling, as well as tools needed to solve those tasks (such as Fourier and wavelet methods). The discussion of these topics will draw on approaches from many fields, including statistics, signal processing, and machine learning. As part of the course, students will be expected to complete an independent project.', '18-290', None), '18-349': Course('Embedded Real-Time Systems', '18-349', 12, 'This practical, hands-on course introduces the various building blocks and underlying scientific and engineering principles behind embedded real-time systems. The course covers the integrated hardware and software aspects of embedded processor architectures, along with advanced topics such as real-time, resource/device and memory management. Students can expect to learn how to program with the embedded architecture that is ubiquitous in cell-phones, portable gaming devices, robots, PDAs, etc. Students will then go on to learn and apply real-time principles that are used to drive critical embedded systems like automobiles, avionics, medical equipment, the Mars rover, etc.   Topics covered include embedded architectures (building up to modern 16/32/64-bit embedded processors); interaction with devices (buses, memory architectures, memory management, device drivers); concurrency (software and hardware interrupts, timers); real-time principles (multi-tasking, scheduling, synchronization); implementation trade-offs, profiling and code optimization (for performance and memory); embedded software (exception handling, loading, mode-switching, programming embedded systems). Through a series of laboratory exercises with state-of-the-art embedded processors and industry-strength development tools, students will acquire skills in the design/implementation/debugging of core embedded real-time functionality.  Anti-requisites:  18342 or 18348', '18-240 and 18-213', None), '18-348': Course('Embedded Systems Engineering', '18-348', 12, 'Embedded computing applications far outnumber desktop computers, with billions of microcontrollers produced worldwide each year. Embedded systems vary tremendously, from the single 8-bit processor in a thermostat, to high performance processors in a digital camera, to dozens of networked processors in an automobile. Despite this diversity of applications, there are core technology and system-level skills needed by any embedded system designer that form the content of this course. The emphasis of this course will be at the system layer where hardware meets software, with plenty of hands-on experience at "bare metal" programming. Topics typically covered include embedded computing platforms (hardware, microcontroller instruction sets, software in both assembly language and C); interacting with the external world (analog I/O, digital I/O, serial ports, filtering, control, embedded networks); system-level engineering (design cycle, architectural patterns, peer reviews); real-time operation (timers, interrupts, concurrency, task switching, writing a simple RTOS kernel, scheduling); constraints and optimization (economics, power, performance); and a survey of techniques important for building systems that work in the real world (debug, test, robust design, dependability, safety, ethical/societal issues). Weekly hands-on hardware and software experiences with a 16-bit microcontroller module will tie directly to lectures to reinforce core skills.  4 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec., 3 hrs. lab.  Anti-requisites:  18342 or 18349', '18-240 and 18-213', None), '18-493': Course('Electroacoustics', '18-493', 12, 'This course provides an introduction to physical, engineering, and architectural acoustics.  The course begins with a review of the wave equation and some of its solutions that are relevant to the propagation of sound from planar and spherical sources, and from arrays of simple sources.  Lumped-parameter electrical circuit analogies are developed to describe mechanical and acoustical systems, leading to a discussion of the constraints and tradeoffs involved in the design of loudspeakers, microphones, and other transducers.  The characteristics of sound in regular and irregular enclosures will be developed and discussed in the context of the acoustical design for rooms and auditoriums.  The interaction of sound and man is also discussed, with introductory lectures on auditory perception and the acoustics of speech production, with applications in the areas of efficient perceptually-based coding of music and speech, and virtual acoustical environments.', '18-290 and 18-220', None), '18-415': Course("From Design to the Market for Deep Submicron IC's", '18-415', 12, 'The general objective of the 18-415 class is to introduce and analyze all major design-dependent trade-offs which decide about the IC product commercial success. This objective will be achieved via playing in the class an "imaginary fabless IC design house startup game"- a main class activity. In this game students will be asked to construct "business plans" for a startup fabless IC design house. Each team in the class will have to envision, as an IC design objective, a new product with a functionality, which is already provided by another existing IC product (i.e. by microprocessor). The envisioned product should provide a subset of functionality of the existing product but it should be "better" in some other respect (e.g. it could be less expensive to fabricate, faster etc.).  To handle the above assignment, students in the class will be using skills learned in 18-322 as well as all legal sources of "industrial intelligence" typically available for the IC industry. They can also use the class teacher as a source of free consulting, as well as, they can ask for any sequence of lectures or literature sources which they will need to meet the class objectives.', '18-320', None), '18-499': Course('Internship', '18-499', 3, "The Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Carnegie Mellon considers experiential learning opportunities important educational options for its undergraduate students.  One such option is an internship, normally completed during the summer.  Students do not need to officially register for an internship unless they want it listed on their official transcripts.  ECE students interested in registering their internship for course credit on their transcript may request to be enrolled in this course.  The ECE Undergraduate Office will add the course to the student's schedule, and the student will be assessed tuition for 3 units.  This process should be used by international students interested in Curricular Practical Training (CPT) or by any other engineering undergraduate wishing to have their internship experience reflected on their official University transcript.   International students should also be authorized by the Office of International Education (OIE). More information regarding CPT is available on OIE's website.", '', None), '18-411': Course('Computational Techniques in Engineering', '18-411', 12, 'This course develops the methods to formulate basic engineering problems in a way that makes them amenable to computational/numerical analysis.  The course will consist of three main modules:  basic programming skills, discretization of ordinary and partial differential equations, and numerical methods.  These modules are followed by two modules taken from a larger list: Monte Carlo-based methods, molecular dynamics methods, image analysis methods, and so on.  Students will learn how to work with numerical libraries and how to compile and execute scientific code written in Fortran-90 and C++.  Students will be required to work on a course project in which aspects from at least two course modules must be integrated.', '21-122 and 21-259 and 21-260 and 15-100 and 21-120', None), '18-410': Course('Physical Sensors, Transducers and Instrumentation', '18-410', 12, 'While modern electronic circuits have become largely digital, the physical world, and consequently, the electronic interface to the physical world remains fundamentally analog. Therefore, sensors, transducers, and the initial signal processing remain in the analog domain.  Simultaneously, the commercial market place optimizes sensor technology based upon multiple attributes including cost, detectivity, size, speed, etc.  In this course we explore both the many types of possible responses to various physical stimuli, as well as the instrumentation, electronic detection, signal conversion and signal processing techniques used to bring the physical event into the electronic world in a practical manner.  This requires that we learn about the diversity of physical phenomena, materials and devices that can be used to convert the various forms of physical energy into electronic signals.  Due to the significant diversity of physical phenomena the course requires reading from textbooks, the technical literature and patent literature.  The course is taught via the case method with student participation via oral and written reports. The student should arrive with a strong interest in, and basic understanding of, physics, material science, chemistry and analog electronic circuits as taught at the sophomore and junior course level.', '27-432 or 18-300 or 18-310 or 18-311 or 18-321 or 18-303', None), '18-450': Course('Digital Communications', '18-450', 12, 'In this course, the communication problem will be introduced, and channel impairments such as noise, inter-symbol interference and fading will be described. Solutions to combat these impairments, based on digital communication theory, will be described. These will include signal space analysis, detection, equalization, coding and diversity. Throughout the course, the emphasis will be on discovering unifying ideas in transmission, rather than specifying the details of each application.  4 hrs. lec.  This course was previously titled "Digital Wireless Communications"', '18-391', None), '18-419': Course('Semiconductor Device Applications - Optoelectronics and Nanoelectronics', '18-419', 12, 'This course is designed to introduce important semiconductor optoelectronic devices and applications, such as light emitting diode (LED), solid state Laser, photo-detector, and solar cell, etc.  It provides students with fundamental knowledge in optoelectronics as well as critical device design engineering. Developed on top of the fundamental knowledge covered in 18-310, the course begins with discussion on basic optics and device physics; it then focuses on operational principle, design engineering, and important applications of the devices.   Special topics on novel nanoscale electronics and optoelectronics including nanowire, nano-particle light emitting and photovoltaic devices will also be discussed.  In addition, an introduction to low-cost, flexible organic devices, e.g. display and solar cells will be presented.     Prerequisite(s): 18-310', '18-310', None), '18-418': Course('Electric Energy Processing: Fundamentals and Applications', '18-418', 12, 'This course provides an introduction to the fundamentals of electrical energy conversion and its use in several real-life systems. The course starts with a brief review of general mathematical and physical principles necessary for subsequent study of electrical energy conversion applications. This includes modeling, analysis, and control of general physical systems in time and frequency domain. Since the focus of energy conversion methods studied in this course is from electrical to mechanical systems, special attention is paid to electromagnetic theory. Rotating machines theory is developed and intuitively explained starting with Maxwell equations and analyzing general static and dynamic electromagnetic circuits. Power electronics methods are also introduced because most of modern electrical systems employ such methods. At this point, the necessary background is gained to analyze real life electrical energy conversion systems. We will focus on automotive, airplane, space station, and sea power systems. The main focus will be on operational principles and when appropriate stability issues of particular implementations. Time allowing, dynamic problems with interconnecting such systems will be briefly introduced and possibly studied by curious students in their course projects.', '18-220', None), '18-431': Course('Undergraduate Projects - Senior', '18-431', None, "The Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Carnegie Mellon  considers experiential learning opportunities important educational  options for its undergraduate students.  One such option is conducting  undergraduate research with a faculty member.  Students do not need to  officially register for undergraduate research unless they want it  listed on their official transcripts.  An ECE student who is involved in  a research project and is interested in registering this undergraduate  research for course credit on the official transcript may request to be  enrolled in this course.  To do this, the student should first complete  the on-line undergraduate research form available on the ECE  undergraduate student page.  Once the form has been submitted and  approved by the faculty member the student is conducting the research  with, the ECE Undergraduate Office will add the course to the student's  schedule.  Typical credit is granted as one hour of research per week is  equal to one unit of credit.", '', None), '18-390': Course('ECE CO-OP', '18-390', None, "The Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Carnegie Mellon  considers experiential learning opportunities important educational  options for its undergraduate students. One such option is cooperative  education, which provides a student with an extended period of exposure  with a company.  To participate, students must complete an ECE Co-op  Approval form (located in HH 1115) and submit for approval. Students  must possess at least junior status and have an overall grade point  average of 3.0 or above. All co-ops must be approximately 8 months in  uninterrupted length. If the co-op is approved, the ECE Undergraduate  Studies Office will add the course to the student's schedule. Upon  completion of the co-op experience, students must submit a 1-2 page  report of their work experience, and a 1-2 page evaluation from the  company supervisor to the ECE Undergraduate Office. International  students should also be authorized by the Office of International  Education (OIE). More information regarding CPT is available on OIE's  website.", '', None), '18-391': Course('Noisy Signal Representation and Processing', '18-391', 12, 'Please refer to the ECE webpage for a full description of this course.  <a href="http://www.ece.cmu.edu/courses/18391">http://www.ece.cmu.edu/courses/18391</a>', '18-202 and 36-217 and (18-396 or 18-290)', None), '18-290': Course('Signals and Systems', '18-290', 12, 'This course develops the mathematical foundation and computational tools for processing continuous-time and discrete-time signals in both time and frequency domain. Key concepts and tools introduced and discussed in this class include linear time-invariant systems, impulse response, frequency response, convolution, filtering, sampling, and Fourier transform. Efficient algorithms like the fast Fourier transform (FFT) will be covered. The course provides background to a wide range of applications including speech, image, and multimedia processing, bio and medical imaging, sensor networks, communication systems, and control systems.   This course serves as entry and prerequisite for any higher level course in the fields of signal processing, communications, and control.   Prerequisite(s): 18-100  Corequisite(s): 18-202', '18-100', '18-202'), '18-474': Course('Embedded Control Systems', '18-474', 12, 'This course introduces principles for design of embedded controllers. In applications ranging from airplanes, to automobiles, to manufacturing systems, embedded computers now close feedback loops that were previously closed by mechanical devices or by humans in the loop. This course emphasizes practical insight into the tools for modeling and simulating these dynamic physical systems, and methods for designing the real-time software for embedded computers to control them. Lectures cover relevant theory and background from real-time systems and control engineering, including event-based and clock-based sampling, switching control, PWM (pulse-width modulation), PID (proportional-integral-derivative) design, state-variable feedback, state estimation, and methods for setpoint control and trajectory tracking. Basic embedded computing, sensor, and actuator technologies are reviewed, including microcontrollers, DC motors and optical encoders. In the laboratory, students use commercial tools for simulation and automatic code generation to design and implement embedded control system experiments.  3 hrs. lecture, 3 hrs. lab.', '(18-243 or 15-213) and (18-370 or 18-396)', None), '18-432': Course('Senior Projects', '18-432', None, "The Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Carnegie Mellon  considers experiential learning opportunities important educational  options for its undergraduate students.  One such option is conducting  undergraduate research with a faculty member.  Students do not need to  officially register for undergraduate research unless they want it  listed on their official transcripts.  An ECE student who is involved in  a research project and is interested in registering this undergraduate  research for course credit on the official transcript may request to be  enrolled in this course.  To do this, the student should first complete  the on-line undergraduate research form available on the ECE  undergraduate student page.  Once the form has been submitted and  approved by the faculty member the student is conducting the research  with, the ECE Undergraduate Office will add the course to the student's  schedule.  Typical credit is granted as one hour of research per week is  equal to one unit of credit.", '', None), '18-472': Course('Fundamentals of Electric Power Systems', '18-472', 12, '', '18-202 and 33-107', None), '18-331': Course('Junior Projects', '18-331', None, "The Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Carnegie Mellon  considers experiential learning opportunities important educational  options for its undergraduate students.  One such option is conducting  undergraduate research with a faculty member.  Students do not need to  officially register for undergraduate research unless they want it  listed on their official transcripts.  An ECE student who is involved in  a research project and is interested in registering this undergraduate  research for course credit on the official transcript may request to be  enrolled in this course.  To do this, the student should first complete  the on-line undergraduate research form available on the ECE  undergraduate student page.  Once the form has been submitted and  approved by the faculty member the student is conducting the research  with, the ECE Undergraduate Office will add the course to the student's  schedule.  Typical credit is granted as one hour of research per week is  equal to one unit of credit.", '', None), '18-332': Course('Junior Projects', '18-332', None, "The Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Carnegie Mellon  considers experiential learning opportunities important educational  options for its undergraduate students.  One such option is conducting  undergraduate research with a faculty member.  Students do not need to  officially register for undergraduate research unless they want it  listed on their official transcripts.  An ECE student who is involved in  a research project and is interested in registering this undergraduate  research for course credit on the official transcript may request to be  enrolled in this course.  To do this, the student should first complete  the on-line undergraduate research form available on the ECE  undergraduate student page.  Once the form has been submitted and  approved by the faculty member the student is conducting the research  with, the ECE Undergraduate Office will add the course to the student's  schedule.  Typical credit is granted as one hour of research per week is  equal to one unit of credit.", '', None), '18-487': Course('Introduction to Computer &amp; Network Security &amp; Applied Cryptography', '18-487', 12, 'Security is becoming one of the core requirements in the design of critical systems. This course will introduce students to the intro-level fundamental knowledge of computer security and applied cryptography. Students will learn the basic concepts in computer security including software vulnerability analysis and defense, networking and wireless security, and applied cryptography. Students will also learn the fundamental methodology for how to design and analyze security critical systems.', '18-213 and 15-214', None), '18-100': Course('Introduction to Electrical and Computer Engineering', '18-100', 12, "The goals of this freshman engineering course are:  * To introduce basic concepts in electrical and computer engineering in an integrated manner; * To motivate basic concepts in the context of real applications;  * To illustrate a logical way of thinking about problems and their solutions, and; * To convey the excitement of the profession.  These goals are attained through analysis, construction and testing of an electromechanical system (e.g., a robot) that incorporates concepts from a broad range of areas within Electrical and Computer Engineering. Some of the specific topics that will be covered include system decomposition, ideal and real sources, Kirchhoff's Current and Voltage Laws, Ohm's Law, piecewise linear modeling of nonlinear circuit elements, Ideal Op-Amp characteristics, combinational logic circuits, Karnaugh Maps, Flip-Flops, sequential logic circuits, and finite state machines.  3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec., 3 hr. lab.", '', '21-120'), '18-370': Course('Fundamentals of Control', '18-370', 12, 'An introduction to the fundamental principles and methodologies of classical feedback control and its applications. Emphasis is on problem formulation and the analysis and synthesis of servomechanisms using frequency and time domain techniques. Topics include analytical, graphical, and computer-aided (MATLAB) techniques for analyzing and designing automatic control systems; analysis of performance, stability criteria, realizability, and speed of response; compensation methods in the frequency domain, root-locus and frequency response design, and pole-zero synthesis techniques; robust controller design; systems with delay and computer control systems; transfer function and state space modeling of linear dynamic physical systems; nonlinearities in control systems; and control engineering software (MATLAB). 4 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '18-290 or 18-396', None), '18-231': Course('Sophomore Projects', '18-231', None, "The Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Carnegie Mellon  considers experiential learning opportunities important educational  options for its undergraduate students.  One such option is conducting  undergraduate research with a faculty member.  Students do not need to  officially register for undergraduate research unless they want it  listed on their official transcripts.  An ECE student who is involved in  a research project and is interested in registering this undergraduate  research for course credit on the official transcript may request to be  enrolled in this course.  To do this, the student should first complete  the on-line undergraduate research form available on the ECE  undergraduate student page.  Once the form has been submitted and  approved by the faculty member the student is conducting the research  with, the ECE Undergraduate Office will add the course to the student's  schedule.  Typical credit is granted as one hour of research per week is  equal to one unit of credit.", '', None), '18-232': Course('Sophomore Projects', '18-232', None, "The Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Carnegie Mellon  considers experiential learning opportunities important educational  options for its undergraduate students.  One such option is conducting  undergraduate research with a faculty member.  Students do not need to  officially register for undergraduate research unless they want it  listed on their official transcripts.  An ECE student who is involved in  a research project and is interested in registering this undergraduate  research for course credit on the official transcript may request to be  enrolled in this course.  To do this, the student should first complete  the on-line undergraduate research form available on the ECE  undergraduate student page.  Once the form has been submitted and  approved by the faculty member the student is conducting the research  with, the ECE Undergraduate Office will add the course to the student's  schedule.  Typical credit is granted as one hour of research per week is  equal to one unit of credit.", '', None), '18-482': Course('Telecommunications, Technology Policy &amp; Management', '18-482', 12, 'This course provides a comprehensive introduction to basic principles of telecommunications technology and the telephone network, and the legal, economic, and regulatory environment of the telecommunications industry. Role of new technologies such as fiber, integrated digital networks, computer communications, and information services. Common carrier law and the economics of natural monopoly as the basis for regulation of the telecommunications industry. Issues of competition, monopoly and technical standards. Spectrum allocation and management. International communications and transborder data flow. Special emphasis on how the new technologies have altered and are altered by regulation. Junior or Senior standing required.', '73-100', None), '18-310': Course('Fundamentals of Semiconductor Devices', '18-310', 12, 'This course replaced 18311 in Spring 2005. In this course you will receive an introduction to the operation and fabrication of the most important semiconductor devices used in integrated circuit technology together with device design and layout. At the end of the course you will have a basic understanding of pn diodes, bipolar transistors, and MOSFETs as well as some light emitting and light detecting devices such as photodiodes, LEDs and solar cells. You will also receive an introduction to the fundamental concepts of semiconductor physics such as doping, electron and hole transport, and band diagrams. In the laboratory you will learn how to lay out both bipolar and MOS devices and you will design small (2-3 transistor) circuits. The laboratory portion of the course emphasizes the relation between device design and layout and circuit performance. You will also experimentally evaluate the operation of amplifier and gate circuits fabricated with discrete devices. This course will give you an excellent understanding of the operation and fabrication of the devices which is necessary for high-performance analog and digital circuit design.   3 hrs. lec.   (Note: the prerequisite is typically waived for MSE students who intend to pursue the Electronic Materials Minor.)', '18-220', None), '18-213': Course('Introduction to Computer Systems', '18-213', 12, "This course provides a programmer's view of how computer systems execute programs, store information, and communicate. It enables students to become more effective programmers, especially in dealing with issues of performance, portability and robustness. It also serves as a foundation for courses on compilers, networks, operating systems, and computer architecture, where a deeper understanding of systems-level issues is required. Topics covered include: machine-level code and its generation by optimizing compilers, performance evaluation and optimization, computer arithmetic, memory organization and management, networking technology and protocols, and supporting concurrent computation. NOTE: students must achieve a C or better in order to use this course to satisfy the pre-requisite for any subsequent Computer Science course.  Prerequisites: 15-123 (Grade of C or higher is required in the prerequisite)", '15-123 (Grade of C or higher is required in the prerequisite', None), '18-491': Course('Fundamentals of Signal Processing', '18-491', 12, 'This course addresses the mathematics, implementation, design and application of the digital signal processing algorithms widely used in areas such as multimedia telecommunications and speech and image processing. Topics include discrete-time signals and systems, discrete-time Fourier transforms and Z-transforms, discrete Fourier transforms and fast Fourier transforms, digital filter design and implementation, and multi-rate signal processing. The course will include introductory discussions of 2-dimensional signal processing, linear prediction, adaptive filtering, and selected application areas. Classroom lectures are supplemented with implementation exercises using MATLAB.', '18-290', None), '18-402': Course('Applied Electrodynamics', '18-402', 12, 'This course builds upon the electric and magnetic field foundations established in 18-300 to describe phenomena and devices where electromagnetic waves are a central issue. Topics include: review of Maxwell&#8217;s equations, propagation of uniform plane waves in lossless and lossy media, energy conservation as described by the Poynting Theorem, reflection and transmission with normal and oblique incidence upon boundaries, sinusoidal steady state and transients on 2-conductor transmission lines, modal descriptions of waveguides, radiation and antennas. 4 hrs. lec.', '18-300', None), '18-401': Course('Electromechanics', '18-401', 12, 'This course provides a broadly based introduction to interactions between mechanical media and electromagnetic fields. Attention is focused on the electromechanical dynamics of lumped-parameter systems, wherein electrical and mechanical subsystems may be modeled in terms of discrete elements. Interactions of quasistatic electric and magnetic fields with moving media are described and exemplified. Unifying examples are drawn from a wide range of technological applications, including energy conversion in synchronous, induction, and commutator rotating machines, electromechanical relays, a capacitor microphone and speaker, and a feedback-controlled magnetic levitation system. 4.5 hrs. rec.', '18-300', None), '18-447': Course('Introduction to Computer Architecture', '18-447', 12, 'Computer architecture is the science and art of selecting and interconnecting hardware components to create a computer that meets functional, performance and cost goals. This course introduces the basic hardware structure of a modern programmable computer including, the basic laws underlying performance evaluation. We will learn, for example, how to design the control and data path hardware for a MIPS-like processor, how to make machine instructions execute simultaneously through pipelining and simple superscalar execution, and how to design fast memory and storage systems. The principles presented in lecture are reinforced in the laboratory through design and simulation of a register transfer (RT) implementation of a MIPS-like pipelined superscalar in Verilog. Learning to design programmable systems requires that you already have the knowledge of building RT systems as is taught in the prerequisite 18-240, the knowledge of the behavior storage hierarchies (e.g., cache memories) and virtual memory as is taught in the prerequisite 15-213, and  the knowledge of assembly language programming as is taught in the prerequisites.  3 hrs. lec., 3 hrs. lab.', '18-240 and (15-213 or 18-213 or 18-243) and (18-340 or 18-341 or 18-348 or 18-349 or 18-320)', None), '18-320': Course('Microelectronic Circuits', '18-320', 12, '18-320 introduces students to the fundamentals of microelectronic circuits. The course will emphasize the analysis and design of basic analog and digital integrated circuits in preparation for further study in analog, digital, mixed-signal, and radio-frequency integrated circuit design. Additionally, students will learn to design and analyze microelectronic circuits using industry standard computer aided design (CAD) software. Topics to be covered include: &#8226; MOSFET fabrication and layout &#8226; MOSFET models for analog and digital design &#8226; Analysis and design of digital CMOS logic gates &#8226; Analysis and design of clocked storage elements (e.g., flip-flops, latches, memory cells) &#8226; Delay optimization of digital circuits &#8226; Circuit topologies for arithmetic and logical functional units &#8226; Analysis and design of single-stage MOS amplifiers &#8226; Frequency response characteristics of single-stage amplifiers &#8226; Differential amplifiers and simple operational amplifiers &#8226; Analog filters using operational amplifiers  The course includes a lab component which will give students hands-on experience in the design and implementation of analog and digital circuits. Labs will employ both design using discrete, SSI, and MSI parts, as well as using CAD design tools.', '18-22', '18-240'), '18-240': Course('Structure and Design of Digital Systems', '18-240', 12, 'This course introduces basic issues in design and verification of modern digital systems. Topics include: Boolean algebra, digital number systems and computer arithmetic, combinational logic design and simplification, sequential logic design and optimization, register-transfer design of digital systems, basic processor organization and instruction set issues, assembly language programming and debugging, and a hardware description language. Emphasis is on the fundamentals: the levels of abstraction and hardware description language methods that allow designers to cope with hugely complex systems, and connections to practical hardware implementation problems. Students will use computer-aided digital design software and actual hardware implementation laboratories to learn about real digital systems. 3 hr. lec., 1 hr. rec., 3 hr. lab.', '18-100', '21-127'), '82-142': Course('Elementary Spanish II', '82-142', 12, 'The second part of a two-semester course sequence (82-141, 82-142). Prerequisite: 82-141, a placement score or permission of the Instructor. If a student has studied Spanish before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for taking the placement exam are in Baker Hall 160.', '82-141, a placement score or permission of the Instructor. If a student has studied Spanish before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for taking the placement exam are in Baker Hall 160', None), '82-143': Course('Elementary Spanish I Online', '82-143', 12, 'This course is designed for students who need a more flexible approach to language learning than that offered in a standard classroom course. All materials are Web-based, with extensive use of Internet technologies for research, writing and communication (chat and b-boards). There is a required, weekly class meeting for training and for group activities, plus individual weekly meetings with a tutor or the Instructor for conversation and practice. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling.  Prerequisite: No previous study required. If a student has studied Spanish before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160. NOTE: There is a *required* $50 materials fee for taking this course. This fee has to be paid by the end of the official add/drop period to avoid removal from the class.', 'No previous study required. If a student has studied Spanish before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160. NOTE: There is a *required* $50 materials fee for taking this course. This fee has to be paid by the end of the official add/drop period to avoid removal from the class', None), '82-416': Course('Topics in French and Francophone Studies', '82-416', 9, 'SPRING 2013 Description of 82-416 Ha\xefti  An exploration of the culture, history and challenges of Haiti, formerly "la perle des Antilles" and currently one of the most critically challenged nations on Earth. Despite the country\'s extreme poverty, environmental destruction and ruinous natural and man-made disasters, Haitians remain fiercely proud and loyal to their island nation. This course will examine local arts practices in storytelling, music and visual arts.  The importance of voodoo as a cultural and religious practice will also be studied. The development of Haitian Creole as a language and its diglossic relationship with French forms an important part of any understanding of Haiti. Students will study Haitian Creole with a goal of proficiency through at least the Novice High level.    Prerequisites: 82-303 French Culture + 82-304 The Francophone World + 82-305 French in Social Context, or consent of instructor.', '82-303 French Culture + 82-304 The Francophone World + 82-305 French in Social Context, or consent of instructor', None), '82-141': Course('Elementary Spanish I', '82-141', 12, 'A two-semester course sequence (82-141, 82-142) for beginning students emphasizing the development of communicative language proficiency: oral practice, aural comprehension, reading, writing, structural analysis, and language learning resource center work. It also involves studying cultural aspects of Spanish-speaking countries.  Prerequisite: None, or if a student has studied Spanish before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for taking the placement exam are in Baker Hall 160.', 'None, or if a student has studied Spanish before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for taking the placement exam are in Baker Hall 160', None), '82-146': Course('Intensive Spanish Language and Culture: Elementary Level', '82-146', None, 'Transfer credit for pre-approved, 100-level study in a Spanish-speaking country or at another approved program at the Elementary level. Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for Spanish. Prerequisite: Prior permission of the Hispanic Studies major or minor advisor and confirmation of credit upon return.', 'Prior permission of the Hispanic Studies major or minor advisor and confirmation of credit upon return', None), '82-147': Course('Accelerated Elementary Spanish', '82-147', 12, 'This course is specially designed for students who are not true beginners of Spanish, and would not be appropriately placed in 82-141, but may also lack adequate preparation to enter the second semester of first-year Spanish. It can also serve students who have not completed the equivalent of the second-semester of Spanish, and would not be appropriately placed in 82-241, the Intermediate Spanish I course. Students in 82-147 will engage in a rapid review of first-semester Elementary Spanish materials and then progress to complete the entire elementary level of Spanish (the second semester) in one semester. Upon successful completion, students will be prepared to continue at the intermediate level. The course emphasizes the development of communicative proficiency though oral practice, aural comprehension, reading, writing, and study of cultural aspects of Spanish-speaking countries.  Prerequisite: Permission of the Instructor and an appropriate placement exam score.', 'Permission of the Instructor and an appropriate placement exam score', None), '82-144': Course('Elementary Spanish II Online', '82-144', 12, 'A continuation of 82-143 Elementary Spanish I Online. This course is designed for students who need a more flexible approach to language learning than that offered in a standard classroom course. All materials are Web-based, with extensive use of Internet technologies for research, writing and communication (chat and b-boards). There is a required, weekly class meeting for training and for group activities, plus individual weekly meetings with a tutor or the Instructor for conversation and practice. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling. Prerequisite: 82-141, 82-143 or permission of the Instructor. Students new to Spanish study at Carnegie Mellon must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160. NOTE: There is a *required* $50 materials fee for taking this course. This fee has to be paid by the end of the official add/drop period to avoid removal from the class.', '82-141, 82-143 or permission of the Instructor. Students new to Spanish study at Carnegie Mellon must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160. NOTE: There is a *required* $50 materials fee for taking this course. This fee has to be paid by the end of the official add/drop period to avoid removal from the class', None), '82-415': Course('Topics in French and Francophone Studies', '82-415', 9, 'FALL 2013  Language, Identities, and Social Relationships in French Theatre and Film   This course examines the ways in which language is used to create, maintain, and negotiate identities and social relationships in French and Francophone theatre and film against the backdrop of cultural currents from the 17th century to present (e.g., from Moli&#232;re to Michel Tremblay, and from Louis Malle to Francis Veber). In this course, we will treat language and culture as inseparable, as &#8220;languaculture,&#8221; to borrow Michael Agar&#8217;s term, meaning that as we explore the language used in plays and films, we are at the same time exploring aspects of French and Francophone cultures as they are manifested in language. Through readings, viewings of performances of plays and films, class discussions, and course projects, students will gain a critical appreciation of the identities and social relationships embodied through language on the stage and screen. The final project in this course will center on the writing and performance of original theatrical scenes that reflect different time periods and the identities and social relationships relevant to those periods&#8217; &#8220;languaculture.&#8221;   Pre-requisites: Completion of 82-303, 82-304, and 82-305 (or their equivalents).', '82-303 and 82-304 and 82-305', None), '82-304': Course('The Francophone World', '82-304', 9, 'This course introduces the students of French to several of the francophone regional cultures outside of France, including North and West Africa, Belgium, Switzerland, Quebec and North America, and the Antilles. The culture commonly associated with the French language is the primarily Christian and Cartesian European tradition. Through the experience of this course, you will learn of the multiple synthetic cultural realities which have arisen through the colonial and post-colonial processes of contact between European and non-European cultures, and which are now expressed through the medium of the French language. Materials studied will include novels, short stories, essays, newspaper and scholarly articles, film, documentary video and song. The course also introduces students to the formal requirements of continuing cultural study, thus assignments will include analyses that demonstrate the ability to express critical judgments in both written and oral form, using accepted academic conventions for research documentation and exposition.   Prerequisite or permission of the instructor.', '82-303', None), '82-305': Course('French in its Social Contexts', '82-305', 9, 'This course will focus on culture through language variation in spoken and written forms of French.  Readings, videos, web use, and in-class conversations will involve phonological and sociolinguistic aspects of the French language and language change, its use regarding different registers and regional languages within France, the question of social identity through language, immigration and generational issues, and an exploration of the distinctive francophone uses of the French language.  In addition, students will be prepared to discuss current issues in France and francophone regions/countries by using multimedia tools available in the Modern Language Resource Center (MLRC).   Prerequisite: Completion of at least one 300-level French course, placement score, or permission of Instructor.', 'Completion of at least one 300-level French course, placement score, or permission of Instructor', None), '82-306': Course('Intensive French Language and Culture: Advanced Level', '82-306', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in France, a French-speaking country, or other approved program at the Advanced level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for French.', '', None), '82-448': Course('TOPICS IN ARABIC LANGUAGE, LITERATURE, AND CULTURE', '82-448', 9, 'Under this course title, a broad range of topics relating to Arabic-speaking peoples are dealt with through multiple perspectives, for example, cross-cultural, literary, social, generational, developmental, linguistic, and historical.  When offered, the course focuses on a particular topic and thus students may repeat with a different topic. Pre-requisites: completion of the 300 levels or permission of the instructor', '82-312', None), '82-301': Course('French for Reading Knowledge', '82-301', 9, 'This course offers an introduction to the written French language for undergraduate students in the humanities.  Students will be introduced to the structure of the French language in order to prepare them for their own research needs that will require consultation of sources in French.  The course is not intended to develop writing, listening and speaking skills, nor is it intended to prepare students for further study in the regular undergraduate French program.  It is intended to help them meet specific needs in their research in areas such as history, art and music history, literature, and literary and cultural studies. Prerequisite: Permission of the instructor.', 'Permission of the instructor', None), '82-303': Course('French Culture', '82-303', 9, 'The purpose of this class is to advance grammatical, communicative and cultural proficiency, through an in-depth study of France and the French.  Attempts will be made at defining the French "identity", or what it means to be French, through the study of aspects of French history, French institutions, regions, literature, etc.  Examples may be drawn from television and films, songs, and complete literary works, spanning the ages.  Great emphasis will be placed on the expression of critical judgment in both oral and written form, documented through readings and personal research.', '82-202 or 82-204', None), '82-384': Course('Language and Culture: Language in its Social Context', '82-384', 9, 'The focus of this course is an examination of the dynamic role that language plays in a multitude of social contexts throughout the world.  The goal of the course is to develop students? sensitivity and awareness to the dual role of language both as a reflection of prevailing social attitudes and as a force that serves to perpetuate many social attitudes and roles.  This complex relationship between language, society, culture and personal identity will be demonstrated by examining language use in a wide variety of speech communities throughout the world.  The course will consider numerous diverse topics, all of which demonstrate implicit cultural differences and attitudes as manifested through language use.  Examples of topics to be considered include standard versus vernacular languages; dialects and variation, language attitudes, bilingualism and multiculturalism in the United States and throughout the world; diglossia; language, literacy and education; non-verbal aspects of language use; gender-based differences in language and culture; socio-linguistic variables in the ethnography of speaking; language loss and language maintenance; politics, language planning and language policy and the impact of languages in contact.  The course will be taught on a seminar basis and will involve regular fieldwork activities to bring the themes of the course to life. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-385': Course('Language Across the University', '82-385', None, "Language credit may be attached to any course, independent study, or project unit for which a student receives content-area academic credit.  The program is available at the discretion of the responsible content-area faculty, who should be sufficiently skilled in the chosen language to be able to evaluate the technical content of a student's work.  The student, content-area faculty and language faculty negotiate a plan for the semester's work, designed to consume approximately three hours per week for three units of academic credit.  The course may be repeated on multiple occasions. Prerequisites: Intermediate level language proficiency or above and permission of a content-area faculty member and the Department of Modern Languages.", 'Intermediate level language proficiency or above and permission of a content-area faculty member and the Department of Modern Languages', None), '82-387': Course('The Film Festival', '82-387', 9, 'The Film Festival is an annual offering which rotates between the Departments of English, History and Modern Languages, with a different annual theme selected by the Instructor.  A core element every year is the study of the Film Festival itself as a global cultural and economic phenomenon.  Students in the course will also participate in the planning, promotion and running of a public film festival based on the annual theme and presented to the Carnegie Mellon and Pittsburgh film communities in McConomy Auditorium. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-380': Course('Independent Study in Second Language Acquisition', '82-380', None, 'An opportunity for students who wish to pursue independent supervised study in second language acquisition (SLA).  In conjunction with a faculty member, students will arrange a program of study to explore aspects of SLA. Prerequisite: Permission of the Instructor.', 'Permission of the Instructor', None), '82-383': Course('Second Language Acquisition: Theories and Research', '82-383', 9, 'This course provides an introduction to research and theories in Second Language Acquisition (SLA).  Processes that underlie the learning and use of second languages are examined from four perspectives: 1) as linguistic knowledge, 2) as a cognitive skill, 3) as a personality-meditated process, and 4) a socio-culturally mediated process.  Factors examined include: age-related differences, the influence of the first language, the role played by innate (universal) principles, the role of memory processes, attitudes, motivation, personality and cognitive styles, and formal versus naturalistic learning contexts.  Issues that arise from the course readings are investigated through practical experience in applying theoretical knowledge to small-scale empirical research projects.  Students are also provided with opportunities to consider the relevance of these issues to their own language learning experiences. 82-280 "Learning about Language Learning" is strongly recommended.', '82-280', None), '82-410': Course('Advanced Research in French Francophone Language and Culture', '82-410', 9, 'In this course, students will study the core curriculum of the 82-305 course, which is to say, a focus on culture through language variation in spoken and written forms of French.  Readings, videos, web use, and in-class conversations involve phonological and sociolinguistic aspects of the French language and language change; its use regarding different registers and regional languages within France; the question of social identity through language; immigration and generational issues; and an exploration of the distinctive francophone uses of the French language.  In order to achieve these goals, students do personal work on improving their control of the French phonological system, and discuss current issues in France and francophone regions/countries by using multimedia tools available in the Modern Language Learning Resource Center (MLRC). For students in the advanced level of this 305 core curriculum, a research project showing the application and intellectual development of one or several of the concepts described above is required.  The project involves a written work of a minimum of 15 pages plus bibliography and a 10-minute oral presentation to the class, both in French.  Prerequisites: 82303 or 82-304', '82303 or 82-30', None), '82-388': Course('Understanding Second Language Fluency', '82-388', 9, 'This course examines differences and similarities in the way literacy is learned and used in diverse languages and cultures. We will first examine the cognitive and social consequences of literacy by analyzing the major characteristics of spoken and written communications. We will then compare literacy practices in a variety of cultural contexts and explore how literacy utilization alters its collective impacts on the users. Finally, through systematic comparisons of literacy education, we will identify the social, cognitive, linguistic factors directly affecting literacy development in different cultural contexts.  Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-399': Course('Special Topics Russian', '82-399', None, 'This course focuses on further development of the linguistic and stylistic practices of advanced students based on cultural analysis of Russian literature. Focus is on rapid vocabulary expansion as well as correction of high frequency syntax errors that persist beyond the intermediate level. Written compositions and translations, assigned for homework, are required for the development of grammatical accuracy and stylistic appropriateness. All class discussions are conducted in Russian.  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '', None), '82-443': Course('Spanish Reading and Translation Workshop', '82-443', 9, 'This course is of interest to advanced Spanish majors and minors as well as non-specialists seeking to develop reading and translation skills in Spanish.  The course will be conducted as a workshop to allow different populations to participate in the class.  There will be an emphasis on both individual and group work, different theoretical models of translation and literary pieces, journal articles, critical essays and materials from Internet news services and bulletin boards. For students with advanced Spanish background (major &amp; minors), the reading and translation workshop will offer an advanced-level grammar and stylistics review, a vocabulary builder and increased exposure to Hispanic language and culture. Prerequisite: For Hispanic studies majors and minors, completion of all 300-level coursework or permission of the instructor.', 'For Hispanic studies majors and minors, completion of all 300-level coursework or permission of the instructor', None), '82-442': Course('Analysis of Spoken Spanish', '82-442', 9, 'This course is an introduction to Spanish Linguistics.  The main goal of the course it to provide students with the opportunity to learn the tools of linguistic analysis and to apply them to the study of Spanish.  Attention will be given to different levels of analysis in linguistics including phonetics, phonology, morphology, and syntax.  Class time will be divided between lecture, problem-solving exercises, and discussion.  Students will have the opportunity to write and present a research paper in specific areas of Spanish linguistics according to their interests. Prerequisite or permission of the instructor.', '82-343 or 80-280', None), '82-440': Course('Studies in Chinese Literature &amp; Culture', '82-440', 9, 'FALL 2013  The Rise of Power: Chinese Society and Officialdom Literature  In surveys of Chinese college graduates, to become a government official always ranks among the top-five most desired jobs. At the same time, government officials are a major target of both admiration and ridicule in Chinese literature. &#8220;Officialdom literature&#8221; (guanchang wenxue) emerged in early twentieth century as a specific type of both fiction and non-fiction writing in China, but has really developed into a best-selling genre since the late 1990s. This class focuses on readings from recent examples of &#8220;officialdom literature&#8221; in the Chinese language. By learning about the work and lives of both model officials and corrupt officials from literary sources, students will better understand how social and economic change affect everyday life in Chinese society today and will be equipped with the vocabulary to manage life in China themselves. The class is conducted in Chinese.     Prerequisite:82-332 or permission of the instructor', '82-332', None), '82-401': Course('French Popular Song', '82-401', 9, 'This class will look at the phenomenon of popular song in a francophone context.  We will adopt multiple points of view, including not only song as music and lyrics, but song as an event in a socio-historical context, as performance, as an industry, as a means of cultural promotion, as a focus for technical innovation in instrumentation, recording, sound reinforcement, and distribution.  Where appropriate we will study and listen to individual artists or groups who exemplify trends in these areas.   The second half of the course will move our attention to a survey of regional development, beginning with France, then Quebec and finishing with the Cajun music of Louisiana, in what we hope is not a nod in memoriam to an important part of American culture.  Prerequisite: Completion of third year courses or permission from the instructor.', 'Completion of third year courses or permission from the instructor', None), '82-407': Course('The Arts in Society', '82-407', None, 'The number 82-407 is a repeating number that refers to a sequence of European Studies core courses entitled "The Arts in Society" followed by the course name: "Theaters of Love," "French Modernism," and "Theater and Lyric in the 20th Century".  Each course in the 82-407 sequence explores a major theme of modernity and a range of works across cultures.  Theater and Lyric in the 20th Century focuses on the dimensions of the subject after Romanticism.  The course will concentrate on some of the works that  transformed modern theater. Readings will include Brecht, Artaud, Beckett, Genet, and excerpts from a  range of European and American authors.  Works studied include plays, operas, songs, poems, and writings about avant-garde theater.  We will view films, filmed performances, and adaptations by a number of directors, including Chaplin, Linder, Pabst, Genet, Brook, Pr&#233;vert/Carn&#233;, Beckett, Renoir, Truffaut, Rivette, Godard, Antonioni, and van Peebles.  The focus of the course is on the cultures of Western Europe and the U.S., with an emphasis on French, Anglo-Irish, and German works.  All readings are in English.    Total enrollment limited to 25.', '', None), '82-406': Course('Intensive French Language and Culture: Advanced Level Special Topics', '82-406', 9, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in France, a French-speaking country, or other approved program at the Advanced level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for French.', '', None), '82-404': Course('Francophone Realities: Africa', '82-404', 9, 'This course introduces students to the political and sociological histories of former French African colonies. Authors will vary by offering.  The literary component of the course involves analyses of francophone authors, examining their roles in the written medium as they attempt to explore colonialism and its effects on Africa. Prerequisite: 82-303 and 82-304 or approved equivalent.', '82-303 and 82-304 or approved equivalent', None), '82-313': Course('Readings in Islamic History', '82-313', 9, 'This course focuses on Islamic history and enables students to read authentic historical texts in Arabic written three to five centuries ago and to understand the cultural context that gave rise to these texts.  Students also will continue to develop their ability to express their ideas both in speaking and in writing and to develop their listening skills in Modern Standard Arabic.  Prerequisite  or approved equivalent.', '', None), '82-312': Course('Arabic Language and Culture II', '82-312', 9, 'This course is a sequel to 82-311 and also aims to build students&#8217; knowledge of the Arab world and at the same time promote the development of their linguistic abilities in Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) through reading, writing, speaking and listening.  A broad range of literary and nonliterary texts and topics relating to the Arab world and Arabic-speaking peoples are studied.  Each iteration of this course focuses on a particular theme, such as Current Issues in the Arab World, Ethnic Groups in the Arab world, Arabic Poetry and Proverbs, Education, Economic and Social Development, etc.    Students will be asked to write somewhat longer essays and give more extensive oral presentations than in 82-311.  Prerequisite approved equivalent.', '', None), '82-311': Course('Arabic Language and Culture I', '82-311', 9, 'This course aims to build students&#8217; knowledge of the Arab world and at the same time promote the development of their linguistic abilities in Modern Standard Arabic (MSA) through reading, writing, speaking and listening.  A broad range of literary and nonliterary texts and topics relating to the Arab world and Arabic-speaking peoples are studied.  Each iteration of this course focuses on a particular theme, such as Current Issues in the Arab World, Ethnic Groups in the Arab world, Arabic Poetry and Proverbs, Education, Economic and Social Development, etc.    Students will be asked to write short essays and give brief oral presentations in class.  Prerequisite 82-212 Intermediate Arabic II or approved equivalent.', '', None), '82-408': Course('Matisse, Chagall, Picasso &amp; Their Contemporaries: Art &amp; Museums on the Riviera', '82-408', None, 'This course examines the lives and work of the major 20th century artists (Chagall, Cocteau, L&#233;ger, Matisse, Picasso and Renoir) as well as some of their contemporaries who are prominently associated with the art of the Riviera.  Considering the artists\' personal stories, the course provides a "social art history" and a multidisciplinary focus which includes an understanding of the historic context, geographic setting, and artistic milieu in which these artists lived and worked, complemented by a conceptual exploration of what a museum is, its physical space and its role in society. The course will be taught in English with assigned readings and related assignments in French for French minors and majors. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-392': Course('Advanced Russian II', '82-392', 9, 'The second part of a two-semester course sequence  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-391', None), '82-391': Course('Advanced Russian I', '82-391', 9, 'This course seeks to enhance listening-comprehension skills while perfecting the linguistic and stylistic practices of advanced students. Intensive study is made of varied literary, journalistic and colloquial texts in audio-visual and print media. Focus is on rapid vocabulary expansion as well as correction of high frequency syntax errors that persist beyond the intermediate level. Practice with online resources, additional to three class hours per week, is mandatory for the evolution of aural/oral fluency. Written compositions and translations, assigned for homework, are required for the development of grammatical accuracy and stylistic appropriateness. All class discussions are conducted in Russian. Prerequisite or approved equivalent', '82-292', None), '82-397': Course("Russia's Demons", '82-397', 9, 'Demons and devils, ghosts and goblins, witches and werewolves: Russian literature, art and music and are riddled with them. Where have they come from and why have they stayed? Under what conditions has Russian life conjured them, and what has their power been for creating conditions of their own? This course aims to find out by peering into the netherworld of demonic fantasy by the light of Russian social history from the nineteenth century to the current day. The core of the course is comprised of readings drawn from the literature of Pushkin, Lermontov, Gogol, Dostoevsky, Bely, and Bulgakov.  Prerequisites: None for 9 units; an additional 3 units, requiring permission of the instructor, can be earned for work done in Russian.', 'None for 9 units; an additional 3 units, requiring permission of the instructor, can be earned for work done in Russian', None), '82-396': Course('The Faust Legend at Home and Abroad', '82-396', 9, 'This course introduces students to the basic outlines of the Faust story, and examines its nineteenth- through twenty first-century manifestations in a variety of European, Russian and American novels, plays, films and operas. On the assumption that cultures reveal something distinctive about themselves by the particular way in which they adapt the legend, this course aims to discover how and why these Faustian works of art respond and contribute to the social, political and historical context in which they are produced. On what is the persistent appeal of the Faust legend based? To what needs does it speak? How does the history of its own, continual reemergence affect the meanings it communicates? Prerequisites: None for 9 units; an additional 3 units, requiring permission of the instructor, can be earned for work done in Russian.', 'None for 9 units; an additional 3 units, requiring permission of the instructor, can be earned for work done in Russian', None), '82-241': Course('Intermediate Spanish I', '82-241', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of Spanish language and Hispanic cultures by means of grammar review, analysis of literary and cultural readings, and films, and intensive practice in written and spoken Spanish. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Spanish. The first part of a two-semester course sequence (82-241, 82-242).  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-142 or 82-144', None), '82-243': Course('Intermediate Spanish I Online', '82-243', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the Spanish language and Hispanic cultures by means of grammar review, analysis of literary and cultural readings, and films, and intensive practice in written and spoken Spanish. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Spanish. This course is a parallel offering designed for students who need a more flexible approach to language learning than that offered in a standard classroom course. All materials are Web-based, with extensive use of Internet technologies for research, writing and communication (chat and b-boards). There is a required weekly class meeting for training and for group activities, plus individual weekly meetings with a tutor or the Instructor for conversation and practice. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling. Students new to Spanish study at Carnegie Mellon must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160. NOTE: There is a *required* $50 materials fee for taking this course. This fee has to be paid by the end of the official add/drop period to avoid removal from the class  Prerequisite or permission of the Instructor.', '82-147 or 82-142 or 82-144', None), '82-242': Course('Intermediate Spanish II', '82-242', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the Spanish language and Hispanic cultures by means of grammar review, analysis of literary and cultural readings, and films, and intensive practice in written and spoken Spanish. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Spanish. The second part of a two-semester course sequence (82-241, 82-242).  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-243 or 82-241', None), '82-244': Course('Intermediate Spanish II Online', '82-244', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the Spanish language and Hispanic cultures by means of grammar review, analysis of literary and cultural readings, and films, and intensive practice in written and spoken Spanish. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Spanish. A continuation of 82-243 Intermediate Spanish I Online. This course is a parallel offering designed for students who need a more flexible approach to language learning than that offered in a standard classroom course. All materials are Web-based, with extensive use of Internet technologies for research, writing and communication (chat and b-boards). There is a required weekly class meeting for training and for group activities, plus individual weekly meetings with a tutor or the Instructor for conversation and practice. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling. Students new to Spanish study at Carnegie Mellon must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160. NOTE: There is a *required* $50 materials fee for taking this course. This fee has to be paid by the end of the official add/drop period to avoid removal from the class.   Completion of both prerequisites or permission of the instructor.', '82-243 and 82-241', None), '82-246': Course('Intensive Spanish Language and Culture: Intermediate Level', '82-246', None, 'Transfer credit for pre-approved, 200-level study in a Spanish-speaking country or other approved program at the Intermediate level. Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for Spanish. Prerequisite or an approved equivalent, or prior permission of the Hispanic Studies major or minor advisor, and confirmation of credit upon return.', '82-412', None), '82-333': Course('Introduction to Chinese Language and Culture', '82-333', 9, 'FALL 2012  82-333 Introduction to Chinese Language and Culture &#8220;Modern Chinese Culture&#8221;  This course will introduce students to important developments in China&#8217;s culture and language since the end of the nineteenth century. We will focus on the interactions between Chinese and Western cultural traditions and the historical, social and political contexts in which these interactions evolved. Thus we will explore questions like: What is Chinese culture in the modern world? What is &#8220;modern&#8221; and what &#8220;traditional&#8221; Chinese culture? How does high culture interact with folk culture and popular culture? How have education and language policies shaped Chinese cultural identities over the last century? What does it mean to be Chinese in a diaspora context? Secondary readings, primary documents, and video material chosen for analysis will provide students with important insights into the diverse factors that have been shaping contemporary Chinese culture. This course is conducted in English with no requirement of pior knowledge of Chinese language for students who take it for 9 units. Students who take this course towards Chinese major/minor must register for 12 units (see prerequisites), and extra work in Chinese needs to be completed for the extra 3 units.  Prequisites: To register for 12 units, there is a prerequisite of either 82-232 or 82-235 or instructor&#8217;s approval. No prerequisite for students taking the course with 9 units.', '', None), '82-499': Course('Alternative Break Projec (Language)', '82-499', None, 'This course provides advanced ML language students and non-ML students enrolled in an Alternative Break student trip project the opportunity to earn credit by engaging in &#8220;connected&#8221; modes of knowing, by identifying and analyzing a problem, and developing plans for short-term and sustainable solutions, reflecting, and creating and disseminating an informational and interpretive website and print materials about their experience. Students will also bring to bear or gain experience in non-academic skills/talents/interests in areas like photography, image editing, video production, writing, design, website development, sound recording, and art, etc., by doing community service under the auspices of Carnegie Mellon University&#8217;s Alternative Break program. Students will earn three (3) units for full participation and fulfillment of course requirements. With the approval of the faculty facilitator, an additional three (3) units may be earned by completing an additional assignment.', '', None), '82-454': Course('The Hispanic Caribbean: Rhyme, Reason and Song', '82-454', 9, 'This course will cover a broad range of topics, all of which will shed light on how to define the identity of the Hispanic Caribbean, its history and reality, and its cultural expression.  Texts for this course will primarily include literary and non-literary pieces (chronicles, historical and political essays, legal treatises, poetry, and song lyrics), and photography, music, art and food.  Some of the topics that will be covered through the varied literary, legal, and musical texts are a profile of the Caribbean region, the history of colonization, the institutionalization of race, color and difference, slavery, the sugar plantation and its shaping of regional history and economics, tobacco, sugar and coffee culture, religious syncretism, the urban/rural experience, the Trujillo dictatorship in the Dominican Republic, the Puerto Rican dilemma-territory, statehood or independence, the Cuban revolution, contemporary Hispanic Caribbean and U.S. Latino expressions. Prerequisite permission of the instructor.', '82-345', None), '82-491': Course('Literature, Politics and Film in Russia &amp; East Europe Today', '82-491', 9, 'This course aims to familiarize the student with the cultural geography of contemporary East Europe, including Russia. Visual texts serve to outline the power politics that have shaped East European and Russian/Soviet cultures from World War II to the present, dramatic day, while verbal texts reveal a range of personal responses to current crises affecting national identity, human rights, gender roles, and the natural environment. While the first of these is the predominant concern of the course, the other three attract a good deal of attention as they take shape in the modes of cultural discourse by which national identities are formulated. The course seeks to sample this discourse mainly in fictional literature and feature film; however, a small number of nonfiction essays and documentary films are seen to demonstrate the breakdown of traditional genres that characterizes intellectual production in times of political flux. Prerequisites: None for 9 units; an additional 3 units, requiring permission of the instructor, can be earned for work done in Russian.', 'None for 9 units; an additional 3 units, requiring permission of the instructor, can be earned for work done in Russian', None), '82-492': Course('The Historical Imagination in Nineteenth-Century Russian Literature', '82-492', 9, 'Pushkin, Gogol, Lermontov, Turgenev, Dostoevsky and Tolstoy all ruminated upon their nation&#8217;s historical destiny. This course aims to describe the role played by imagination in these authors&#8217; efforts to wreak from Russia&#8217;s past a vision of her future. Emphasis is placed upon the figurative operations of language that allow narrative to function as a guidepost to a collective mission and a map of the individual&#8217;s location within the projected historical scheme. Lecture and discussion formats are combined at each class meeting. Written papers, oral presentations, and participation in discussions are required.    Prerequisites:  None for 9 units; an additional 3 units, requiring permission of the instructor, can be earned for work done in Russian.', ' None for 9 units; an additional 3 units, requiring permission of the instructor, can be earned for work done in Russian', None), '82-493': Course('Joseph Brodsky in Context', '82-493', 9, 'The purpose of the course is to explore the biographical facts, political circumstances and cultural histories underlying the paradoxical and poignant trajectory of Joseph Brodsky\'s outstanding achievements as poet, playwright, essayist and spokesman for literature\'s value to ethics and education.  His work is deeply rooted in the artistic efflorescence of the "Silver Age" in twentieth century Russian poetry, but takes equal inspiration in the metaphysical poetry of England\'s Renaissance and Modern ages.  To read Brodsky is thus to read Anna Akhmatova, Marina Tsvetaeva and Osip Mandelshtam, on the one hand, and John Donne, George Herbert, T.S. Eliot, and W.H. Auden on the other.  Works by and about these authors as well as Brodsky thus comprise the reading matter of the course.  Poetry, essays and literary criticism are read with a view toward textual explication as a starting point for engaging the larger issues by which any literature subsists.  To study the career of this most unusual writer in its bilingual, bicultural context is to confront the most fundamental questions about the means by which cultures are empowered and the reasons for which they succeed or fail to coexist in any given place and time.  The language of the course is English for all readings, lectures and discussions.  No knowledge of Russian is required, but those who can are invited to read in Russian as well.  The course follows a predominantly seminar format.  Reading and writing assignments are required, as is participation in classroom discussion. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-276': Course('Intensive Japanese Language and Culture: Intermediate Level', '82-276', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in Japan or other approved program at the Intermediate level. Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for Japanese.', '', None), '82-271': Course('Intermediate Japanese I', '82-271', 12, 'This course is the first part of a two-semester course sequence (82-271, 82-272).  It takes an integrated approach to the study of Japanese language and culture, consisting of grammar review, reading, and intensive practice in written and spoken Japanese. Course materials include authentic audiovisual and written texts on top of the assigned textbooks. Also integrated are cultural explorations through direct interactions with native speakers. Four hours of in-class instruction per week, plus mandatory homework assignments.  Prerequisites  or approved equivalent.', '82-172', None), '82-272': Course('Intermediate Japanese II', '82-272', 12, 'This course is a sequel to Intermediate Japanese I (82-171) and takes an integrated approach to the study of Japanese language and culture, consisting of grammar review, reading, and intensive practice in written and spoken Japanese. Course materials include authentic audiovisual and written texts on top of the assigned textbooks. Also integrated are cultural explorations through direct interactions with native speakers. Four hours of in-class instruction per week, plus mandatory homework assignments.  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-271', None), '82-273': Course('Introduction to Japanese Language and Culture', '82-273', 9, 'This course is an introduction to modern Japanese. Given the close link between the Japanese language and culture, the examination of the distinctive characteristics of the Japanese language and its sociocultural context provides important insights into contemporary Japan.  The course is taught in English.  It is intended both for individuals who want to gain a better understanding of modern Japanese society, as well as for students of the Japanese language.  Prerequisite: at least 82-171 or permission of the instructor.', 'at least 82-171 or permission of the instructor', None), '82-457': Course('Contemporary Latin American Texts: Revision, Rewriting and Representation', '82-457', 9, 'This course is an overview of contemporary Latin American "texts" dealing with issues of historical representation, autochtonous heritage, popular culture and gender roles.  By "texts" we shall understand conventional and unconventional literary material, film, art, slides and music.  The course will explore formal and "rhetorical" problematic, as well as the relationship between fiction and imaginary solutions to real cultural and political conflicts.  We shall consider the functions of myth and history in Latin American society and the revisionist role of contemporary texts.  We shall also examine the categories and implications of historicized fiction and \'literaturized\' history with particular attention to the power dynamic present in the segregation of the traditional disciplines which are History and Literature, conceived institutionally as reality and fiction, respectively. Prerequisite or permission of the instructor.', '82-345', None), '82-278': Course('Japanese Literature in Translation', '82-278', 9, 'This course explores how Japanese literature has reflected, or has created alternatives to, the reality of Japanese culture and society by analyzing a : variety of fictions primarily from modern and contemporary Japan (e.g., the novels of Haruki Murakami), but also from traditional Japan (e.g., The : Tale of Genji and the literature of Edo era) that spawned the archetypes transformed into its modern/contemporary counterparts. Students will also read essays in Japanese history and literary theory that will provide the tools for interpreting the literature in its own cultural and historical context, and in its interplay with foreign cultures. In addition, this course examines the literature&#8217;s impact on Japanese film.      (No prerequisites).', '', None), '82-161': Course('Elementary Italian I', '82-161', 12, 'A two-semester course sequence (82-161, 82-162) for beginning students emphasizing the development of communicative language proficiency: oral practice, aural comprehension, reading, writing, structural analysis, and  work with audio tapes and DVDs.  Also a study of cultural aspects of Italy.  The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Note: This is a 12 unit course.  Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-162': Course('Elementary Italian II', '82-162', 12, 'A two-semester course sequence (82-161, 82-162). The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Prerequisite: 82-161, 82-163 or approved equivalent. Note: This is a 12 unit course. A 9 unit version of this course that does not fulfill DCR3 credits may be offered during a semester for Music students only.', '82-161, 82-163 or approved equivalent. Note: This is a 12 unit course. A 9 unit version of this course that does not fulfill DCR3 credits may be offered during a semester for Music students only', None), '82-163': Course('Directed Language Study: Elementary Italian I or II', '82-163', 12, 'A self-paced version of 82-161/162, for highly-motivated students, capable of working independently.  Weekly practice session, language laboratory work with audio and video tapes, periodic achievement tests, and individual consultation.  Students are permitted to take only one semester of 82-163. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-476': Course('Japanese Discourse Analysis', '82-476', 9, "Through practical language activities, interviews, and field projects, students will develop refined Japanese discourse analytical skills. The course provides opportunities for students to acquire a high proficiency of communication skills both in the spoken and the written forms focusing on topics such as formal speech, job interviews, and business writing, while increasing exposure to Japanese culture. Formality, politeness, and gender differences are some of the major topics discussed in this course as well as how speaker's perspectives and attitudes are reflected within language expressions.  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.", '82-273 and 82-372', None), '82-474': Course('Topics of Japanese Studies', '82-474', 9, 'SPRING 2012  The Evolution of Japan&#8217;s Urban Cultures  This course seeks to (1) introduce students to the phenomena of Japan&#8217;s urban cultures in fiction, non-fiction, film, and social media that have evolved around Tokyo and other major cities in Japan, ranging from the modernist movement in the Taisho era (1912-1926) to the postwar avant-garde (1945-), to the popular culture in contemporary Japan (the late1980s-), and (2) develop their skills in analyzing various aspects of the urban cultures of Japan. Through understanding those aspects, it enables them to develop their perspectives on the formation of urban cultures and its issues in Japan and beyond. It also requires them to work on an individual project on Japan&#8217;s urban culture of their interest.  This course is taught in Japanese.  Prerequisite: 82-372 or approved equivalent', '82-372 or approved equivalen', None), '82-332': Course('Advanced Chinese II', '82-332', 9, 'A continuation of Advanced Chinese I, this course is designed to train students with the ability to use Chinese language to deal with abstract topics they may encounter in their life.  Students will continue to learn more complex language phenomena in order to do exposition, explanation, description and argumentation with the language.  These language phenomena will be introduced to students together with their social and cultural background through texts and multi-media programs related to various social issues.  Classroom discussions will be the major form of practice.  Students will discuss and comment on issues related to family, love, marriage and other human relations as well as the economic situations in the Chinese society by using their language skills in narration, description, comparison, argumentation, etc.  Students will also be required to write short articles of 600 Chinese characters on various topics discussed in class. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-331', None), '82-473': Course('Topics in Japanese Studies', '82-473', 9, 'Under this course title, a broad range of topics relating to Japan and the Japanese people are dealt with through multiple perspectives e.g., (cross-)cultural, social, generational, developmental, linguistic, and historical. When offered, the course focuses on a single topic and thus students may repeat with a different topic. Topics currently offered under the course title are &#8220;Changing Cultural Icons &#8211; Samurai, Kamikaze, and Totoro &#8211;&#8220;, &#8220;Japanese Family through Cinema&#8221;, and &#8220;Youth Culture&#8221;. Further topics will be added as they become available. This course is offered intermittently in fall.  Prerequisites: 82-372 or approved equivalent.', '82-372 or approved equivalent', None), '82-335': Course('Readings in Chinese', '82-335', 9, '82335 Readings in Chinese:  Traditional Chinese Thoughts and Literature through Comic Books and Animation  This course was inspired by a comic book series created by Tsai Chih Chung in the 1980&#8217;s , which illustrate canonical works in traditional Chinese philosophy and literature.  Ever since it was published, the comic book series has become a great hit in Taiwan and Mainland China, and has been translated into different languages around the world.   While its popularity continues to grow among its readers, its wide circulation also raises questions among scholars and critics of traditional Chinese literature and culture.  Two questions are usually brought up in the discussion of the value of this comic book series: (1) Are the comic adaptations faithful to the meanings of the original Chinese works? (2) Does the popularity of this comic series really help to promote the understanding and transmission of traditional Chinese culture?   One goal of this course is to look into these two questions.  In this course, students will be asked to read Tsai Chih Chung&#8217;s comic books and their animated adaptations, as well as the English translations of the Chinese canonical texts of philosophy and literature.  While enjoying Tsai&#8217;s innovative and delightful comic interpretation, students will also need to ponder upon serious philosophical questions along with the early Chinese thinkers, to learn to savor the aesthetic beauty of traditional Chinese literature, and to prepare to share their ideas and discovery to the rest of the class in Chinese.', '82-232', None), '82-362': Course('Italian Language and Culture', '82-362', 9, 'Italy As Seen Through Film"  According to Federico Fellini "A different language is a different vision of life". This course will offer a cultural journey that will enrich the student\'s perspective on Italy and the Italians. It will be a view of contemporary Italy through the  lens of Italian filmmakers. Screenings of movies in the Italian  language will be followed by a "cineforum", a roundtable discussion and critique of the major themes introduced by the director. The films, forums, and background research will serve as a vehicle for developing and improving all aspects of communication in Italian from the spoken to the written language. Film selections will range from the classics to recent popular hits. The course will be conducted in Italian.  Students will expand and enrich their vocabulary and grammar knowledge through exercises and essays related to the movies screened.  The course will be conducted in Italian.   Prerequisite or permission of the instructor', '82-262', None), '82-342': Course('Spain: Language and Culture', '82-342', 9, 'This course is part of the post-intermediate, 300-level program that forms the introduction to the major or minor in Spanish. Students may begin with any one of the three or they may be taken concurrently. Spain focuses on the cultures of Spain, the autonomous regions and the creation of a national identity as a reaction to the multiple ethnicity&#8217;s that have inhabited the peninsula since ancient times. The course advances proficiency in grammatical accuracy, the ability to communicate one&#8217;s ideas in Spanish, and cultural proficiency. The focus of in-class activities is on written and non-written sources such as history, literature, film, art, and elements of popular culture; the building of reading and writing skills will be complemented by continued oral practice in the form of small and large group discussions and class presentations. Treatment of reading selections is designed to increase students general familiarity with a variety of genres, devices, and discourse types and to build a foundation for the department&#8217;s more advanced courses in literature, history and culture. Writing assignments will involve reflective essays, individualized research, and the generation, expression, analysis and re-writing of ideas.  Prerequisite: Completion of 82-242 or the equivalent or permission of the instructor.', 'Completion of 82-242 or the equivalent or permission of the instructor', None), '82-334': Course('Structure of Chinese', '82-334', 9, 'This is an upper-level Chinese course for students who have reached intermediate level of Chinese. It aims at helping students to further develop and refine their Chinese speaking and writing skills. This course will deal with major structural phenomena in Modern Chinese through the study of sample texts. Special emphasis will be given to high frequent errors and individual weaknesses on particular problematic elements and sentence structures that are common among non-native Chinese speakers. After the study of this class, students are expected to have a more comprehensive and systematic understanding of the structure of the language, which will help them lay a solid foundation for their language proficiency. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-232 or 82-235', None), '82-337': Course('Mandarin Chinese for Oral Communication', '82-337', 9, 'FALL 2013  Mandarin Chinese for Oral Communication (82-337): Tell Us A Story  When we were kids, we learned our first language not from lectures, textbooks, character quizzes, or tests, but from stories that our parents told us at the breakfast table, on our way to school, in a quiet afternoon, or at night before bedtime. In storytelling, we never realized that we were learning a language, but the language just came to us, grew in us, and became a part of ourselves. Part of the purpose of this course is to evoke those language-learning moments of storytelling that have been buried deep in our childhood memory. By way of telling, writing and rewriting a variety of stories, legends, and tales of ancient Chinese origin, this course encourages students to explore new ways to improve their Chinese speaking, reading and writing skills through learning and mastering the art of storytelling. A variety of storytelling activities, including group storytelling, interactive storytelling, picture storytelling, jigsaw storytelling, will be introduced in class. In addition, students will also be introduced to the social, literary, and cultural background of the stories, and learn to appreciate their special roles and significance in traditional Chinese literary and cultural history.   Prerequisite: 82-232 or permission of the instructor', '82-232 or permission of the instructo', None), '82-344': Course('U.S. Latinos: Language and Culture', '82-344', 9, 'The purpose of this course is to provide review and practice of the four  skills ? reading, writing, listening and speaking ? at the advanced level,  in Spanish. All work in this course, in the four skill areas, will be  stimulated by and be the product of an advanced introduction to and  analysis of the cultures and histories of the Hispanic peoples in the  United States of America.  Many of these people have been and are native  born; others are descendants of natives and/or colonizers who resided in  North America prior to the arrival of Anglo-Germanic peoples.  Many havae  migrated from Mexico, the Hispanic Caribbean, Central and South America,  and Spain during the past two centuries, for economic and/or political  reasons. Still others have migrated under special circumstances, as exiles  escaping from repressive regimes or from wars in their homelands. Our  exploration of U.S. Latino history and culture will compare and contrast  the experiences of Hispanics from all three of the above-described  categories and analyze the dynamic tension amongst them, with other  minority groups, and with the mainstream society.  Prerequisite: Completion of the intermediate level or equivalent or permission of the instructor.', 'Completion of the intermediate level or equivalent or permission of the instructor', None), '82-345': Course('Introduction to Hispanic Literary and Cultural Studies', '82-345', 9, 'FALL 2013  Hispanic Literary and Cultural Studies: The Case of the Hispanic Detective  The development of a specific and idiosyncratic detective genre in Spain and Latin America is considered one of the most important cultural phenomena in the Hispanic World since the second half of the 20th century. This course is a thematic introduction to the cultural production of the transatlantic, Hispanic world (Spain and the Americas) through the lens of the Hispanic detective genre as presented in texts, film, music, and other arts.  We will be using detective texts as a tool to increase linguistic and cultural proficiency, while also pairing them up with a selection of theoretical readings in order to gain knowledge about the development of the genre, often comparing it to the Anglo- and Francophone models.  More importantly, we will use these texts as a means to inquire about the crucial roles played by language and discourse, politics, religion, and economic factors in the constant shaping and reshaping of the histories and cultures of the Hispanic world; likewise, these texts will be used to explore relevant and current issues such as socioeconomic, racial, and gender inequalities, immigration and exile, etc.  Materials will include classic literary texts by Borges, Ocampo, Taibo II, Piglia, and V&#225;zquez Montalb&#225;n, among others, alongside notable and more recent examples of the genre in various formats. Assignments will include reading, researching, writing, presenting orally individually and in groups, as well as 2 quizzes, a midterm exam and a final project. This course will prepare specialists and non-specialists in Spanish for advanced study at the 400-level and beyond.   Prerequisite: Completion of two out of three 300-level Hispanic Studies courses (82-342, 82-343, or 82-344 )or permission of the instructor.', 'Completion of two out of three 300-level Hispanic Studies courses (82-342, 82-343, or 82-344 )or permission of the instructor', None), '82-489': Course('Service Learning in the Community', '82-489', None, 'This is a community-based research (CBR) course for advanced students who wish to bridge service and action research. 82-489 provides an experiential component that allows students to use their second language and culture skills while acquiring or honing their research skills. CBR helps bridge the gap between university and community life to facilitate the development of life-long learning habits and humanistic citizenship. ML students and faculty  will jointly design and execute ways in which to &#8216;give back&#8217; to the community being studied, which will be chosen based upon the language, culture and/or history of a specific community. Students in this course my participate in historical, ethnographic and cultural research; ethnographic fieldwork; problem solving activities around a particular issue the community is facing; discover how to to best identify a particular linguistic/cultural community and document, interpret, preserve and disseminate its history and culture. Class activities may include group, pair and independent reading and research; group and pair travel; group, pair and one-on-one interaction with community members; public presentations; photography, filming, scanning; webpage and document design; and different kinds of writing. Prerequisite: Completion of all 300-level coursework, or an approved equivalent, or permission of the Instructor.', 'Completion of all 300-level coursework, or an approved equivalent, or permission of the Instructor', None), '82-488': Course('Lanuage Learing in a Study Abroad Context', '82-488', 9, None, '', None), '82-483': Course('Topics in Modern Languages', '82-483', None, 'Introduces students to research methodology as it applies to language learning and language teaching.  An examination of different approaches currently used in Second Language Acquisition (SLA) research ranging from experimental studies to case studies.  The goal is to develop an ability to critically evaluate, design and implement sound SLA research. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-481': Course('Research Methods in Second Language Acquisition', '82-481', 9, 'The course introduces students to research methodology as it applies to language learning and language teaching. It provides an examination of different approaches currently used in Second Language Acquisition (SLA) research ranging from experimental studies to survey investigations. The goal is to develop an ability to critically evaluate, design and implement sound SLA research. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-480': Course('Social and Cognitive Aspects of Bilingualism', '82-480', 9, 'This course introduces students to the nature and extent of bilingualism in individuals and diverse communities in the US and abroad, with an emphasis on the social, historical and political forces that shape the language varieties and abilities of bilinguals. There is also a brief exploration of the psycholinguistic features that characterize bilingual individuals. It also addresses the challenges and opportunities that bilingualism posses for multilingual societies and individuals. Students will develop their knowledge and critical analysis skills of bilingualism through readings, group discussions, field projects and a research paper. Pre-requisites: Students must have completed 82-280, 82-180, 82-384, 82-382 or by permission of the instructor.', '82-382 or 82-384 or 82-180 or 82-280', None), '82-487': Course('Writing in a Second Language', '82-487', 9, 'This course will provide students with a comprehensive understanding of second language (L2) writing by surveying fundamental issues and the relations between empirical research, alternative theoretical perspectives, and pedagogical practices in L2 writing.  Topics include text, psychological, and social models of L2 writing instruction and learning.  Students are expected to carry out a research project on a focused topic of their choosing concerning L2 writing. Prerequisite or permission of the Instructor.', '82-383 or 82-783', None), '82-486': Course('Independent Study in Languages', '82-486', None, 'An opportunity for students who wish to complement their course work at the 400-level and pursue further advanced study.  In conjunction with a faculty member, students will arrange a program of study to explore aspects of the target language and culture. Prerequisite: Permission of the Instructor.', 'Permission of the Instructor', None), '82-485': Course('Topics in Modern Languages, Literature and Cultures', '82-485', None, None, '', None), '82-484': Course('Language Assessment', '82-484', 9, 'Theoretical and practical study of aspects of language testing.  Purposes and types of language tests are examined in relation to theories of language use and language teaching goals.  Testing practices and procedures related to language research and language teaching are also discussed.  The course also includes the planning, writing, and administration of tests, and basic test analysis. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-262': Course('Intermediate Italian II', '82-262', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the Italian language and culture by means of grammar review, literary and cultural readings and analysis, and intensive practice in written and spoken Italian.  This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Italian.  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-261', None), '82-261': Course('Intermediate Italian I', '82-261', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the Italian language and culture by means of grammar review, literary and cultural readings and analysis, and intensive practice in written and spoken Italian.  This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Italian. A two-semester course sequence (82-261, 82-262) for intermediate-level students.  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-162 or 82-163', None), '82-172': Course('Elementary Japanese II', '82-172', 12, 'This course is a sequel to Elementary Japanese I (82-171) and continues to further the development of communicative language proficiency through oral practice, aural comprehension, reading, writing, and the study of cultural aspects of Japanese society. Furthermore, the elementary-level language course is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Four hours in-class instruction per week, plus mandatory homework assignments.  Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-171', None), '82-171': Course('Elementary Japanese I', '82-171', 12, 'This course is the first part of a two-semester course sequence (82-171, 82-172) for students with no background in Japanese.  It emphasizes the development of communicative language proficiency through oral practice, aural comprehension, reading, writing, and the study of cultural aspects of Japanese society. Furthermore, the elementary-level language course is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Four hours in-class instruction per week, plus mandatory homework.  Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-176': Course('Intensive Japanese Language and Culture: Elementary Level', '82-176', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in Japan or other approved program at the Elementary level. Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for Japanese.', '', None), '82-378': Course('Japanese Conversation Analysis', '82-378', 9, "Through analysis of various registers of the Japanese Spoken language, this course aims to provide analytical tools for Japanese conversational analysis and to provide opportunities to students to practice high proficiency level of oral communication skills such as formal speech, job interviews, and business communication. Formality, politeness, and gender differences are some of the major topics discussed in this course as well as speakers' perspectives, attitudes and emotions. This course is offered in Japanese. Prerequisites or approved equivalent.", '82-272', None), '82-374': Course('Technical Japanese', '82-374', 9, 'This course seeks to (1) introduce students to technical Japanese or Japanese language used in the field of science and technology, (2) acquaint them with current issues in Japan involving science and technology and (3) deepen their understanding of the science and technology culture of Japan.  It draws on various sources of information such as books, newspapers, video clips, and TV news to familiarize them with current issues in Japan related to science and technology. Through understanding those issues, it enables them to acquire necessary knowledge of technical Japanese and Japanese cultural perspectives on science and technology.  It also requires them to work on an individual project to form and express their own thoughts and opinions on a science and technology issue of their interest.  This course is taught in Japanese.  Prerequisite: 82-272 or approved equivalent', '82-272 or approved equivalen', None), '82-376': Course('Intensive Japanese Language and Culture: Advanced Level', '82-376', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in Japan or other approved program at the advanced level. Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for Japanese.', '', None), '82-371': Course('Advanced Japanese I', '82-371', 9, "A two-semester course sequence (82-371, 82-372). This course emphasizes the acquisition of an advanced level of communicative language proficiency by immersing students in authentic cultural explorations.  Curriculum includes authentic reading texts, audiovisual materials, interviews with native speakers, and viewing and summarizing Japanese films that depict current Japanese society and cultural trend.    The course also provides an individualized learning environment throughout the term in improving students' language skills and cultural proficiency. Students may pick a topic of personal interest for their term project thesis.   Prerequisite or approved equivalent.", '82-272', None), '82-373': Course('Structure of the Japanese Language', '82-373', 9, 'This course examines the basic Japanese grammar covered in elementary and intermediate Japanese courses by comparison with English and aids students in systematizing their knowledge of Japanese and in deepening their understanding of Japanese culture (i.e., cultural ways of thinking underlying Japanese verbal behaviors).  After a brief discussion of the overall typological differences between the two languages and an initial training to analyze them cross-linguistically, it deals with specific areas of grammar that exhibit pervasive structural and semantic differences and serve as exercises for cross-linguistic analysis.  On the basis of the discussions and exercises in class, students gather and analyze relevant Japanese data for their project, which facilitates their understanding of the grammar points and cultural ways of thinking in question and develops their analytical skills.  This course is taught in Japanese. This course is taught in Japanese.', '', '82-272'), '82-372': Course('Advanced Japanese II', '82-372', 9, "A sequel to Advanced Japanese I (82-371).  This course continues to further improve the acquisition of the advanced level communicative language proficiency by immersing students in authentic cultural explorations.    Curriculum includes authentic reading texts, audiovisual materials, interviews with native speakers, and viewing and summarizing Japanese films that depict current Japanese society and cultural trend.   The course also provides an individualized learning environment throughout the term in improving students' language skills and cultural proficiency. Students may pick a topic of personal interest for their term project thesis.   Prerequisite or approved equivalent.", '82-371', None), '82-420': Course('German Classical Literature', '82-420', 9, "This course, conducted entirely in German, provides a basic introduction to the literature of Enlightenment, Sturm und Drang, and classicism in Germany during the second half of the eighteenth century and at the beginning of the nineteenth century.  Classical literature appeared in Germany at a later date than in the other major European countries; for this reason German classical literature tends to be more accessible linguistically to contemporary readers than some other classical literatures.  The course will begin with the remarkably lucid and relevant work of Lessing, in particular his plays Emilia Galotti and Nathan der Weise&#8212;both programmatic statements of Enlightenment rationality and critical bourgeois consciousness.  We will then move on to the brief but important Sturm und Drang period, exploring Goethe's revolutionary novel Die Leiden des jungen Werther, Schiller's radical drama Die R&#228;uber, and Lenz's disturbing play Der Hofmeister.  The focus will be on Sturm und Drang as a uniquely German phenomenon, and on the reasons for its rapid development and quick demise.  Our exploration of classical literature will culminate with Goethe's Faust I, one of the great masterpieces of western literature and probably the most celebrated and influential work in the German literary canon.  We will also devote time to close reading and aesthetic appreciation of some of Goethe's most beautiful poems.  An examination of Schiller's letters &#220;ber die &#228;sthetische Erziehung des Menschen will round out our exploration of German classicism as an idealistic aesthetic movement.  Students will be asked to complete five brief writing assignments over the course of the semester, and to take midterm and final examinations. Prerequisite: Completion of 82-325 or approved equivalent.", 'Completion of 82-325 or approved equivalent', None), '82-299': Course('Alternative Break Project (General)', '82-299', None, "This course provides advanced ML language students and non-ML students enrolled in an Alternative Break student trip project the opportunity to earn credit by engaging in &#8220;connected&#8221; modes of knowing, by identifying and analyzing a problem, and developing plans for short-term and sustainable solutions, reflecting, and creating and disseminating an informational and interpretive website and print materials about their experience. Students will also bring to bear or gain experience in non-academic skills/talents/interests in areas like photography, image editing, video production, writing, design, website development, sound recording, and art, etc., by doing community service under the auspices of Carnegie Mellon University's Alternative Break program. Students will earn three (3) units for full participation and fulfillment of course requirements. With the approval of the faculty facilitator, an additional three (3) units may be earned by completing an additional assignment.", '', None), '82-296': Course('A Century of Russian Film', '82-296', 9, 'This course surveys the dominant works, directors and genres that have defined Russian filmmaking from its birth to the present day. Films are screened during required evening class meetings. Films and assigned readings in film history, theory and criticism are discussed during additional required class meetings.', '', None), '82-294': Course('Topics in Russian Language and Culture', '82-294', None, 'This course is taught by visiting faculty members from the Russian State University for the Humanities, and the topic is announced on the occasion of their visit.', '', None), '82-292': Course('Intermediate Russian II', '82-292', 9, 'This course seeks an integrated approach to the study of the Russian language and culture by means of grammar review, literary and cultural readings and analysis, and intensive practice in written and spoken Russian. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Russian. Attendance is required at three-hourly class meetings per week, but sometimes a fourth hour is spent on consultation with a course assistant. One to two hours per day outside of these meetings must be devoted to study and homework assignments. The second part of a two-semester course sequence (82-291, 82-292). Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-291', None), '82-293': Course('Introduction to Russian Culture', '82-293', 9, 'Russia is one of the oldest European countries and long ago achieved world recognition for its outstanding contributions to Western traditions in art, architecture, music and ballet. This introductory course, based on primary documents, secondary readings, film and music, supplies an understanding of the distinctive cultural spirit of this great nation.   Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-291': Course('Intermediate Russian', '82-291', 9, 'This course further develops communicative proficiency through intensive practice in written and spoken Russian. Complex grammatical structures and stylistic variations are mastered and extensive vocabulary is acquired. Through reading materials, fictional and non-fictional, acquaintance is made with the basic components of Russian cultural literacy as well as the distinctive cultural aspects of daily Russian life. Attention is directed toward the dynamic interaction of language and culture in order to foster cross-cultural awareness. Attendance is required at three-hourly class meetings per week, but sometimes a fourth hour is spent on consultation with a course assistant. One to two hours per day outside of these meetings must be devoted to study and homework assignments. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-192', None), '82-450': Course('Advanced Research in Hispanic Language &amp; Culture', '82-450', 9, 'This course permits in-depth, 400-level study in the following courses: 82-342 Spain: Language and Culture, 82-343 Latin America: Language and Culture, and 82-344 U.S. Latinos: Language and Culture. Students will meet with the regularly scheduled 300-level class, read additional texts, and produce research assignments as agreed upon by the Instructor and student. Focus is on a deeper understanding and individualized research of the course topics.   Prerequisite:  By permission of the instructor only.', ' By permission of the instructor only', None), '82-451': Course('Studies in Latin American Literature and Culture', '82-451', 9, 'FALL 2013  &#8220;Latinoam&#233;rica en sus im&#225;genes&#8221;  This course will explore representations of Latin America through a focus on film, documentaries, and the visual arts, including murals, graffiti, photos and posters.  We will focus in particular on the second half of the twentieth century and the twenty-first century. The course will consider several themes: the relationships between aesthetics and socio-historical context and economic systems; how issues of race, ethnicity, gender and class are addressed in film and the visual arts; how to interpret images as cultural artifacts; how the space in which we as viewers &#8211; in a dark theater, in an open, public space, in a museum etc. &#8211; see an image, tempers our reception and interpretation of the work.  In addition to seeing multiple films and documentaries, viewing images, we will also do readings to deepen our understanding of the historical context in which each work was produced, as well as readings of critical theory.  The course will be taught in Spanish.   Prerequisite: 82-345 or permission of Instructor.', '82-345 or permission of Instructor', None), '82-215': Course('Introduction Modern Arabic Literature and Culture', '82-215', None, 'This course is designed to acquaint students with the literature and culture of the Arab world. Through lectures, discussions, and class presentations students will gain knowledge of Arabic fiction and poetry, and examine how these literary productions reflect the cultures, mentalities, and traditions of the Arabs. Students will learn about the religion, social structure, government, and the position of women in the Arab world through presentations of these topics in modern Arabic literature. The course will focus on literature since the beginning of the twentieth century, when the first Arabic novel was published, and also will include a brief survey of older narrative traditions, and how these contributed to modern works.  Course grade will be based on a variable assessment method.  Students will select from diverse options for writing, presenting, and creative production.    With permission of the instructor, it may be possible to earn 3 additional units of credit for work done in Modern Standard Arabic.', '', None), '82-212': Course('Intermediate Arabic II', '82-212', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the Arabic language and culture by means of grammar review, literary and cultural readings and analysis, and intensive practice in written and spoken Arabic. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Arabic. This course is designed to strengthen listening, speaking, reading and writing, within the context of an evolving Arabic culture. Prerequisite, placement score, or permission of the instructor.', '82-112', None), '82-455': Course('Topics in Hispanic Studies', '82-455', 9, 'SPRING 2013  82455/82744 Discourse Analysis in Spanish   This course will provide students with a theoretical framework and analytic tools to investigate how Spanish speakers represent, construct and transform their social worlds. In particular, we will focus on language as a social practice through which power relations are maintained or challenged. We will analyze a variety of spoken and written texts to explore the discourse-semantic and lexico-grammatical features that Spanish users deploy to make meanings and negotiate understandings. This analysis will later be interpreted from an interdisciplinary perspective drawing on social theory and history.   The course is offered in Spanish.   Prerequisite: Completion of 82-345 or permission of Instructor.', 'Completion of 82-345 or permission of Instructor', None), '82-456': Course('Topics in Hispanic Studies', '82-456', 9, "for SPRING 2012: CENTRAL AMERICA TODAY: OUT OF REVOLUTION  This course will focus on contemporary Central America, beginning with an examination of the revolutionary movements and civil wars, but focusing more on the period post 1990, since the signing of the Peace Accords.  Through an analysis of the region's cultural production (literature, documentary film, public art etc.), we will consider a variety of themes relevant to a current understanding of the Central American isthmus, including Human Rights, gender relations, migration, the drug wars, environmental and indigenous rights.  This course will familiarize students with some of the central concepts and debates that surround the study of the Central America. The course will be taught in Spanish.  Prerequisites: 82-345 or permission of instructor.", '82-345 or permission of instructor', None), '82-211': Course('Intermediate Arabic I', '82-211', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the Arabic language and culture by means of grammar review, literary and cultural readings and analysis, and intensive practice in written and spoken Arabic. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in Arabic. This course is designed to strengthen listening, speaking, reading and writing, within the context of an evolving Arabic culture.  Prerequisite or appropriate placement score.', '82-112', None), '82-106': Course('Intensive French Language and Culture: Elementary Level', '82-106', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in France, a French-speaking country, or other approved program at the Elementary level. Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for French.', '', None), '82-341': Course('Advanced Spanish Transfer Credit', '82-341', None, 'This course number is given to pre-approved advanced courses in Grammar, Composition, Conversation, or other appropriate, advanced coursework taken as part of a study abroad program, or at another approved institution.  Prerequisite: Completion of 82-242 or an approved equivalent, or prior permission of the Hispanic Studies major or minor advisor, and confirmation of credit upon return.', 'Completion of 82-242 or an approved equivalent, or prior permission of the Hispanic Studies major or minor advisor, and confirmation of credit upon return', None), '82-104': Course('Elementary French II Online', '82-104', 12, 'This course is designed for students who need a more flexible approach to language learning than that offered in a standard classroom course. The online courseware is video-based with continuous interaction in learning sequences, with additional use of Internet technologies for research, writing and communication. There is one class per week plus individual weekly meetings with a tutor or the instructor for conversation and practice. Students will develop contextually appropriate interpersonal communication skills in both written and spoken French, develop reading and listening skills, understand and begin to control fundamental grammar, acquire vocabulary, and gain a basic understanding of French/francophone cultures. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling. If a student has studied French before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160. NOTE: There is a materials fee for taking this course, which is paid by credit card on first log-in to the course website.  Prerequisites or placement exam.', '82-103 or 82-101', None), '82-343': Course('Latin America: Language and Culture', '82-343', 9, 'This course is part of the post-intermediate, 300-level program that forms the introduction to the major or minor in Spanish. Students may begin with any one of the three or they may be taken concurrently. Latin America focuses on the cultures of Spanish-speaking countries in the Americas (excluding the United States), and the unique hybrid cultures formed from the fusion of indigenous, European and African influences. The course advances proficiency in grammatical accuracy, the ability to communicate one&#8217;s ideas in Spanish, and cultural proficiency. The focus of in-class activities is on written and non-written sources such as history, literature, film, art, and elements of popular culture; the building of reading and writing skills will be complemented by continued oral practice in the form of small and large group discussions and class presentations. Treatment of reading selections is designed to increase students general familiarity with a variety of genres, devices, and discourse types and to build a foundation for the department&#8217;s more advanced courses in literature, history and culture. Writing assignments will involve reflective essays, individualized research, and the generation, expression, analysis and re-writing of ideas. Prerequisite: Completion of 82242 or the equivalent or permission of the instructor.', 'Completion of 82242 or the equivalent or permission of the instructor', None), '82-102': Course('Elementary French II', '82-102', 12, 'This course is designed for students who have taken first-semester French at Carnegie Mellon or its equivalent. Students will develop contextually appropriate interpersonal communication skills in both written and spoken French, develop reading and listening skills through various media (audio CD, video, CD ROM, ML server, Internet), understand and begin to control fundamental grammar, acquire vocabulary, and gain a basic understanding of French/francophone cultures. The elementary level is also designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Regular homework and participation in class are mandatory (four in-class hours per week). If a student has studied French outside of Carnegie Mellon, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for taking the placement exam are in Baker Hall 160.  Prerequisites or placement exam.', '82-101 or 82-103', None), '82-103': Course('Elementary French I Online', '82-103', 12, 'This course is designed for students who have never studied French and who need a more flexible approach to language learning than that offered in a standard classroom course. The online courseware is video-based with continuous interaction in learning sequences, with additional use of Internet technologies for research, writing, and communication. There is one class per week plus individual weekly meetings with a tutor or the instructor for conversation and practice. Students will develop contextually appropriate interpersonal communication skills in both written and spoken French, develop reading and listening skills, understand fundamental grammar, acquire vocabulary, and gain a basic understanding of French/francophone cultures. The elementary level is also designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling. If a student has studied French before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160. NOTE: There is a materials fee for taking this course, which is paid by credit card on first log-in to the course website.  Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-346': Course('Intensive Spanish Language and Culture: Advanced Level', '82-346', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in a Spanish-speaking country or other approved program at the Advanced level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for Spanish.', '', None), '82-101': Course('Elementary French I', '82-101', 12, 'This course is for students who have never studied French. Students will develop contextually appropriate interpersonal communication skills in both written and spoken French, develop reading and listening skills through various media (audio CD, video, CD ROM, ML server, Internet), understand fundamental grammar, acquire vocabulary, and gain a basic understanding of French/francophone cultures. The elementary level is also designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Regular homework and participation in class are mandatory (four in-class hours per week). If a student has studied French before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for taking the placement exam are in Baker Hall 160. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-186': Course('Freshman Seminar: Introduction to Russian Culture', '82-186', 9, 'Please visit the Modern Language Office in Baker Hall  160 for the semester specific description of this course.  This course will deal with important cultural achievements of the Russian people in different areas.  The main focus will be on the analysis of relationships between Russian and Western cultural traditions.  The topics chosen for analysis are significant for Russian cultural history.  Class discussions will help students in understanding and appreciating some specific ways and achievements in the development of Russian popular culture.  Distinctive aspects of Russian high culture will also be highlighted, especially through art and music.  The course will include secondary readings, primary documents, and films. Prerequisite: Freshman status.', 'Freshman status', None), '82-184': Course('Freshman Seminar: The Birth and Death of Tragedy', '82-184', 9, 'This is a freshman seminar, taught in English, and it addresses one of the most important questions in the development of Western culture: what is tragedy, how did it evolve, and what does it mean today?  Starting with Aischeles\' Oresteia and Aristotle\'s Poetics, the seminar explores the nature of tragedy in ancient Greece as a theatrical experience, a literary form, and an expression of Greek culture.  Friedrich Nietzsche\'s essay The Birth of Tragedy offers an interpretation of the meaning of tragedy in its original context and a link to the nature of tragedy in the modern world.  Richard Wagner\'s music drama Tristan und Isolde and his theoretical essays, including "Art and Revolution" and "The Art-Work of the Future," further illustrate and develop the theme, showing how a dominant representative of nineteenth century culture sought to reevaluate and reclaim the tragic form, linking it with an extensive critique of modern culture.  Thomas Mann\'s Death in Venice provides an early twentieth century variation on the theme of tragedy, and Sigmund Freud\'s Civilization and its Discontents, like Nietzsche\'s essay, provides a framework for placing tragedy in its cultural context.  Finally, Arthur Miller\'s Death of a Salesman provides a modern American version of the problem of tragedy.  Students in this seminar are asked to write short papers every two to three weeks, and the in-class focus is on intensive discussion and analysis of the texts. Prerequisite: Freshman status.', 'Freshman status', None), '82-422': Course('German Literature of the Early Twentieth Century', '82-422', 9, 'From its inception in 1871, The Second German Empire promised to be an industrial, cultural and military powerhouse on the continent of Europe.  But when the hand of the Iron Chancellor, Otto von Bismarck, was removed from the helm by Kaiser Wilhelm II in 1890, the "New Germany" charted a course that would lead to a catastrophic conflict with its neighbors to the west (England and France) and to the east (Russia).  This course exams works by some of the major authors of this period (Mann, Wedekind, Hauptmann, Rilke, Kafka) as well as modern film adaptations of their works.  Readings will also include seminal thinkers such as Nietzsche, Freud, Marx and Einstein.  And, we will engage the visual arts through a survey of the German Expressionists.  The purpose of this course is to examine a wide variety of "cultural artifacts" against the backdrop of the political, social, and economic currents of the period.   Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-325', None), '82-182': Course('Freshman Seminar: Language and Culture: Language in its Social Context', '82-182', 9, 'This course will explore the relationship between language and culture as it manifests itself in language use in a wide variety of speech communities throughout the world.  The purpose of the course will be to demonstrate the multifaceted and complex relationship between language and culture and how language use both exemplifies cultural values and simultaneously serves to reinforce them.  The course will consider a wide variety of topics, all of which demonstrate implicit cultural differences and attitudes as manifested through language use.  Illustrative examples include analysis of the relationship between language and thought (the Sapir-Whorf linguistic relativity hypothesis); standard versus vernacular languages; attitudes toward language acquisition as it differs from one speech community to another; bilingualism and multiculturalism in this country and throughout the world; diglossia; language, literacy and education; non-verbal aspects of language use; gender-based differences in language and culture; sociolinguistic variables in the ethnography of speaking; language loss and language maintenance; politics, language planning and language policy and the impact of languages in contact.  Prerequisite: Freshman status.', 'Freshman status', None), '82-183': Course('Freshman Seminar: Constructions of Memory and Modernity', '82-183', 9, 'This course will focus on the arts in society during the period of intense modernization that begins in the middle of the nineteenth century (the Second Empire in France), with an emphasis on the late nineteenth century and the early years of the twentieth century (approximately until the time of World War I [1914-1918]).  We will read a wide range of literary, historical, and cultural works in an interdisciplinary, comparative perspective.  Our focus is on the cultures of Western Europe and the U.S., with an emphasis on French, Anglo-Irish and English, and German works; the readings will be complemented by study of the visual arts, especially Impressionism and photography, theater, and opera.  We will view some of the latter works on film and video, when available. Prerequisite: Freshman status.', 'Freshman status', None), '82-180': Course('Freshman Seminar', '82-180', 9, 'Picasso and Matisse: Artistic Friends or Foes?   Henri Matisse and Pablo Picasso were arguably the greatest of the 20th century Europeans artists. Opinions are divided as to which was the greatest. They first met in Paris in1906 and continued their contact - sometimes personal, sometimes via friends, dealers and collectors, sometimes by &#8220;spying&#8221; on each other&#8217;s work from that moment until Matisse&#8217;s death in 1954. Much has been written about their relationship, their influence on each other and whether or not they were really friends or foes. This course will examine closely the work of each of these two masters within the context of 20th century European art. It will look at them individually and comparatively, studying their paintings, sculpture, work in clay and glass as well as their personal relationship.  Readings will include personal testimony from those who knew them well, traditional art history texts, several catalogues from major exhibits that compared their work and several videos from these exhibits. Students will be expected to become familiar with the major contributions each of these artists made to 20th century art as well as to the cultural milieu in which they lived and worked.  Prerequisite:  Freshman Status.', ' Freshman Status', None), '82-181': Course('Freshman Seminar: Introduction to Russian Culture and Civilization', '82-181', 9, 'This course is intended to fulfill the Freshman Seminar requirement of the General Education Program.    This course will deal with the significant cultural achievements of the Russian people in different fields of culture.  The main focus will be on the analysis of relationships between Russian and Western cultural traditions.  The topics chosen for discussions are very important for Russian cultural history and will help in understanding and appreciating some specific ways and achievements in the development of Russian popular culture. Distinctive cultural achievements of Russian high culture will also be highlighted, especially through art and music.  In addition to reading assignments, seminar discussions and papers in the history of Russian culture and civilization, students will be taken to the performances of the Pittsburgh Symphony and Pittsburgh Opera. Attendance at all cultural events is required.  Prerequisite: Freshman status.', 'Freshman status', None), '82-427': Course('Nazi and Resistance Culture', '82-427', 9, 'How could the land of Goethe and Beethoven also have produced Hitler and the Holocaust?" This is a question that has frequently been posed about Germany. Germany has arguably been the dominant country in Western musical development since the sixteenth century; it has also witnessed an extraordinary flowering of literature, philosophy, and the visual arts. This course, conducted entirely in German exclusively for students with superior German-language skills, will explore what happened to German culture from 1933 to 1945. In particular, it will examine the Nazi assault on modern (or "degenerate") art and the artistic response of the German and foreign resistance to Nazi tyranny. Arts explored will include literature, film, music, and the visual arts. We will read from the works of a variety of writers, including &#195;&#8211;don von Horvath, Anna Seghers, Bertolt Brecht, Adolf Hitler, Albert Speer, Hanns Johst, Paul Celan, and Wilfrid Bade. Film will also play a major role in the course, and students will be required to view (outside of class) and discuss six Nazi-era films, including Veit Harlan&#8217;s infamous anti-Semitic Jud S&#252;&#223;, Rolf Hansen&#8217;s Nazi musical romance Die gro&#223;e Liebe, and Charlie Chaplin&#8217;s The Great Dictator. Students will be required to lead a classroom discussion, to write a major essay, to write a &#8220;Protokoll&#8221;, to complete all required readings, and to participate actively in classroom discussion, in German. Prerequisite or approved equivalent', '82-325', None), '82-281': Course('Tutoring for Community Outreach', '82-281', 9, '6-9 units   Students participate in a community outreach program and work in the Pittsburgh Public Schools with either elementary school, middle school, or high school students, and, depending on the site, foster their studies of Chinese, French, German, Japanese, Spanish or ESL. The elementary school experience will involve regular visits, mentoring, and tutoring at school sites in the East End of Pittsburgh. The middle school experience provides opportunity for tutoring in Japanese, French, or Spanish at Barak Obama Academy of International Studies. The high school experience invites advanced students, majors, or minors in Chinese, French, German, Japanese, or Spanish to work with language students and teachers at local high schools. During the early weeks of the semester, students will meet to arrange their outreach activities and prepare for their experience. Depending on the number of units to be earned, students will spend a certain number of hours per week engaged in some of the following activities: attending and participating in the individual and group meetings, tutoring four to six hours per week, reading and preparing for the school visits, keeping a journal of tutoring experiences, writing a paper or completing a project at the end of the term that reflects experiences. Students earn 6 units by spending 4 hours per week at a school site plus completing related activities. Students earn 9 units by spending 6 hours per week at a school site plus completing related activities. Prerequisites: Permission of the faculty liaison plus completion of an information sheet available in the Department of Modern Languages and clearance forms available though the Leonard Gelfand Center for Service Learning and Outreach.', 'Permission of the faculty liaison plus completion of an information sheet available in the Department of Modern Languages and clearance forms available though the Leonard Gelfand Center for Service Learning and Outreach', None), '82-280': Course('Learning About Language Learning', '82-280', 9, 'This seminar focuses on the role of diverse affective, cognitive and social factors in second language learning.  All participating students are required to be studying an additional language while taking this seminar.  Each class is devoted to discussion of assigned readings as well as to completion of various measures, inventories or questionnaires that assess diverse predictors of second language learning.  These data are collected throughout the term, and then analyzed and related to predictions based upon previous research that have been discussed in class.  Each student also identifies a &#8220;good&#8221; or a &#8220;poor&#8221; second language learner to interview and then report back to the class on the learners&#8217; characteristics. Co-requisite: Study of a foreign language.', '', None), '82-282': Course('Community Service Learning', '82-282', 9, "82-282 Community Service Learning Carnegie Mellon University in Qatar - Spring 2010   Instructor: Silvia Pessoa: spessoa@qatar.cmu.edu Units: 9 units  Course Description:  In this course students will work in the community to promote learning of cultures and languages.   For Spring 2010 in Qatar, participants in this course will work with the Reach Out to Asia's Adult English Literacy (RAEL) program for migrant workers.   In this course, students will attend class twice a week and spend three hours weekly teaching English in the literacy program.  During the early weeks of the semester, students will read about and discuss best practices in adult education, and will familiarize themselves with the program&#8217;s objectives and outcomes and the migrant worker student population.  The rest of the semester will be spent on preparing for each week&#8217;s teaching, teaching an adult literacy evening class, and reflecting upon the experience.  Grade will be based on the student's participation in the program and the completion of a weekly journal and  a final paper or project about their experience.   Prerequisite: Permission of the instructor.", 'Permission of the instructor', None), '82-204': Course('Intermediate French II Online', '82-204', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the French language and culture by means of grammar review, literary and cultural readings and analysis, and intensive practice in written and spoken French. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in French.  A continuation of 82-203, Intermediate French I Online, with an emphasis on francophone cultures outside of France. There is a required weekly class meeting for training and for group activities, plus individual weekly meetings with a tutor or the Instructor for conversation and practice. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling.  Students new to French study at Carnegie Mellon must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160.  NOTE: There is a *required* $50 materials fee for taking this course.  This fee has to be paid by the end of add/drop to avoid removal from the class.', '82-201 or 82-203', None), '82-206': Course('Intensive French Language and Culture: Intermediate Level', '82-206', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in France, a French-speaking country, or other approved program at the Intermediate level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for French.', '', None), '82-201': Course('Intermediate French I', '82-201', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the French language and culture by means of grammar review, literary and cultural readings and analysis, and intensive practice in written and spoken French. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in French. This course is designed to strengthen listening, speaking, reading and writing, within the context of evolving Frenchand Francophone cultures. Varying with each semester, the course will use classic French and Francophone texts as well as songs, excerpts from newspapers, magazines or films.  Prerequisites or appropriate placement test score.', '82-104 or 82-102', None), '82-200': Course('Alternative Break Project (General)', '82-200', None, None, '', None), '82-203': Course('Intermediate French I Online', '82-203', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the French language and culture by means of grammar review, literary and cultural readings and analysis, and intensive practice in written and spoken French. This course explores definitions of culture and analyzes the dynamic role of language in culture and culture in language, with an aim to foster cross-cultural awareness and self-realization while developing proficiency in French.  This course is a parallel offering designed for students who need a more flexible approach to language learning than that offered in a standard classroom course. All materials are Web-based, with extensive use of Internet technologies for research, writing and communication. There is a required weekly class meeting for training and for group activities, plus individual weekly meetings with a tutor or the instructor for conversation and practice. See www.languageonline.org for a more detailed description of requirements and class structure before enrolling.  Prerequisite: 82-102, 82-104, or placement score. Students new to French study at Carnegie Mellon must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160.  NOTE: There is a *required* materials fee for taking this course.  This fee has to be paid by the end of add/drop to avoid removal from the class.', '82-102, 82-104, or placement score. Students new to French study at Carnegie Mellon must take the placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are in BH 160.  NOTE: There is a *required* materials fee for taking this course.  This fee has to be paid by the end of add/drop to avoid removal from the class', None), '82-202': Course('Intermediate French II', '82-202', 9, 'An integrated approach to the study of the French culture and language by means of literary and cultural texts and analysis, coupled with a review of elements of French grammar. Intensive practice in written and spoken French also constitutes the basis for this course as a preparation for the advanced level. Students are invited to explore the French and Francophone worlds as they intersect and sometimes clash, with the goal of fostering better cross-cultural awareness. Texts may include: novels, short stories, newspaper articles, songs, television and film.  Prerequisites or appropriate placement test score.', '82-201 or 82-203', None), '82-446': Course('Political Drama of Spain', '82-446', 9, 'This course will focus on political drama from Spain. The themes of tyranny, oppression, freedom, and honor will be examined in works by Spanish playwrights such as Miguel de Cervantes, Lope de Vega, Calder&#243;n, the Duke of Rivas, Alfonso Sastre, and Antonio Buero Vallejo. Special attention will be given to the social and historical contexts of the works. Films and critical articles will complement the study of the primary texts. Readings, class discussions, and all assignments will be in Spanish.   Prerequisite: Completion of 82-345 or permission of the instructor.', 'Completion of 82-345 or permission of the instructor', None), '82-445': Course('U.S. Latino Literature', '82-445', 9, 'This course proposes to problematize socio-political and historico-cultural issues concerning U.S. Latinos and Hispanic immigrants in the United States.  This will involve the analysis and application of assimilation, transculturation and bilingualism theory, and rhetorical/translational problematics of the material under examination.  Also of interest will be an ongoing class discussion of Latinos/Hispanics in history, the media, entertainment, politics and education.  We shall also discuss the "borders," geographical, political and societal, that may or do exist between U.S. mainstream society, Latinos and Hispanic immigrants and strategies employed by hypenated-Americans for overcoming, subverting or undermining this situation.  Materials for the course will include literature, film, essays and music by and about Latinos and Hispanics in the United States. Prerequisite or permission of the instructor.', '82-345', None), '82-444': Course('The Structure of Spanish', '82-444', 9, 'Spring 2012  82-444 Discourse analysis in Spanish  Overview: This course will provide students with a theoretical framework and analytic tools to investigate how Spanish speakers represent, construct and transform their social worlds. In particular, we will focus on language as a social practice through which power relations are maintained or challenged. We will analyze a variety of spoken and written texts to explore the discourse-semantic and lexico-grammatical features that Spanish users deploy to make meanings and negotiate understandings. This analysis will later be interpreted from an interdisciplinary perspective drawing on social theory and history. The course is offered in Spanish.', '82-345', None), '82-111': Course('Elementary Arabic I', '82-111', 12, 'An introduction to Arabic for students with no previous background in the language.  Listening, speaking, reading, and writing skills are developed in a context that introduces information on culture and life in the Arabic-speaking countries of today.  The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study.  Four hours of in-class instruction per week. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-110': Course('Self-Study in Less Commonly Taught Languages', '82-110', None, 'Students who pursue study of a less-commonly taught language that is not offered by the Department of Modern Languages may receive appropriate credit for their work if they demonstrate successful completion of their study at an approved institution of higher learning.  The course may provide the option for individualized language instruction for students working at their own pace in consultation with an instructor using materials identified by the National Association of Self Instructional Language Programs. Courses must emphasize the development of oral-aural skills and introduce basic reading and writing. Students must be prepared to devote at least 15 hours per week to individual study in addition to the time spent each week in consultation with their instructor. Enrollment in the course is limited. Permission of the Department Head is needed to take this course.', '', None), '82-441': Course('Studies in Peninsular Literature and Culture', '82-441', 9, 'SPRING 2013  Panoramic Bodies: A dissection of twentieth century peninsular texts  This course is part of the post-intermediate, 400-level program that forms the basis for the major or minor in Spanish.  During this course we will consider various texts that serve to develop definitions of the Spanish body and, in turn, the Spanish identity of the Twentieth century.  From Vel&#225;zquez and Goya to Picasso and Dal&#237;, the Spanish body has been employed to communicate the grotesque, distorted and abnormal.  These plastic images are also reflected in other texts such as the novels, poems and essays of Cervantes, Quevedo, B&#233;cquer and Gald&#243;s.  A brief historical introduction into those texts contributing to an explanation of the Spanish body will serve to set the basis for an in depth analysis of how this foundation continues, is broken or is distorted in the Twentieth century.  Through a panorama of texts, from film, essay and novel, to art, installation and architecture, this course will study the body as related to its political, social, emotional and psychological surroundings. That is, we will examine texts in order to further understand the Spanish body and by doing so further comprehend the Spanish identity.    Prerequisite: Completion of 82-345 or permission of Instructor.', 'Completion of 82-345 or permission of Instructor', None), '82-112': Course('Elementary Arabic II', '82-112', 12, 'This course is designed for students who have taken first-semester Arabic at Carnegie Mellon or its equivalent.  The emphasis is on all four skills (listening, speaking, reading, and writing) and on cultural information as it is presented in class and through homework assignments.  Regular participation in class is mandatory (four in-class hours per week).  In addition, students will be required to spend some time in the Modern Language Resource Center (MLRC) using different multimedia tools to complete assignments.  Information on how to use these tools will be provided.  The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study.     If a student has studied Arabic before, then s/he must take the placement exam.  Instructions for taking the placement exam are in Baker Hall 160.     Prerequisite or appropriate placement test score.', '82-111', None), '82-191': Course('Elementary Russian I', '82-191', 12, 'This course begins the Russian language sequence and is offered in the Fall semester only. The course takes a communicative approach to teaching basic skills in listening, speaking, reading and writing. Language is presented in communicative contexts illustrating cultural aspects of daily Russian life. Special emphasis is given to developing oral competency. Attendance is required at four hourly class meetings per week. Sometimes a fifth hour per week is spent on consultation and conversation practice with a course assistant. One to two hours per day must be devoted to study and homework assignments. The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study.   Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-192': Course('Elementary Russian II', '82-192', 12, 'The second part of a two-semester course sequence (82-191, 82-192). Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-191', None), '82-198': Course('Research Training: Modern Language', '82-198', 9, 'FALL 2013  82-198 A, Research Training: Modern Languages, 9 units  Professor Therese Tardio email: tardio@andrew.cmu.edu  Gender and Human Rights in Central America  This project examines gender violence in the context of human rights abuses that occurred during civil wars in El Salvador and Guatemala, and considers to what extent gender violence specifically has been addressed by Truth and Reconciliation Commissions after the signing of Peace Accords in the early 90s.  We will explore how testimonios, documentary film and photojournalism have been utilized to struggle for justice and to inform the practices of memory.  Students will do theoretical and critical readings, as well as analyze a variety of materials, including court documents, photos, film and testimonios.     Some readings are in English but most are in Spanish, thus an advanced intermediate level of reading knowledge is required.  Open to one or two students.', '', None), '82-323': Course('Germany, Austria and Switzerland in the 20th Century', '82-323', 9, 'This course advances proficiency in communicative and grammatical skills in the German language and knowledge of German-speaking cultures through the study of important events, trends, and people of the twentieth century in Germany, Austria, and Switzerland. Examples will be drawn from literature, newspapers, television, film and other sources. Students will be expected to complete assignments that demonstrate the ability to express critical judgments in both written and oral form, documented through readings and personal research. The course includes a review of the most troublesome points of German grammar.  Prerequisite or permission of the instructor.', '82-222', None), '82-320': Course('Contemporary Society in German, Austria and Switzerland', '82-320', 9, 'This course advances proficiency in communicative and grammatical skills in the German language and knowledge of German-speaking cultures through the study of important events, trends, and people of contemporary Germany, Austria, and Switzerland. Examples will be drawn from literature, newspapers, television, film and other sources. Students will be expected to complete assignments that demonstrate the ability to express critical judgments in both written and oral form, documented through readings and personal research. The course includes a systematic review of German grammar.  Prerequisites or permission of the instructor.  Prerequisite or with permission of the instructor.', '82-222', None), '82-326': Course('Intensive German Language and Culture: Advanced Level', '82-326', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in Germany, a German-speaking country, or other approved program at the Advanced level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for German.', '', None), '82-327': Course('The Emergence of the German Speaking World', '82-327', 9, 'The Italian literary theorist Franco Moretti has written that "Germany is a sort of Magic Stage, where the symbolic antagonisms of European culture achieve a metaphysical intractability, and clash irreconcilably. It is the centre and catalyst of the integrated historical system we call Europe." This course is a general introduction to German culture, German history, and German society, with a focus on Germany\'s role as center and catalyst of the European system. The course is conducted entirely in German. Its goal is to provide students with a basic level of cultural literacy about the German-speaking world. In the course, we will study major trends from the earliest days of German civilization through the middle ages but with primary emphasis on the 18th, 19th and 20th centuries and with a special focus on problems of national, political and cultural identity. Students coming out of the course should have a broad understanding of the various tensions and problems that have characterized German culture and society for the last two centuries. In addition to broadening students\' cultural knowledge about the German-speaking world, this course will continue to emphasize the improvement of students\' ability to speak, read, write, and listen to German. Prerequisites or permission of the instructor.', '82-320 or 82-324 or 82-323', None), '82-231': Course('Intermediate Chinese I', '82-231', 12, 'This course is the continuation of Elementary Chinese II (82-132). Students will continue to learn the basic skills of listening, speaking, reading and writing for daily communication. More variety of expressions and complicated sentence structures will be taught so that students can carry on more sophisticated daily conversations on various topics related to every day life. While equal emphasis will still be given to both Pinyin and characters, students will be encouraged to use more and more Chinese characters with the help of Pinyin.  Activities related to the broad spectrum of the Chinese culture will be organized to facilitate the language learning with knowledge of the cultural background of the language. Prerequisite or permission of the instructor.', '82-134 or 82-135 or 82-132', None), '82-232': Course('Intermediate Chinese II', '82-232', 12, 'This is the second semester of Intermediate Chinese, a continuation of the Elementary Chinese course for beginning Chinese students. It aims at helping students expand their vocabulary and knowledge of grammar of the Chinese language by learning more new words, expressions and sentence patterns needed for everyday communication and by consolidating their knowledge through oral and written practice in and out of class.  In this course, students will participate in classroom discussions in Mandarin Chinese on various topics concerning everyday life and study and learn to write short paragraphs on those topics in Chinese characters.  Different aspects of Chinese culture will also be introduced throughout the course through audio and video tapes, lectures and discussions. Prerequisite or permission of the instructor.', '82-231', None), '82-439': Course('Modern China Through Literature', '82-439', 12, 'This course introduces major Chinese writers and literary works in the twentieth century, emphasizing the intricate relationship between literature and modern China&#8217;s social, political and cultural changes.  Students will learn to develop analytical skills to appreciate the aesthetic values of Chinese literary works and to explore the major issues of modernity in relation to tradition, gender, nation-state, and revolution.  The class will be conducted primarily in discussion format.  Students are expected to read all Chinese literary works in English translation, but Chinese majors and minors who take the course for extra language credits will read some selected pieces in Chinese original and do some writings in Chinese.  This is a variable unit course (9, 12).   There is no prerequisite for students who take it for 9 credits.   The prerequisite for students who take this class for 12 units (for extra language credits) is 82-332 or equivalent.', '', None), '82-235': Course('Intensive Intermediate Chinese', '82-235', 12, "This course is the continuation of Intensive Elementary Chinese (82-135). Students will continue to learn the basic skills of listening, speaking, reading and writing for daily communication, while more focus on reading and writing Chinese characters. More variety of expressions and complicated sentence structures will be taught so that students can carry on daily conversations on various topics related to modern Chinese Society. Activities related to the broad spectrum of the Chinese culture will be organized to facilitate the language learning. This course can be a substitute for 82-232 for Chinese Minor. Instructor's approval is required to register for this course.", '82-135', None), '82-236': Course('Intensive Chinese Language and Culture: Intermediate Level', '82-236', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in China, a Chinese-speaking country, or other approved program at the Intermediate level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for Chinese.', '', None), '82-433': Course('Topics in Contemporary Culture of China', '82-433', 9, 'SPRING 2012  This course introduces the media landscape of the People&#8217;s Republic of China with the goal to foster an understanding of how Chinese media work and what role they play in Chinese society. We will explore topics such as the legal and institutional framework of both old and new media, changes in the media landscape during the last decade, the training and self-consciousness of Chinese journalists, or the activities of non-establishment bloggers. Classroom activities will include discussions and student presentations. Assessment will be based on class participation, student presentations, translations and written assignments. The course will largely be conducted in Chinese and requires advanced level of Chinese.  Prequisites: 82-332 or instructor&#8217;s approval', '82-332', None), '82-432': Course('Popular Culture in China', '82-432', 9, 'his class is a general introduction to various aspects of popular culture in twentieth century and contemporary China.  Students will gain a critical understanding of common people&#8217;s perspectives and experiences with China&#8217;s revolutionary past and its contemporary global economy through fiction, film, music, newspaper and magazine articles, internet discussion forums, and other forms of visual and written materials.  The class is conducted in Chinese, supplemented by occasional scholarly writings in English.  Prerequisite: 82-332 or equivalent.     Prerequisite: 82-332 or equivalent.', '82-332 or equivalent.     ', None), '82-121': Course('Elementary German I', '82-121', 12, 'An introduction to German for students with no previous background in the language. Listening, speaking, reading, and writing skills are developed in a context that introduces information on culture and life in German-speaking countries of today. Includes work with audio-visual and internet materials. The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Four hours of in-class instruction per week. If a student has studied German before, then s/he must take the placement exam. Instructions for taking the placement exam are in Baker Hall 160 and online at http:webcape.byuhtrsc.org/?acct=cmu&amp;#12296;=gr. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-122': Course('Elementary German II', '82-122', 12, 'This course, the sequel to 82-121, is intended for students with one semester of college German (or equivalent). Listening, speaking, reading, and writing skills are developed in a context that introduces information on culture and life in German-speaking countries of today and in recent history. Includes work with audio-visual and internet materials. The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect upon and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Four hours of in-class instruction per week. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-123 or 82-121', None), '82-123': Course('Directed Language Study: Elementary German I or II', '82-123', 12, 'This course is a directed, Instructor-supervised version of the courses 82-121 or 82-122.  It is recommended for (l) students who are well motivated and have the time, self-discipline, and desire to work independently, and (2) students whose schedule precludes enrollment in the regular elementary course and (3) Students who have had previous German study but are not prepared to take 82-122.    This course develops the fundamental language skills as outlined in the description of 82-121 or 82-122.  Students complete the same work as in 82-121 or 82-122.  Written work is turned in for correction.  Tests covering each unit of material will be taken according to a schedule determined by the Instructor.  The Instructor will be available during office hours or by appointment for individual consultations and for testing.  Students are permitted to take only one semester of 82-123.', '', None), '82-436': Course('Introduction to Classical Chinese', '82-436', 9, 'This course is designed for students who have reached the advanced level of Modern Chinese and would like to promote their knowledge and skills in reading Classical Chinese, a language shaped in the latter half of the first millennium B. C. which still persists as a living medium of expression today. The course aims to introduce students to the basic syntactic patterns of Classical Chinese and the most frequently used Classical Chinese vocabulary. In the course, we will read representative selections from ancient Chinese texts, chosen for their historical value, beauty,, and influence on later writers. With this knowledge and training, students will be sufficiently equipped to read the Chinese Classics and will gain a deeper understanding of the history of Chinese civilization, culture and language. Moreover, knowledge of Classical Chinese will help students read and understand sophisticated modern Chinese texts, which make frequent use of Classical allusions and constructs. Prerequisite or approved equivalent', '82-338 or 82-337 or 82-332', None), '82-126': Course('Intensive German Language and Culture: Elementary Level', '82-126', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in Germany, a German-speaking country, or other approved program at the Elementary level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for German.', '', None), '82-431': Course('China and the West', '82-431', 9, "FALL 2012  This course takes a look at the multifaceted relationship between China and the Western world from Marco Polo&#8217;s time to the present. The focus will be on how people in China and the West imagined each other in different times of history and in what ways some historical events and figures, as well as concepts and cultural practices are interpreted differently from Chinese and Western perspectives. Students are expected to reach a deeper understanding of the complexities of cultural interactions and their implications for the diverse world in which we now live. The students will read a rich collection of scholarly writings, and the class will be conducted primarily in discussion format. The class is conducted in English and Chinese. Students will complete readings in both English and Chinese. Assessment will be based on participation in the discussion, student presentations, and written assignments (including research papers, book reviews, and translations).  Prerequisits: 82-332, or instructor's approval.", '', None), '82-434': Course('Studies in Chinese Traditions', '82-434', 9, "Course description: This course aims at helping students to obtain a general idea of Chinese history from 5000 years ago, understand the basic philosophical ideas of Confucianism and Daoism so that they will be aware and understand how Confucianism and Daoism have influenced the traditional Chinese ways of thinking. Students will also learn to use Chinese to analyze and comment both orally and in written form the pros and cons of the traditional Chinese ways of thinking and the differences between people's ways of thinking in Chinese culture and those in another culture. Materials for this course will be selected from classical works on Confucius teachings, classical poems, modern prose writings, excerpts from Chinese novels, etc. The themes will focus on Chinese history, basic philosophies of Confucianism and Daoism and their influence on the ways of thinking in the daily life of Chinese. Specifically the materials will deal with such issues as traditional Chinese views on study and education, career, family, human relations with nature, self-cultivation and women.", '82-332', None), '82-361': Course('Introduction to Italian Culture', '82-361', 9, 'This is a course in Italian culture and conversation with a streamlined review of grammar.  The course deals with the social, political, economic, demographic and cultural issues of contemporary Italy.  At the same time links are drawn between past and present, evidencing the importance of tradition and history in Italian society.  The course will be conducted in Italian with occasional English. Prerequisite or permission of the instructor.', '82-262', None), '82-331': Course('Advanced Chinese I', '82-331', 9, "This course is designed for students who have reached the intermediate level of proficiency in the use of Chinese language. With emphasis on the communicative functions of the language, it aims at generating students' language process competency in all four skills of listening, speaking, reading and writing. More complex language phenomena needed for communication in a variety of discourse will be introduced through texts as well as multi-media programs closely related to various social issues in China to provide students with the necessary knowledge of the language and its background. Classroom discussions will be an important part of the course followed by the practice of writing of an essay on topics related to various social issues in China. With Pinyin as a help, students are required to use both the simplified and traditional forms of Chinese characters in their reading and writing. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.", '82-235 or 82-232', None), '82-135': Course('Intensive Elementary Chinese', '82-135', 12, 'This course is designed for students who have some basic knowledge of spoken Chinese, but know little of how to read and write Chinese. While students will be trained in all the four language skills of listening, speaking, reading and writing simultaneously, the focus will be on the study and practice of Chinese characters. Based on their speaking ability, students will learn how to communicate in writing in everyday situations. In addition, the acquisition of standard pronunciation and Chinese cultural awareness will also be stressed. After the study of this course students will be well equipped to continue their study of Chinese at the intermediate level. Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-134': Course('Elementary Chinese Online II', '82-134', 12, 'This course is the continuation of 82-133, Elementary Chinese I Online. Students will continue learning more useful and complex expressions and sentence structures necessary for use in everyday life. Students will also continue building their skills in listening, speaking, reading, and writing for everyday communication, and their understanding of Chinese culture and society. There is a required weekly class meeting for training and group activities, and individual meetings with a tutor or the instructor for conversation and practice.   Elementary Chinese II Online at Carnegie Mellon is a LearnLab course for the Pittsburgh Science of Learning Center. This means that researchers are attempting to improve language instruction by studying experimental approaches. Students in this class should be prepared to participate in such studies in the course of their classwork.  Prerequisites or permission of the Instructor.', '82-133 or 82-131', None), '82-133': Course('Elementary Chinese Online I', '82-133', 12, 'This course is designed for students who need a more flexible approach to language learning than that offered in a standard classroom course. It is a Chinese language course designed to help beginners develop communicative competence in the four basic skills of listening, speaking, reading and writing the Chinese language. Basic vocabulary and sentence structures for use in essential daily-life situations, as well as cultural information, are taught through the materials and assignments.   Materials are web-based, with extensive use of Internet technologies for research, writing and communication. There is a required weekly class meeting for training and group activities, and individual meetings with a tutor or the instructor for conversation and practice.   Elementary Chinese I Online at Carnegie Mellon is a LearnLab course for the Pittsburgh Science of Learning Center. This means that researchers are attempting to improve language instruction by studying experimental approaches. Students in this class should be prepared to participate in such studies in the course of their classwork.  If a student has studied Chinese before, then s/he must take a placement exam. Instructions for the placement exam are available in BH 160.  Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-132': Course('Elementary Chinese II', '82-132', 12, 'This course is the continuation of the elementary Chinese course sequence for beginning students of Mandarin Chinese. Its goal is to continue to train students in the basic skills of listening, speaking, reading and writing for everyday communication. Based on the vocabulary and sentence structures taught in the first semester, students will learn more useful expressions and sentence structures necessary for use in everyday life. A large part of the class time will be devoted to conversations related to topics on daily life. While emphasis is laid on the communicative skills of listening and speaking, students will continue to learn to read and write short paragraphs and essays in Chinese characters. To facilitate the study of the language, different aspects of Chinese culture and society will be introduced through poetry reading, group activities, multi-media programs, and research project throughout the course. The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-131', None), '82-131': Course('Elementary Chinese I', '82-131', 12, 'This course is for beginners in Mandarin Chinese.  Its goal is to train students in the basic skills of listening, speaking, reading and writing for daily communication in Chinese.  Students will learn the phonetic transcriptions of Chinese (Pinyin) for speaking and listening as well as Chinese characters for reading and writing.  Basic vocabulary and sentence patterns used in everyday life are taught so that students will be able to carry on simple conversations on everyday life topics.  Students will be introduced to cultural issues through class, extracurricular activities and multimedia programs.  The elementary level is designed to help students learn to reflect and draw upon strategies used by good language learners in their second language study.  Prerequisite: None.', 'None', None), '82-336': Course('Intensive Chinese Language and Culture: Advanced Level', '82-336', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in China, a Chinese-speaking country, or other approved program at the Advanced level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for Chinese.', '82-232', None), '82-338': Course('Mandarin Chinese for Oral Communication', '82-338', 9, 'This course is designed for students who have reached an intermediate level in reading and writing Chinese, and who would like to promote their oral communicative competence and knowledge of Chinese culture.  It is a seminar-type class that relies on active participation from the students.  Students will practice various conversational tasks, such as giving presentations, participating in discussions and debates, interviewing, describing, and interpreting.  Topics will include current events and cultural trends in the U.S. and China, analysis of Chinese culture and comparisons with other cultures, contemporary Chinese television shows and movies, and other debatable and interesting issues. Prerequisite: Intermediate level in reading and writing Chinese.  Permission of the Instructor.', 'Intermediate level in reading and writing Chinese.  Permission of the Instructor', None), '82-429': Course('German Reading and Translation Workshop: Undergraduate', '82-429', 9, 'This course will explore different models of translation.  Individual and group work will focus on translation of literary pieces, journal articles, critical essays, materials from the internet and other sources.  The workshop will also offer an advanced-level grammar and stylistics review, a vocabulary builder and increased exposure to German language and culture.  Prerequisite or permission of the Instructor.', '82-324', None), '82-428': Course('History of German Film', '82-428', None, 'This course is a chronological introduction to one of the world&#8217;s greatest cinema traditions: German cinema.  It moves from the silent cinema of the 1910s to the Weimar Republic, when German cinema represented Hollywood&#8217;s greatest challenger in the international cinema world.  It then addresses the cinema of Hitler&#8217;s so-called &#8220;Third Reich,&#8221; when German cinema dominated European movie theaters, and moves on to the cinema of divided Germany from 1949-1989, when cinema in the socialist east and cinema in the capitalist west developed in very different ways.  In the final week of the semester, we will address German cinema in the post-unification period, which has experienced a revival in popularity and interest.  The two historical foci of the semester will be the Weimar Republic, the classic era of German cinema, and the era of the so-called &#8220;New German Cinema&#8221; of the 1970s and 1980s, when major German directors developed radical new approaches to cinema and critiques of Hollywood.  Among the great directors focused on in the course of the semester will be Friedrich Wilhelm Murnau, Fritz Lang, Leni Riefenstahl, Wolfgang Staudte, Werner Herzog, Wim Wenders, and Rainer Werner Fassbinder.  No knowledge of the German language is required for this course; most of the films will be in German with English subtitles.  The course will be cross-listed in the departments of Modern Languages, English, and History.  Students will be required to attend class, including all film screenings, to actively participate in discussion, to write a 15-page term paper on a topic related to German cinema history, and to take two midterm examinations.', '82-324', None), '82-421': Course('German Literature of the Nineteenth Century', '82-421', 9, 'This course, entirely in German, focuses particularly on short fiction such as fairy tales. The nineteenth century was the heyday of Romanticism, in which authors told fantastical tales like E. T. A. Hoffmann&#8217;s &#8220;The Nutcracker and the Mouse King,&#8221; which was subsequently turned into a famous Christmas ballet by the Russian composer Peter Ilyich Tchaikovsky. Germany is particularly famous for its Romantic culture, and in fact tens of thousands of people all over the world get married every year to the music of German Romantic composers like Richard Wagner and Felix Mendelssohn (&#8220;Here Comes the Bride&#8221; and the Wedding March, respectively). For many, Romanticism achieved its purest expression in Germany. Students will be asked to participate actively in discussions of the reading, to write a series of short papers, to lead classroom discussion on one day, and to complete a final project of their choice. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-325', None), '82-226': Course('Intensive German Language and Culture: Intermediate Level', '82-226', None, 'Transfer credit for study abroad in Germany, a German-speaking country, or other approved program at the Intermediate level.  Credit determined after consultation with the transfer credit advisor for German.', '', None), '82-358': Course('Literacies Across Language and Culture', '82-358', 9, 'This course examines differences and similarities in the ways literacy is learned and used in diverse languages and cultures.  By clarifying the distinct characteristics of spoken and written communications, we will first analyze what was made possible through the invention of writing, and in so doing, explore the social and cognitive consequences of literacy.  We will then scrutinize literacy utilization in a variety of cultural contexts, as well as its collective impacts on the users.  Lastly, through systematic comparisons of literacy education, we will identify the social, cognitive, linguistic factors, which shape literacy in  particular cultural contexts. Prerequesite: None.', '', None), '82-425': Course('Topics in German Literature and Culture', '82-425', 9, 'FALL 2013  German Theater, Literature and Film  following World War II     The three genres we will consider in this course serve not only as a window onto the societies of the German speaking countries following World War II but also as instruments of social change.  They reveal social conditions as well as transform them.  We will exam works from East and West Germany, Austria and Switzerland and will focus on the contrasts and similarities between the two sides of the &#8220;Iron Curtain&#8221; as well as the unique situation of Switzerland and Austria as neutral nations in a time of heightened political tensions.  Reactions to the Holocaust and the destruction of Germany in the war, the ensuing &#8220;Wirtschaftswunder&#8221; in the 1950s and 60s, and the terrorism of the 1970s will be considered.  Works by Ilse Eichinger, Peter Weiss, Wolfgang Borchert, Heinrich B&#246;ll, V&#246;lker Schl&#246;ndorff, Margarethe von Trotta and Rainer Werner Fassbinder, among others.    Prerequisite: Completion of 82-325 or approved equivalent. Prerequisites: 82325', 'Completion of 82-325 or approved equivalent. ', None), '82-222': Course('Intermediate German II', '82-222', 9, "In this class, you will expand and develop your speaking, listening, reading, and writing skills, as well as your cultural knowledge of German-speaking countries. Topics include: Life and Love, Art and Artists, and Dealing with History in German-speaking countries. This course focuses on intercultural concepts and will help you see what things Germans view differently from other nations and what things might be similar. Topics will include issues such as views on German history, prospects for Germany's future, art and artists, and the German film industry. By the end of the course, you should be able to make yourself understood in German and understand German-speakers with experience dealing with foreigners. Taught in German. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.", '82-221', None), '82-221': Course('Intermediate German I', '82-221', 9, 'The goal of Intermediate German I is to further develop your linguistic and cultural knowledge, allowing you to feel more comfortable as a user of German. By the end of the semester, you should be able to:  use and understand German in everyday situations; communicate effectively in general areas and in individual areas of interest; understand general cultural perspectives in contemporary Germany; read and understand authentic materials from German-speaking countries. Activities will help develop the four skills and of cultural knowledge. Assessment of progress will occur across skills throughout the semester. This course focuses on intercultural concepts and will help you see what things Germans view differently from other nations and what things might be similar. Topics will include issues such as travel, politics, immigration, and music. Taught in German. Prerequisite or approved equivalent.', '82-122 or 82-123', None), '82-426': Course('Topics in German Literature and Culture', '82-426', 9, "SPRING 2013  82-426 German Lit of the 19th Century:  The way a nation tells its stories tells us something about its people  and the times in which they live.  How does the individual relate to  the society and the Zeitgeist in which she finds herself?  How does  the society's past and its prospects for the future shape what it is in the present? In this course we will read and discuss German short stories from the nineteenth and twentieth centuries.  All readings, discussions, and  written assignments will be in German.  82-426 B Vienna at the Turn of Century Vienna at the turn of the century (1900) was many things: the political center of the Habsburg dynasty&#8212;the Austro-Hungarian Empire; the meeting place of Czechs and Slovaks, Hungarians and Romanians, Slavs, Poles, Italians, Serbs, Bulgarians and Germans; the center of German-language music and theater; the birthplace of Zionism, of psychoanalysis; the battleground for liberalism and anti-Semitism; the haven for socialism; the home of caf&#233;-culture and the waltz; the garrison for an outdated army; the city of baroque urban palaces and squalid backyard tenements; the center for Enlightenment public policy and reactionary bureaucracy; the showcase for historicism; and the birthplace of Modernism. In an effort to understand today&#8217;s intellectual environment, therefore, we will spend the next ten weeks examining Vienna before the collapse of the Austro-Hungarian Empire in 1918.We will start with politics and move on through art, architecture, music, literature, psychoanalysis, and philosophy. Leading us throughout will be Robert Musil's 'Man without Qualities'. At the same time, we will be reading other sources, viewing slides and films, and listening to recordings.    Prerequis", '82-324 or 82-325 or 82-323', None),'80-337': Course('Philosophy Politics &amp; Economics', '80-337', 9, 'The course is split between two broad topics. First, we explore issues pertaining to Individual Decision Theory, mainly the postulate of rationality and its implications. We then proceed to discuss collective decision making by a group of rational agents. We discuss methods of aggregating individual preferences and, in particular, measures of social welfare, in an effort to associate the evaluation of policy with ethical principles.', '', None), '80-210': Course('Logic and Proofs', '80-210', 9, 'This web-based course introduces students to central issues in logic and develops their ability for constructing and refuting arguments. It addresses the question: How can one analyze the structure of rational discourse or, more specifically, the logical structure of argumentation? An answer to this question requires: (i) uncovering the logical form of statements; (ii) defining the correctness of logical steps; (iii) formulating inference rules for the logical forms; (iv) designing strategies for argumentation with the inference rules. The course takes these steps for both sentential and quantificational logic. Presentation: The material is presented on-line, though some exercises must be done with pen and paper. Additional reading of historical and philosophical character complements the systematic on-line presentation. Weekly small discussion meetings with collaborative reviews, substantive discussions and critical reflections supplement the on-line material.', '', None), '80-211': Course('Logic and Mathematical Inquiry', '80-211', 9, 'Since ancient times, those searching for truth have looked to mathematical arguments as a paradigm of rational inquiry. We study the structure of such arguments and their application. In the first half of the course, we develop the syntax and semantics of sentential and quantificational logic while in the second, we apply this logic to examine the axiomatic method in set theory and introduce formal models of computation. This course prepares students to take the 310-311 series on the fundamental (in)completeness and (un)decidability theorems of modern logic.', '', None), '80-212': Course('Arguments and Logical Analysis', '80-212', 9, 'Are there rational methods that can further our knowledge? The notion of rational inquiry presupposes that there are appropriate methods for the pursuit of knowledge. In this course, we will investigate the means by which a successful argument justifies its conclusion, as well as various subtle ways in which other arguments fail. In the course of our inquiry, we will take a historically informed approach to studying logic and argumentative fallacies. We will also discover that these tools are useful for constructing and analyzing arguments in all disciplines from philosophy and history to psychology and physics. Our primary goal is to learn to use these tools to make our thinking and writing clearer, more precise, and more critical. To that end, our coursework will consist in homework and exams on topics in logic, as well as essays on a wide variety of topics. This course is intended for students from any discipline who would like to improve their writing and critical thinking skills.', '', None), '80-135': Course('Introduction to Political Philosophy', '80-135', 9, 'As an introductory course, we will seek to trace out the historical and philosophical dimensions of the polis from its origins in Ancient Greece to its current manifestation in present-day society. Special emphasis will be placed on the concept of "democracy." The readings and lectures will focus on the history and concept of democracy (as an idea and as an institution); the basic concepts and problems of political philosophy (e.g., liberal and libertarian ideas of justice); and applied political philosophy (e.g., regional initiatives in deliberative democracy).', '', None), '80-430': Course('Ethics and Medical Research', '80-430', 9, 'Ethics &amp; Medical Research: This course covers foundational issues in the ethical evaluation and regulation of research involving human subjects. It begins with a historical overview of the origins of research ethics after World War II as a response to high profile cases of abuse or scandal. This unit covers "classic cases" including the Tuskegee syphilis study, the Willowbrook hepatitis study, the Jewish Chronic Disease Hospital Case, and others. It also covers seminal documents such as the Nuremberg Code, the Belmont Report, and the current federal regulations known as the Common Rule. Against this historical backdrop, the course then examines foundational philosophical issues in human-subjects research including ethical issues in clinical trial design, the concept of equipoise and the use of placebo controls, the requirements of justice in the research context, and the values of privacy and informed consent.', '', None), '80-136': Course('Social Structure, Public Policy  &amp; Ethics', '80-136', 9, 'The course will consider ethical questions that arise regarding social structure and public policy&#8217;s impact on both people and the environment. It will consider the role of political institutions (and, sometimes, individuals) in dealing with some of the greatest challenges facing our generation: World poverty, environmental problems, and globalization. Some of the questions we will consider include: Are developed countries like ours obligated to ameliorate poverty by providing foreign aid, are they obligated to prevent environmental problems, and is globalization and free trade in particular a good idea? The course uses theory, case studies, and empirical evidence to consider these questions from a few different moral and political perspectives. We will extract some economic principles and rational dilemmas from examining these issues and pay attention to how legal and empirical considerations interact with ethical considerations.', '', None), '80-130': Course('Introduction to Ethics', '80-130', 9, 'This course provides both a historic and thematic survey of western ethical theory. Key figures such as Aristotle, Hobbes, Kant, Mill, and Nietzsche will be presented as background to the thematic problems of relativism, egoism, and other concepts in ethical theory. Students will take part in the creative process of developing skills necessary to engage in reflective moral reasoning. This process will culminate in the use of interactive multimedia modules simulating real world scenarios involving difficult moral choices. Participating in a class ethics committee will provide students with opportunities for personal reflection on the ways moral reasoning can be used to expand our understanding of hard choices and moral dilemmas.', '', None), '80-250': Course('Ancient Philosophy', '80-250', 9, "This course will cover Ancient Greek philosophy from the pre-Socratics to the later Hellenistic writers. We will prepare the background for Socrates and Plato by tracing the various historical and intellectual movements that led up to and through the flourishing and downfall of Periclean Athens. A study of Socrates (as represented in Aristophanes' comedy and Plato's early dialogues) will lead to an in-depth reading of Plato's Gorgias, Symposium and sections of the Republic. We will approach Aristotle through his 'practical philosophy' as presented in the Nicomachean Ethics. The final sections will discuss the Epicurean, Skeptic, and Stoic movements as well as the work of Cicero. Excerpts from other works of Plato and Aristotle as well as Martha Nussbaum's recent work on Aristotle and Hellenistic philosophy will accompany selected parts of the course.", '', None), '80-247': Course('Ethics and Global Economics', '80-247', 9, 'The course considers the secret lives of every day things &#8212; like food, water, and oil. It suggests that it is by understanding these things that we can best address some of the greatest challenges facing our generation including world poverty and environmental problems. After a short introduction to arguments and ethical theory, the course considers how basic commodities like oil, water, and bananas have shaped and will continue to shape human and natural history. The course then outlines some of the environmental and social implications of the ways we create, use, and trade basic commodities. Finally, it considers prospects for dealing with some of the challenges posed by our past, present, and future use of these commodities. Global Economics and Ethics lays the groundwork for dealing with some of the most important issues facing our generation.', '', None), '80-252': Course('Kant', '80-252', 9, "Immanuel Kant's 'Critical philosophy' may be seen as the result of his attempts to determine the sources of human knowledge, and to find metaphysical foundations for Newton's mechanics. This course will involve readings in Kant's /Critique of Pure Reason/ and other texts. Emphasis will be placed on understanding Kant's thought in the context of contemporary intellectual developments and on his theory of human cognition.", '', None), '80-253': Course('Continental Philosophy', '80-253', 9, 'This course provides students with an overview of key historical and philosophical movements in European Philosophy. The cultural and historical background for 20th Century Continental Philosophy covers Descartes, Kant, Kierkegaard, and Nietzsche (Hegel and Marx are also options). Early to mid-20th Century Continental Philosophy covers the central tenets of phenomenology and existentialism (e.g., intentionality, Being-in-the-World, Bad Faith). This part will involve selections from the works of, for example, Husserl, Heidegger, Sartre and Merleau-Ponty. Finally, cultural and philosophical trends such as Structuralism, Hermeneutics and Post-modernism (e.g., Derrida, Foucault, Lyotard and Habermas) will be addressed.', '', None), '80-254': Course('Analytic Philosophy', '80-254', 9, 'We will read (parts of) some classic works in analytic philosophy by Gottlob Frege, Bertrand Russell, and Ludwig Wittgenstein and, if time permits, by Ayer and Quine.  We will also historically situate these classic works with respect to each other, and with respect to a few select works in logic, science, and mathematics that provided the background to them.  The emphasis will be on learning how to read, understand, articulate and critique the views and arguments in these texts.', '', None), '80-255': Course('Pragmatism', '80-255', 9, "American Pragmatism represents an energetic attempt to bridge the divergent cultures of science and the humanities. The movement's founder, C.S. Peirce, was trained in chemistry and worked as a physicist, but he was also deeply concerned with the contemporary philosophical portrayal of science, which distinguished sharply between theoretical knowledge and practice. Peirce responded by constructing a comprehensive philosophy emphasizing the scientific importance of community, fallibility, and action. Pragmatism was also developed and vigorously popularized by William James, who aspired to be a painter and ended up as an acknowledged founder of modern empirical psychology. James extended Peirce's position by defending the role of values in even the purest of empirical sciences. John Dewey, who is also well-known for his role in education, interpreted science as an evolving social system and developed a theory of aesthetics based on what we now call the psychology of problem solving. The pragmatists made and continue to make lasting contributions to modern statistics, logic, and social science and their emphases on community, fallibility, action, and value in science are still of primary importance in philosophy and in the ongoing dialogue between the scientific and humanistic cultures.", '', None), '80-256': Course('Modern Moral Philosophy', '80-256', 9, 'This course will address some of the central aesthetic theories concerning the nature of our judgments of the beautiful and of the sublime that were developed around the 18th century. The famous divide between the British empiricist philosophers and the rationalist philosophers of the Continent regarding the sources of human knowledge, was paralleled in a dispute regarding the nature of aesthetic judgments. In this course we will study the aesthetic theories of some of the most important figures of this period, with an emphasis on the work of Immanuel Kant.', '', None), '80-246': Course('', '80-246', 9, 'This course applies selected theories of procedural and social justice to a major public institution. It explores 1) the nature and impact of police, lawyer and prosecutor practices, 2) the effects of criminal justice legislation, 3) causes and consequences of racial and gender disparities in both the system and its outcomes and 4) improvements and alternatives currently being proposed, implemented, and assessed in many jurisdictions.', '', None), '80-245': Course('Medical Ethics', '80-245', 9, "This course provides an introduction to core ethical issues in health care, medical research, and public policy. Topics include: the moral responsibilities of health care providers to patients and various third parties such as the government or insurance companies, the status of health as a social good, and questions of individual liberty and social responsibility at the ends of life including issues such as abortion, physician assisted suicide, and the definition of death. We will also examine specific ethical issues in the conduct of medical research and look at the impact of technological innovation on our notions of health, disease, life, death, and the family. If time permits, we may also discuss issues related to genetics and cloning. While the course engages such substantive ethical issues it also attempts to sharpen students' skills in practical reasoning through argument analysis, analogical reasoning, and the application of theory and principles to particular cases.", '', None), '80-310': Course('Formal Logic', '80-310', 9, 'Among the most significant developments in modern logic is the formal analysis of the notions of provability and logical consequence for the logic of relations and quantification, known as first-order logic. These notions are related by the soundness and completeness theorems: a logical formula is provable if and only if it is true under every interpretation. This course provides a formal specification of the syntax and semantics of first-order logic and then proves the soundness and completeness theorems. Other topics may include: basic model theory, intuitionistic, modal, and higher-order logics.', '15-251 or 80-210 or 80-212 or 80-211', None), '80-230': Course('Ethical Theory', '80-230', 9, 'Every day, even in very subtle ways, we make judgments of value that shape our lives and our conduct. This course will examine four influential attempts at providing a systematic account of the source and nature of moral value, its relationship to other kinds of value, and the practical implications of different answers to these questions. This focus on the fundamental structure of moral value will frequently engage topics such as the nature of the good, subjectivist and objectivist accounts of value, forms of moral naturalism verses attempts at moral constructivism, and will draw on historical as well as more contemporary sources. Particular attention will be paid to articulating the specific sources of disagreement that distinguish competing moral theories in order to facilitate our ability to adjudicate between them on a reasoned basis.', '', None), '80-312': Course('Philosophy of Mathematics', '80-312', 9, 'The 20th century witnessed remarkable and novel developments of mathematics - with deep roots in the 19th century. The beginnings of these developments were beset with foundational problems and provoked a variety of programmatic responses: logicism, intuitionism, and finitism. For a deeper study of basic issues, we review a part of classical Greek mathematics (the theory of proportions) that is closely connected to the foundations of analysis in the 19th century. We analyze set theoretic and constructive approaches, and discuss fundamental metamathematical results and their philosophical implications. A "reductive structuralist" position will finally provide a perspective for understanding the abstract character of mathematics as well as its usefulness in applications.', '80-311 or 80-310 or 80-211', None), '80-315': Course('Modal Logic', '80-315', 9, 'This course is an introduction to first-order modal logic. After a thorough grounding in propositional normal modal logic, which covers rudimentary modal model theory (invariance results, the relationship between modal and first-order logic, the finite model property, and notions of modal model equivalence), soundness, completeness, and basic decidability results, several interpretations and applications of normal modal logics are considered. Modal languages are simple languages for talking about relational structures, with several applications appearing in philosophy, computer science, and linguistics. Some examples the course may touch upon include temporal and epistemic logics, multi-agent systems, finite parse trees, labeled transition systems, among others. In the last part of the course we will consider extensions of the Kripke models to interpret first-order modal languages, and close with the more general still Scott-Montague models of "classical" modal logic and extend those to first-order modal languages.', '', None), '80-195': Course('Research Training', '80-195', 9, 'This course is part of a set of 100-level courses offered by H&amp;SS departments as independent studies for students in the College. In general, these courses are designed to give students some real research experience through work on a faculty project or lab in ways that might stimulate and nurture subsequent interest in research participation. Faculty and students devise a personal and regularized meeting and task schedule. Each Research Training course is worth 9 units, which generally means a minimum for students of about 9 work-hours per week. These courses are offered only as electives; i.e., they cannot be applied toward a college or major requirement, although the units do count toward graduation as elective units. Additional details (including a roster and descriptions of Research Training Courses available in any given semester) are available in the H&amp;SS Academic Advisory Center. For H&amp;SS students only; only for second-semester freshmen, or first- or second-semester sophomores; minimum cumulative QPA of 3.0 (at the time of registration) required for approved entry; additional prerequisites (e.g., language proficiency) may arise out of the particular demands of the research project in question.', '', None), '80-235': Course('Political Philosophy', '80-235', 9, 'At the heart of political philosophy lie fundamental questions such as: What constitutes a just society? How, and under what circumstances do individuals incur special political obligations to a particular state? What are the limits of the legitimate authority of the state and how are they defined? This course provides a systematic investigation of the way such questions are answered by dominant schools of liberal political theory, such as the social contract tradition, utilitarianism and libertarianism. Because the liberal political tradition is also strongly egalitarian in nature, the course will examine different conceptions of political equality and conflicting views about the respects in which community members may have a just claim to equal treatment. Readings are drawn from classic works by authors such as Hobbes, Locke, Kant, and Mill, and from the works of contemporary theorists like Rawls, Nozick and others.', '', None), '80-244': Course('Environmental Ethics', '80-244', 9, 'The aim of the course is to provide students with an introduction to environmental ethics. One aspect of environmental ethics is the study of values underlying human relations to the natural environment. In particular, we are interested in issues that arise when these values conflict. This course begins with a discussion of our current environmental crises, and different approaches to solving these crises. Many of these solutions, however, depend on particular kinds of knowledge, particularly scientific knowledge, about our environment. Thus, another important aspect of environmental ethics is determining what we do, and what we can, know. To address these issues, we will explore some problems in philosophy of science, with special emphasis on the various eco-sciences.', '', None), '80-335': Course('Deliberative Democracy: Theory and Practice', '80-335', 9, 'This course will explore the theory and practice of deliberative democracy. Topics and concepts to be discussed include distinctions between aggregative and deliberative models of democracy, the notions of Reciprocity, Publicity, and Accountability as they apply to policy discussions, and recent work in Citizenship Theory.  We will also look at various practices that utilize the theories of deliberative democracy, such as Participatory Strategic Planning, Deliberative Polls&#174;, and Action Forums.', '', None), '80-257': Course('Nietzsche', '80-257', 9, 'During his life in the late 19th-century, Friedrich Nietzsche was a relatively obscure German philosopher. Since his death, however, he has become deeply influential and well-known, and was a source of inspiration for many important 20th-century thinkers. Despite this popularity, Nietzsche&#8217;s philosophy remains relatively mysterious, and often misunderstood. Much of his writing consisted of aphorisms, rather than more traditional prose and arguments, and many of his positions seem to contradict one another. This course will cover a broad range of Nietzsche&#8217;s writings, focusing on such central concepts as the will to power, eternal recurrence, and the oft-misunderstood Ubermensch (&#8220;overman&#8221;). Throughout, we will focus on developing a consistent interpretation of an enigmatic philosopher whose views have been mischaracterized and misappropriated throughout the past century.', '', None), '80-384': Course('Linguistics of Turkic Languages', '80-384', 9, 'In this course we will look at the phonology, morphology, syntax and writing systems of languages within a single language group, Turkic. Turkic languages are spoken across continental Asia and include such languages as Turkmen, Tatar, Kazakh, Kirghiz, and Uzbek. In this course we will concentrate especially on Turkish, Azerbaijani, and Yakut. We will look at the sound systems of these languages to discover how they are related, and we will also look comparatively at various morphological and syntactic structures. We will consider the impact of diachronic factors on the synchronic study of language, and we will also examine certain recent techniques used to establish genetic relations between languages. To a large extent the course will be student-driven, and it can be seen as an extended case-study for applying concepts and analytical strategies taught in Nature of Language, Phonetics and Phonology, Linguistic Analysis, and other relevant courses.  Prerequisites: 80180 Nature of Language', '80180 Nature of Languag', None), '80-314': Course('Logic and Artificial Intelligence', '80-314', 9, 'An introduction to several formalisms used in knowledge representation and database theory. The emphasis is placed on non-monotonic logic, conditional logic and belief revision methods. We will also study recent issues in the logics of knowledge and belief and consider applications in distributed AI. Several methodological problems in AI are discussed.', '', None), '80-382': Course('Linguistics of Germanic Languages', '80-382', 9, 'In this course we will look at phonology and syntax within a single language family, Germanic. The Germanic languages include English, Dutch, Frisian, German, Pennsylvanisch, Afrikaans, Yiddish, Icelandic and the Scandinavian languages, excluding Finnish. Similarities and differences in the sound systems of these closely related languages will be studied, and we will also look comparatively at various syntactic structures, including noun phrases, verb complements, main and relative clauses, as well as mood and modality. The approach is student-centered, with groups of students concentrating on topics in a few most-closely related languages. The course will provide an extended case-study for application of concepts and analytical strategies taught in Nature of Language, Phonetics and Phonology, Linguistic Analysis, and other relevant courses. The approach should also help bring out the relevance of diachronic factors in the synchronic study of language, with historical forms of English being open to investigation, as these often reflect patterns found in contemporary Germanic languages.', '80-180', None), '80-383': Course('Language in Use', '80-383', 9, 'Why is it so hard to get computers to chat? The reason is that when we have an ordinary, casual conversation we do a great deal more than merely exchange information which is directly encoded in language. We also recognize what our interlocutors intend to accomplish with their utterances; we use and recognize utterances with indirect meanings, as well as metaphors, jokes and irony; we fill in incomplete or underspecified meanings; and we determine what kinds of responses are desired and appropriate. We do all of this in part on the basis of linguistic knowledge, but also making use of implicit reasoning about speaker plans and intentions, and relying on implicit assumptions about normal conversational behavior.      In this course, we investigate language in use, taking the approach developed within the linguistic sub-field of pragmatics. We focus on three related issues: First, we look at how language is used to do things, studying both the traditional theory of speech acts and a more contemporary approach. Second, we look at expressions whose function is primarily interactional. Finally, and most extensively, we examine how speakers can successfully express meanings that go beyond what is encoded by the linguistic forms that they use. The course is open to students at the sophomore level and above.', '80-100 or 80-180', None), '80-380': Course('Philosophy of Language', '80-380', 9, 'Philosophy of language involves the attempt to understand the nature of language and its relationship with speakers, their thoughts, and the world. As part of this attempt, philosophers have asked questions such as: What is language? How does language convey meaning? Is it language itself which determines meaning, or the intentions of speakers? What different kinds of meaning are there? Philosophers and linguists have also asked questions about the meanings and functions of particular linguistic forms, such as definite noun phrases, conditional sentences and words like &#8220;I&#8221; and &#8220;now.&#8221; In this course, we will read papers by many of the major figures of contemporary philosophy of language: Frege, Russell, Tarski, Davidson, Quine, Kaplan, Grice and others. The course will be run &#8220;seminar-style&#8221;: students will be expected to read papers for each class in preparation for class discussion, and will also be required to take turns presenting the papers in class. The course also has significant writing requirements. By the end of the course, students will be familiar with the central questions of this area of philosophy, with the type of argumentation used to address them, and with some of the solutions that have been proposed. Students enrolling in the course should have taken at least one other philosophy class in which they read papers from the philosophy literature.', '80-100 or 76-101', None), '80-381': Course('Meaning in Language', '80-381', 9, 'This course is an introduction to the study of meaning from a linguistic perspective. Linguists studying meaning need to be able to say what the meanings of sentences are, and to explain how those meanings are constructed from the meanings of sentence parts: words, morphemes and syntactic structure. In this course, we\'ll focus on developing a vocabulary for talking about the truth conditional content of sentences:  the part of meaning that has to do with representing the world as being a particular way. We\'ll also investigate how particular words and constructions affect the appropriateness conditions of sentences in which they occur, that is, the conditions under which those sentences can be appropriately used in discourse. As we\'ll see, many linguistic items affect sentence meaning in both of these ways simultaneously. The semantic contributions of a wide range of linguistic forms will be covered in the course. By the end of the semester, you will be able to state clearly what the difference is between the noun phrases "a dog"  and &#8220;the dog&#8221;; you\'ll understand the difference between the sentence "All dogs have tails" and the sentence "Dogs have tails"; and you&#8217;ll know why the sentence "John left yesterday" sounds fine but the sentence "John has left yesterday" doesn\'t. You&#8217;ll know how to talk about the meanings of sentences with modals, like "John might have left", and you\'ll understand what the difference is between saying "JOHN didn\'t see Bill" and saying "John didn\'t see BILL". All this, and more. While the course will develop precise ways of talking about meaning, it will not be particularly technical. (The amount of technical material to be introduced will be determined on the basis of the skills and interests of students.) Material in the course will presuppose a basic knowledge of linguistic notions, as covered in 80-180 Nature of Language.', '80-180', None), '80-447': Course('Global Justice', '80-447', 9, 'Until recently, the dominant view of international relations among both academics and politicians was that governments and citizens of one country have no moral or legal obligations to anyone beyond their own borders.  The later half of the 20th century has seen a dramatic change in this attitude, with a much greater willingness to recognize that demands of justice may transcend national borders and bind different states and their people.  This course examines this shift through the lenses of history, philosophy, law, politics, and anthropology.  It is being offered in conjunction with the 2009-2010 Humanities Center Colloquium Series on "Global Connections, Global Responsibilities."  Topics covered include: theories of justice; sovereignty; the universality of human rights; global inequality and poverty; trade and labor in the global economy; climate change; humanitarian intervention and just war; post-conflict reconciliation and social reconstruction; as well as the emergence of transnational modes of governance.  In addition to several short writing assignments, students will have the opportunity to carry out a research project on a relevant topic of their choice.', '', None), '80-348': Course('Health Development and Human Rights', '80-348', 9, 'Approximately 1.1 billion people live on less than $1 a day in a condition the World Bank refers to as extreme poverty.  Those who live in extreme poverty frequently lack effective access to proper nutrition, adequate shelter, safe drinking water, and sanitation.  As a result, they also bear the greatest burdens of famine and epidemic disease and frequently face social and political conditions of unrest and systematic oppression.  This course examines the question of what, if anything, we in the technologically and economically developed world owe to the global poor.  It therefore focuses considerable attention on competing theories of global distributive justice and the relationship between poverty, poor health, and human rights. We will critically examine different strategies for international development that emphasize one or more of these variables and we will consider how information about the complex interrelationship of these variables should be factored into the development process.', '', None), '80-258': Course('Hume', '80-258', 9, "This course will investigate the philosophy of David Hume.  We will focus on his philosophical thought expressed in the book A Treatise of Human Nature.  Hume was an influential philosopher who wrote on many issues ranging from skepticism, to ethics, to the philosophy of science, and his views continue to be influential today.  In this course we will attempt to understand Hume's philosophy on all of these subjects both to better understand his contribution to the philosophy of his day, but also to see what his arguments can contribute to contemporary thought.", '', None), '80-283': Course('Syntax and Discourse', '80-283', 9, 'This course builds on and expands the basic syntactic analysis skills learned in 80-180 Nature of Language, and applies them to an exploration of the ways in which syntactic structure can be manipulated in different languages to reflect the status of content as old or new, foregrounded or backgrounded, connected to ongoing discourse or not. More generally, the course provides an examination of the interaction between syntactic structure and discourse structure, with reference to English and other languages. The course will begin with review of the basic syntax from Nature of Language (head/argument structure, constituency tests, complement/adjunct distinction) and will then develop this basic syntactic theory further, based on analysis of declarative sentences in English and one other language. We will then begin the analysis of manipulations of basic sentence structure such as fronting, left- and right- dislocation, clefting and passivization, exploring in parallel the syntactic description of such structures and their semantic/pragmatic functions, using appropriate theoretical concepts.  The course will provide students with tools to reason about and represent syntactic structure, and to accurately characterize the discourse-related properties of different sentence types. Prerequisite: 80-180', '80-18', None), '80-282': Course('Phonetics and Phonology', '80-282', 9, 'This course seeks to describe the sounds of human languages in a linguistically relevant fashion. The challenge is that at a sheer physical level, every speech sound is different than every other speech sound. This is true within the speech of an individual, between sounds produced by different speakers of the same dialect, and across dialects within a language. Still, some sounds are considered by speakers to be the same as other sounds, and this is a crucial property, making spoken language possible. On the flip side, sounds must also be recognized as different from each other. This is the phonological concept of contrast and without it, sounds could not be combined together as morphemes to carry meaning. In this course students get hands-on practice in describing sounds in articulatory and acoustic terms (how they are made and what their physical properties are) and in using these descriptions to study the phonological systems of contrast within languages. We look at earlier attempts to devise such phonological systems, and conclude with the study of modern optimality theory. In optimality theory, contrast and sameness are captured in terms of an input-output device which selects the most optimal candidate faithful enough to the requirements of contrast.', '80-180', None), '80-281': Course('Language and Thought', '80-281', 9, 'We use language to communicate. Communication seems to involve something like the transfer of ideas or thoughts from one individual to another.  In this course, we&#8217;ll try to understand how that works, given that we cannot in fact take our thoughts out of our heads and show them to someone else. We&#8217;ll explore different views on the relationship between thought and meaning, and different views about how language succeeds in communicating thoughts and ideas. We&#8217;ll explore the idea of a language of thought, and ask whether the language we speak influences our thought. At the same time, we will want to understand how it is that language hooks up to the world, enabling us to talk not only about what we think, but also about the way things actually are. We&#8217;ll look at the role of inference in language understanding, and at the nature of non-literal communication, in particular metaphor. The course will be based on readings drawn from philosophy, linguistics and psychology.', '', None), '80-280': Course('Linguistic Analysis', '80-280', 9, 'At one level, language is constituted by nothing but sounds, or marks on paper. How can such physical objects be used to create or transmit meaning? The answer assumed in this course is that objects with specific physical features are assigned symbolic or linguistic values on the basis of those features. By the juxtaposition of such objects (phonemes or graphemes), larger symbolic objects are created (morphemes). These larger objects have the special property that they can be associated in a consistent way with meanings. In a progressive fashion, words are built from morphemes, phrases from words, and sentences from phrases. The symbolic object of special importance in language is the sentence &#8212; this is the minimal object that encodes information. Sentences have different moods, and these moods correspond to their function with respect to the encoding and transmission of information. Indicative sentences carry information, interrogative sentences request information, imperative sentences demand action, conditional and modal sentences present alternative possibilities, and so on. The goal of this course is to investigate the association of sound and meaning (or marks and meaning) in stages, beginning with the combinations of phonemes or graphemes into morphemes, and moving on to the construction of larger syntactic entities, ultimately sentences. Building on material taught in Nature of Language, formal theory in the areas of morphology, syntax, and semantics is introduced as we proceed, and as motivated by the linguistic forms under analysis. The endpoint involves the representation of meaning in language, and a consideration of what information is, such that it can be encoded in and transmitted by simple physical entities.', '', '80-180'), '80-341': Course('Computers, Society and Ethics', '80-341', 9, 'This course explores many of the social and ethical issues that have emerged in the wake of the significant advances that we have witnessed in computer science and information technology (IT). Computers and communications technologies have had an increasing impact on the whole of society and have raised new and difficult ethical questions. In turn, these ethical issues have spurred the need for a consideration of new policies and regulations. In this new world of IT, some are concerned about the protection of their privacy while others find problems of censorship and, more generally, restrictions on information access to be their main focus as a problematic social issue. This course will address these and other issues such as: questions of free speech, surveillance in the workplace, intellectual property and copyright, information acquisition and ethics and the Internet.', '', None), '80-324': Course('Philosophy Economics', '80-324', 9, 'The science of economics has come to occupy a central position in contemporary society &#8211; no other science gives rise to such heated emotion. Because of its central position in contemporary political rhetoric, economics becomes intertwined with a number of other philosophical issues surrounding justice, rights, and fairness. This course will look at foundational and philosophical questions that arise in the study of economics and application of economic theory to political problems. We will address issues like, the testability of economic claims, the use of &#8220;rationality&#8221; postulates in economics, the foundation of the right to property, the ability and inability of markets to solve social problems, and measuring the success or failure of an economy.', '', None), '80-109': Course('Philosophy Freshman Seminar: Perspectives on Climate Change', '80-109', 9, "The earth's climate has gone through many changes.  Sorting through  all the predictions and discussion about the changes in climate this  generation will experience can be overwhelming.  In this course we  will look at questions about how to respond to climate change from  several perspectives:  history of the earth sciences, philosophy of  science (what can we know?, how do we know?, what should we ask  next?), and philosophical ethics.  Answering such questions well  relies in part on getting the facts straight, so we will also look at  what scientists have to say on some relevant questions, such as: Has life on the earth ever recovered from a rapid catastrophic  climatic event, and if so, how?  What role do plants and animals,  forests and deserts, oceans and marshlands play in creating and  maintaining  earth's atmosphere?   Then we will consider ethical issues, such as: What should we aim for: mitigation of climate change or adaptation to  climate change &#8212;- or both?  How much should the interests of future  generations be valued in making decisions today. and what principles  or considerations are relevant in deciding this?  Is it still worth  pursuing global cooperation, or should such efforts instead focus on  more regionally oriented aims?  Are there successful stories of  responding to climate change, and if so, what morals can we draw from  them?.", '', None), '80-201': Course('Epistemology', '80-201', 9, 'Epistemology, one of the cornerstones of philosophy since ancient times, concerns the relationships between belief, truth, and knowledge. This course will explore fundamental issues in epistemology, such as the analysis of the concept of knowledge, epistemic justification and scientific method, a priori knowledge, theories of truth, skepticism, reliabilism, and coherentism. Both classic texts and contemporary journal articles will be discussed. There are no prerequisites, but students with some philosophical sophistication and/or formal ability will be more comfortable with the material.', '', None), '80-321': Course('Causation, Law, and Social Policy', '80-321', 9, 'Policy makers face causal questions. For example, does violence on TV cause violence in life, and if so, what policies can we institute that will actually curb it? Does the death penalty actually deter criminals? Do tough drug laws reduce drug use? This course investigates how scientists establish causal claims, and how policy makers and the courts rely on or systematically ignore such science. We examine what causal claims mean and how they connect to statistical data, and we discuss the limits of standard techniques for establishing causal claims. We will consider all of these issues first theoretically, and then in the context of several case studies chosen mostly by the students. Knowledge of social science and/or statistics is not required, but is desirable.', '36-201', None), '80-322': Course('Philosophy of Physics', '80-322', 9, "Philosophical problems in the development of modern physics. Topics include the philosophical significance of Einstein's theory of relativity, interpretations of quantum mechanics, and the relationship between these two theories. Other topics may include the philosophy of space and time, the epistemology of geometry, the significance of modern cosmology, and chaos theory.", '', None), '80-323': Course('Philosophy of Biology', '80-323', 9, 'This course will examine a range of foundational problems in evolutionary biology, as well as the implications of evolutionary biology for some basic topics in philosophy. Issues to be discussed include the meanings and roles of a variety of central concepts (such as species, fitness, function and adaptation) and controversies over adaptationism, genetic information, units of selection and the evolutionary explanation of human behavior. This course will be accessible both to philosophers interested in the epistemological and metaphysical status of evolutionary biology, and to biologists interested in better understanding the foundations of their field. Although there are no formal prerequisites for this course, students will be expected to have taken courses in either philosophy or biology.', '', None), '80-100': Course('Introduction to Philosophy', '80-100', 9, 'In this introductory course we will explore three major areas of Philosophy: Ethics, Metaphysics, and Epistemology. Accordingly the course is divided into three sections. In each section we will read primary sources and discuss some of the main philosophic problems associated with that area. These will include: moral problems (Ethics), problems rising from the debates about free-will, personal identity or intelligence (Metaphysics), and inquiries about the scope and limits of human knowledge (Epistemology). We will then introduce some theories designed to solve such problems, and try to understand the strengths and weaknesses of these theories. We will apply different techniques and theories to issues that we might encounter in the real world. We will use class discussions, homeworks and papers to learn skills for evaluating arguments. These skills include: how to present a philosophic argument, what are the assumptions that justify it, what are its weaknesses and its strengths, whether such weaknesses can be resolved and, if they cannot be resolved, why.', '', None), '80-101': Course('Freshman Seminar: Mathematical Context', '80-101', 9, "This course explores historical, scientific, and philosophical contexts in which mathematics is developed, and the ways in which mathematics enables us to obtain precise descriptions of various aspects of human experience. Topics include the development of non-Euclidean geometry and Riemann's theories of manifolds with applications in cosmology, and the theory of computability with applications in cognitive psychology. Students will become familiar with fundamental set theoretic notions, as well as Turning machines and cellular automata.", '', None), '80-102': Course('Honors Program in Introduction to Philosophy', '80-102', 3, 'This three credits extension of 80-100 is open to Freshmen and Sophomores by invitation of their instructor only. The seminar meetings examine interesting puzzles and open controversies concerning topics raised in 80-100.', '', None), '80-208': Course('Critical Thinking', '80-208', 9, 'This course is an introduction to practical reasoning. The course will contain an elementary introduction to concepts important for reasoning and decision making, such as validity, probability, and utilities. Students will extensively practice critically analyzing and evaluating a wide variety of arguments found in newspapers, magazines, and elementary accounts of scientific reasoning. In order to help students develop the skills to analyze and evaluate arguments, the course will introduce several software packages recently developed at CMU that help students diagram arguments and causal reasoning; these packages have been shown to improve students critical reasoning skills. In addition, students will learn about a wide variety of statistical, logical, psychological, and causal fallacies that are used to mislead people.', '', None), '80-449': Course('EHPP Project Course', '80-449', 12, 'The Ethics, History and Public Policy Project Course is required for the Ethics, History and Public Policy major and is taken in the fall semester of the senior year. In this capstone course, Ethics, History and Public Policy majors carry out a collaborative research project that examines a compelling current policy issue that can be illuminated with historical research and philosophical and policy analysis. The students develop an original research report based on both archival and contemporary policy analysis and they present their results to a client organization in the community.', '', None), '80-411': Course('Proof Theory', '80-411', 9, "This course is an introduction to Hilbert-style proof theory, where the goal is to represent mathematical arguments using formal deductive systems, and study those systems in syntactic, constructive, computational, or otherwise explicit terms. In the first part of the course, we will study various types of deductive systems (axiomatic systems, natural deduction, and sequent calculi) for classical, intuitionistic, and minimal logic. We will prove Gentzen's cut-elimination theorem, and use it to prove various theorems about first-order logic, including Herbrand's theorem, the interpolation theorem, the conservativity of Skolem axioms, and the existence and disjunction properties for intuitionistic logic. In the second part of the course, we will use these tools to study formal systems of arithmetic, including primitive recursive arithmetic, Peano arithmetic, and subsystems of second-order arithmetic. In particular, we will try to understand how mathematics can be formalized in these theories, and what types of information can be extracted using metamathematical techniques.", '80-311 or 80-310 or 21-300', None), '80-180': Course('Nature of Language', '80-180', 9, 'Language is used to talk about the world or to describe it, but how do we go about describing language itself? Linguistics is the name given to the science of language, whose task it is to give such a description.  The discipline of linguistics has developed novel tools for describing and analyzing language over the last two hundred years and in this course we learn what these tools are and practice applying them.  Sub-areas of linguistics which we study include phonetics (the study of speech sounds), phonology (the study of sound systems), morphology (the study of parts of words), and syntax (the study of combinations of words). Beyond this, we look at changes in language over time, and we consider the puzzle of linguistic meaning. The methods of linguistics are useful in the study of particular languages and in the study of language generally, so this course is useful for students of foreign languages as well as those interested in going on to study language acquisition, psycholinguistics, sociolinguistics, philosophy of language, and computer modeling of language.', '', None), '80-264': Course('William James and Philosophical Psychology', '80-264', 9, 'This course will be devoted to the reading and discussion of William James\' "Principles of Psychology", including its relevance to foundational questions about current research.  Though first published in 1891, the foundational issues addressed in this landmark work have not lost their relevance; it is often said that this work set the agendas for much of the research  subsequently carried out in psychology.  This course should appeal to anyone interested in philosophy of mind, philosophy of psychology, and philosophy of science.', '', None), '80-344': Course('Management, Environment, and Ethics', '80-344', 9, 'This course examines and poses answers to the following question: "What are the legitimate environmental responsibilities of organizational managers from the private, public and nonprofit sectors and how can they be best fulfilled?"  This query will provide the course with its major theme and framework.  But in order to do justice to it, three interrelated areas that are presupposed by this question will need to be explored first.  These areas are: 1) applied ethics, 2) management ethics and 3) environmental ethics.  The first half of the course will concentrate upon these three areas.  The second half of the course will focus upon management and the environment employing the insights gained during the first half.  Here students will review and evaluate past and current management practices with respect to the environment, organizational policies dealing with the environment and the role of government in the process of determining environmental responsibilities in management.  Environmental concerns on the international level and their impact upon organizational management, the emergence of the "environmental affairs manager" within organizations, balancing environmental responsibilities with other management responsibilities and examples of management responses to the environmental crises will also be examined during this portion of the course.', '', None), '80-363': Course('19th Century Foundations of Science', '80-363', 9, 'To represent or *picture* aspects of the world through mathematical and other models was a distinctive way of looking at science in the late 19th century.  It has important precedents and is again influential in contemporary discussions in philosophy of science that employ a model-based approach.  We are going to examine scientific and mathematical developments in the 19th century and connect them to both classical as well as to contemporary philosophical work.  Intellectual and popular scientific writings in Logic, Mathematics, Physics, and Psychology will be set in the context of the technology and culture of the era.  Authors to be studied will include Boole, Jevons, Frege; Gauss, Dedekind, Hilbert, Poincare; Maxwell, Hertz, Boltzmann; Lotze, Peirce, James, Helmholtz.', '', None), '80-261': Course('Empiricism and Rationalism', '80-261', 9, 'A central issue in Western philosophy has been whether reason or experience (or some of both?) lies at the foundation of human knowledge, and the 17th and 18th centuries are a defining period of European history because they contribute the basic model of science and the ideals of intellectual and political enlightenment that are still dominant today. Specifically, we will focus on the problems encountered in trying to give an adequate account of the nature of the external world, the structure of our minds, and the nature and limitations of knowledge in the thought of Descartes, Locke, Leibniz, Berkeley, and Hume. The course has two main goals: (1) to study the metaphysical and epistemological theories of selected philosophers, paying close attention to the arguments offered on behalf of often very strange positions, and (2) to help you improve your analytical and critical skills, including, for example, extracting and evaluating philosophical arguments.', '', None), '80-365': Course('Ramsey', '80-365', 9, 'Frank Ramsey played a crucial intellectual role in the Cambridge of Russell, Moore, Wittgenstein and Keynes (just to mention some central figures of the exceptionally lively and creative atmosphere of Cambridge at the beginning of the past century).  During his short life (he died in 1930 at the age of only 26) he made decisive contributions to epistemology, decision theory, philosophical and mathematical logic, philosophy of mathematics, metaphysics and philosophy of science.  Just to mention an example, his paper `Truth and Probability&#8217; laid the foundations of the modern theory of subjective probability and also those of modern utility theory and decision theory. The entire core of Ramsey&#8217;s philosophical and scientific work consists of no more than 15 papers.  But in all cases they are remarkable essays that changed the intellectual topics they touched.  Moreover they all contain the same view of philosophy merging a sound portion of Moorean realism with Ramsey&#8217;s kind of pragmatist philosophy.  The course reviews these central papers and its rich relations with the Cambridge philosophers of this time and the Vienna Circle.  In addition it is remarkable that most of Ramsey&#8217;s views remain valid today almost a century after his death.  So, the course considers as well the impact of Ramsey&#8217;s views in contemporary analytic philosophers and those influenced by early American pragmatism.  The Ramsey Collection at the University of Pittsburgh comprises an almost complete collection of autograph material by Ramsey, roughly 1.500 autograph pages in all.  I am doing some historical research on this material which I intend to incorporate as additional material for the course.', '', None), '80-270': Course('Philosophy of Mind', '80-270', 9, 'The mind poses one of the greatest challenges in our attempts to understand how the world works. In this course, we will explore a variety of fascinating topics that pose these challenges. We shall ask about how the mind relates to the material world, whether a definition of the mind or its various features can be given, whether having a mind makes a difference on the world. More specific topics will concern the relation between minds and computing, the nature of consciousness, what difference there is between thinking and perceiving (when do we perceive, how many forms of perception are there), and whether we can ever be wrong about our minds (e.g. can we ever be wrong that we are in pain?) . We shall also focus on a variety of interesting phenomena and pathologies including split brain patients, bodily illusions, and schizophrenia.', '', None), '80-262': Course('Introduction to the Philosophy of Bertrand Russell', '80-262', 9, 'Near the start of the 20th Century, Bertrand Russell helped to create what today we call &#8220;Analytic Philosophy.&#8221;  We will study Russell&#8217;s contributions to this important approach to Philosophy by using his 1912 book, &#8220;The Problems of Philosophy&#8221; as a springboard to other readings.  The issues we&#8217;ll cover include several specific challenges in the Theory of Knowledge and Perception.  For example, What is the difference between appearance and reality, and can we tell?  Also, we&#8217;ll consider issues that stem from reflecting on our thinking.  For example, What constitutes a philosophical question?.', '', None), '80-221': Course('Philosophy of Social Science', '80-221', 9, 'This course will explore various philosophical issues germane to social science. The central question of the course asks whether we can use traditional scientific tools to understand social phenomena, e.g. wars and religions, in the same way that we use them to understand natural phenomena, e.g. gases, lasers and planetary orbits.  Some of the more specific questions we address: Because humans possess free will and act with intentions while light rays and planets in motion do not, are we forced to use logically different species of explanations in the two cases? How can we explain social institutions that depend upon cooperation? Whereas natural scientists actively conduct experiments, social scientists can often only collect statistical data. Does this difference prevent social scientists from inferring causal relations? Is our understanding of social phenomena always value laden?.', '', None), '80-220': Course('Philosophy of Science', '80-220', 9, "In this course, we will examine some historical case studies (e.g., the Copernican revolution in astronomy) against which we will assess views pertaining to the significance, justification, and production of scientific knowledge. For example, should scientific theories be understood literally or as computational devices for deriving new predictions? How can universal conclusions ever be justified by a finite data set? Does explanation contribute to a theory's confirmation by the evidence? Does science aim to find the truth? Is probability in the world or only in our minds? Is explanation a matter of finding causes or are causes whatever it is that explains? Is scientific rationality objective or culture-relative?.", '', None), '80-223': Course('Philosophy of Economics', '80-223', 9, None, '', None), '80-222': Course('Measurement and Methodology', '80-222', 9, 'This is intended as an introduction to the theory of measurement. How are units chosen? Under what conditions do qualitative relationships determine quantitative ones? We shall investigate theories of extensive measurement, with and without error. Applications will be taken from the natural and social sciences. Prerequisites: None specifically; however, students should have background in elementary logic and be comfortable with taking mathematical approaches to conceptual problems.', 'None specifically; however, students should have background in elementary logic and be comfortable with taking mathematical approaches to conceptual problems', None), '80-241': Course('Ethical Judgments in Professional Life', '80-241', 9, 'This is a multimedia, hybrid course that examines the numerous ethical issues, problems and dilemmas that confront professionals in such areas as medicine, law, engineering, the media, government and the natural and social sciences. As a hybrid course, it includes educational materials in video streaming format, an audio CD, an electronic discussion board and web-based &#8220;guided inquiries&#8221; that students navigate and complete. Topics discussed include: Responsibility in the professions, obligations to clients, conflicts of interest, Whistleblowing, codes of ethics and ethics in engineering, medicine, law, media, computer science and business among others. This course meets one day a week and employs a case study discussion format during class.', '', None), '80-226': Course('Revolutions in Science', '80-226', 9, 'Contemporary science emerged in the 17th century from a series of dramatic innovations in theory and method that has come to be called the Scientific Revolution. Since then, science has been punctuated by repeated &#8216;revolutions&#8217; in which scientists have been forced to select among dramatically different frameworks for explaining the world: is the Earth or the sun at the center of the solar system? Do kinds of organisms develop from other kinds, or is each created independently? Is matter infinitely divisible or are all things made of atoms in a void? The way scientists choose one framework over another can tell us something about the nature of science. In this course, we will focus on episodes of scientific change to gain insight into a range of questions:  Is scientific change governed by a single method or does each new revolution involve the invention of a new scientific method? How do scientists argue for the existence of unobservable processes, properties, or objects like atoms? In what way do these arguments differ from those of their ancient predecessors? What makes them compelling? We&#8217;ll begin our investigation by examining the overthrow of ancient Greek astronomy and physics by Galileo, Kepler, and Newton. We will then turn to a number of subsequent revolutions in other areas of science such as chemistry, geology, and evolutionary biology. Students will work with original texts by Galileo, Newton, Darwin, and others.', '', None), '80-405': Course('Game Theory', '80-405', 9, 'Game theory is the branch of decision theory in which decision problems interact. This course will cover those parts of game theory of special interest to social scientists and philosophers. We will discuss specific elements of the formal theory, including: the distinction between cooperative and non-cooperative games, games in the strategic and the extensive form, solution concepts, epistemic conditions needed to predict outcomes of games, equilibrium refinements, dynamical models of equilibrium selection, and folk theorems of indefinitely repeated games. We will discuss results in experimental economics that test some of the assumptions of classical game theory. Throughout the course we will examine applications of the formal concepts of game theory to problems in moral and political philosophy and the social sciences. Prerequisites: background either in decision theory, rational choice, probability, or statistics.', 'background either in decision theory, rational choice, probability, or statistics', None), '80-276': Course('Philosophy of Religion', '80-276', 9, 'In order to expand our ideas about what religion could be, the course begins with a brief cross-cultural review of some major religious traditions around the world.  Then we turn to some more traditional arguments for and against theism, including the ontological, cosmological, and design arguments, the argument from religious experience, the argument from miracles and historical testimony, and the problem of evil.  We will also consider whether morality ultimately depends on God&#8217;s sanctions and (yes, here it is at Carnegie Mellon) whether life would be meaningless if God did not exist.', '', None), '80-251': Course('Modern Philosophy', '80-251', 9, "Descartes' project to doubt all received knowledge and begin from scratch marked the beginning of an intellectual upheaval, helping to launch what is now called the Modern period of philosophical thought; the Western world is today the heir of modernism. Locke, Leibniz, Hume, and Kant are several of the most important figures of this period. We will examine works of these thinkers, exploring both the new sorts of questions that these philosophers raised and their new methods of doing philosophy, which together mark a fundamental break with the traditions that preceded them. We will devote special attention to the new theories of knowledge they proposed. The philosophical revolution of the 17th and 18th centuries occurred during a time of great scientific progress and political upheaval in Europe; as part of our course we will consider the relation of certain of these developments to the new questions and methods of the modern philosophers.", '', None), '80-313': Course('Philosphical Logic', '80-313', 9, 'A survey of the areas of logic that every philosophical logician must   know, most philosophers should know, and any philosophy student may   wish to know: modal logic, epistemic, dynamic, deontic, and temporal logics,   intuitionistic logic, higher-order logic, constructive logic and type   theory, relevance logic, conditionals, Kripke semantics, Scott-Montague Semantics, probabilistic semantics and others.  In various cases we will discuss recent work including  unpublished  papers and book drafts.  We will consider both the formal details and the philosophical adequacy of the various surveyed formalisms.   Prerequisites: 80-310 or equivalent.', '80-310 or equivalent', None), '80-275': Course('Metaphysics', '80-275', 9, 'The topical agenda of this course will vary. Typical topics include the problem of personal identity, the nature of human freedom, the nature of the self, the nature of reality and being, the nature of causality, and the question of whether solutions to such problems can be given. Classical as well as contemporary philosophic texts will be studied.  For Spring 2011: Issues we will consider, in no particular order, include: Do properties exist? Why should you think there is an external world? What is a number? Why should you think other people have mental states? What are natural kinds? What constitutes the identity of things through time? What constitutes the identity of persons through time? What does determinism mean? Is there freedom of the will? What is possibility? What is necessity? Are there other possible worlds?  When does one event cause another, and what does that mean? What could a deity be, and should you think there is one?.', '', None), '80-271': Course('Philosophy and Psychology', '80-271', 9, 'This course has two parts. First, we will look at basic concepts used in psychology (and cognitive science broadly) through the lens of philosophy including: representation, computation, information, explanation, modularity, attention, automaticity and control. Having some concrete proposals about these ideas will allow us to formulate psychological claims more concretely. Second, we will reverse course and look at traditional philosophical problems through the lens of psychology focusing on three topics: consciousness, agency, and perception. Specifically: what is consciousness, what is it to be an agent, what is it to perceive?.', '', None), '80-305': Course('Rational Choice', '80-305', 9, "This course will cover selected topics in rational choice theory, which informally is the analysis of how to make a correct decision in a given context. The course offers an introduction to the main normative theories of rational choice: von Neumann-Morgenstern theory of expected utility, Anscombe-Aumann's account and Savage's theory of choice under uncertainty. The course also includes an introduction to the main descriptive accounts of decision making used in Psychology and Economics. Possible topics may include, and are not limited to:  a review of the main theories of non-expected utility and related issues in the psychology of judgment and decision making (especially recent advances extending Rank Dependent Utility and Prospect theory from risk to uncertainty) , game-theoretic problems of conflict and coordination, the role of heuristics in choice behavior and strategic reasoning, as well as recent theories that abandon the Bayesian assumption that the decision maker's beliefs can always be represented by a unique probability distribution.   This course will stress the role that formal methods can play in the analysis of decisions and alternative applications of decision theory to issues in philosophy and social science.", '', None), '80-110': Course('Nature of Mathematical Reasoning', '80-110', 9, 'This course focuses on understanding mathematical reasoning, not on mastering a particular mathematical theory like linear algebra or calculus. It explores instances of mathematical reasoning and rigorous argumentation, with examples from the history of science and mathematics. We consider the "Lets Make a Deal" puzzle, the counter-intuitive results of HIV testing, and how to assess the relative size of infinite sets, all problems which defy intuitive solution but which look simple after they are put in mathematical form. The course is designed for students at the freshman and sophomore levels who are not interested in a mathematically intense major.', '', None), '80-351': Course('Kant', '80-351', 9, None, '', None), '80-150': Course('Nature of Reason', '80-150', 9, 'This course offers an intellectual history of philosophical views regarding the nature of human reasoning in mathematics and the sciences, from ancient to modern times. The first part of the course traces the search for deductive methods for obtaining certain knowledge, starting with Aristotle and Euclid, and continuing through the Middle Ages and late Renaissance thought, to the work of Boole and Frege in the nineteenth century. The second part of the course considers the history of skepticism about empirical knowledge, covering Plato, Sextus Empiricus, Descartes, Pascal, and Hume, along with replies to skepticism in the works of Bayes and Kant. The third part of the course discusses theories of the nature of mind, culminating in the computational conception of mind that underlies contemporary cognitive science.', '', None), '80-291': Course('', '80-291', 9, 'This course emphasizes the philosophical, cultural, and sociological aspects of multimedia. The course will explore these issues historically and thematically by looking at central figures in the early days of computers and communication theory (e.g., Alan Turing and Claude Shannon) and recent work by writers such as Brenda Laurel (Computers as Theatre), George Landow (HyperText 2.0), and Janet Murray (Hamlet on the Holodeck: The Future of Narrative in Cyberspace). This is not a technical course in issues relating to the creation of multimedia software. It is a course concerned with the meaning of multimedia authoring in its contemporary societal context.', '', None), '80-311': Course('Undecidability and Incompleteness', '80-311', 9, 'The course focuses on two central problems of mathematical logic: the undecidability of predicate logic (established by Church and Turing) and the incompleteness of formal theories (discovered by G&#246;del for theories that contain a modicum of set or number theory).  The solutions of these problems involve the concept of computation that turned out to be fundamental for computer science, but also cognitive science.    We first discuss predicate logic and systematic ways of constructing proofs; that is followed by the formal development of elementary set theory.  The concept of Turing machine computation is introduced and shown to be equivalent to the concept of recursive function. That provides the mathematical, methodologically adequate tools for establishing the results mentioned above.   The mathematical and computational notions and results are among the most significant contributions of logic, not just to the solution of internal logical questions and to the foundations of computer science, but also to (the beginnings of) a deeper understanding of the human mind and mental processes.', '80-210 or 80-211 or 21-300 or 80-310 or 15-251', None), '80-413': Course('Category Theory', '80-413', 9, 'Category theory is a formal framework devoted to studying the structural relationships between mathematical objects. Developed in the mid-20th century to attack geometrical problems, subsequent progress has revealed deep connections to algebra and logic, as well as to mathematical physics and computer science. The course emphasizes two perspectives. On one hand, we develop the basic theory of categories, regarded as mathematical structures in their own right. At the same time, we will consider the application of these results to concrete examples from logic and algebra.', '', None),'10-601': Course('Machine Learning','10-601',12,'Machine Learning (ML) attempts to design programs that automatically improve their performance through experience. This includes learning many types of tasks based on many types of experience, e.g. spotting high-risk medical patients, recognizing speech, classifying text documents, detecting credit card fraud, or driving autonomous robots. 10601 covers concept learning, version spaces, decision trees, neural networks, computational learning theory, active learning, estimation &amp; the bias-variance tradeoff, hypothesis testing, Bayesian learning, the MDL principle, the Gibbs classifier, Naive Bayes, Bayes Nets &amp; Graphical Models, the EM algorithm, Hidden Markov Models, K-Nearest-Neighbors and nonparametric learning, reinforcement learning, genetic algorithms, bagging and boosting. 10601 focuses on the mathematical, statistical and computational foundations of the field. It emphasizes the role of assumptions in machine learning. As we introduce different ML techniques, we work out together what assumptions are implicit in them. We use the Socratic method whenever possible; student participation is expected. Grading is based on weekly written assignments, biweekly programming assignments, midterm and final. Prerequisites: strong quantitative aptitude, college prob&amp;stats course, and programming proficiency (&gt;200 line programs). Recommended for CS Seniors &amp; Juniors, quantitative Masters students, &amp; non-ML PhD students. For learning to apply ML practically &amp; effectively, consider 11344/05834 instead.','15-122 and 21-127','21-325 or 15-359 or 36-225 or 36-217'),'09-435': Course('Independent Study Chemistry', '09-435', None, "The course allows students to earn academic credit for concentrated study in a topic area developed in conjunction with and monitored by a faculty member in the Department of Chemistry.  These topics are distinct from projects that would rise to the level of undergraduate research either because they are in unrelated areas distinct from the faculty member's research interests or may constitute the investigation and compilation of existing information from a variety of resources and may not be expected to result in the generation of new information as is a reasonable expected outcome in undergraduate research (likely is not publishable).", '', None), '33-451': Course('Senior Research', '33-451', None, 'Open to all senior physics majors. May include research done in a research lab, extending the capabilities of a teaching lab, or a theoretical or computational physics project. The student experiences the less structured atmosphere of a research program where there is much room for independent initiative. Modern Physics Laboratory, 33-340, should precede this course, though it is not required. A list of research projects is available. The student must contact a faculty member and/or the Assistant Head for the Undergraduate Affairs before registering so that student project pairings can be set. Reports on results are required at end of semester.', '', None), '42-101': Course('Introduction to Biomedical Engineering', '42-101', 12, 'This course will provide exposure to basic biology and engineering problems associated with living systems and health care delivery. Examples will be used to illustrate how basic concepts and tools of science &amp; engineering can be brought to bear in understanding, mimicking and utilizing biological processes. The course will focus on four areas:  biotechnology, biomechanics, biomaterials and tissue engineering and biosignal and image processing and will introduce the basic life sciences and engineering concepts associated with these topics. Pre-requisite OR co-requisite:  03-121 Modern Biology.', '', '03-121'), '09-109': Course('Kitchen Chemistry Sessions', '09-109', 3, 'Ever wanted to boil water in ice? Cook an egg so the yolk is set but the white still runny? Lick a lemon or drink vinegar but have it taste&#8221;sweet? Make &#8220;caviar&#8221; from fruit juice and noodles from yogurt? Explore the science of molecular gastronomy through the lectures and demonstrations that reveal the chemistry and biochemistry of food ingredients and their preparation. Then use a kitchen as your &#8220;laboratory&#8221; to test hypotheses and delve into molecular cooking - you may just get to eat your lab results.  For this course high school background in chemistry would help but nothing more advanced is required.  Concepts will be discussed on a need to know basis. Students with stronger chemistry backgrounds should enroll in 09-209. 3 hrs. lec. and lab.', '', None), '33-213': Course('Mini-Course in Special Relativity', '33-213', 4, 'This course spans the first six weeks of 33-211, Physics III: Modern Essentials. It treats the Mechanics aspects of Special Relativity, including topics such as simultaneity, the Lorentz transformation, time dilation, length contraction, space-time geometry, resolving some famous puzzles, and the momentum, mass, and energy relations. The Electricity and Magnetism portions of the subject are deferred until the junior/senior courses in E&amp;M (33-338/33-339).', '33-112 or 33-132 or 33-107', None), '09-345': Course('Physical Chemistry (Thermo): Macroscopic Principles of Physical Chemistry', '09-345', 9, 'The measurement and theoretical descriptions of the equilibrium properties of chemical systems are presented. Chemical thermodynamics is introduced at the upper division level. The phases of matter are discussed. The quantitative treatment of mixtures is developed. The detailed description of chemical equilibrium is elaborated. The measurement and theoretical description of the nonequilibrium properties of chemical systems are presented. Elementary transport properties are introduced. The principles of classical chemical kinetics are developed in great detail. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '09-106 and (21-259 or 09-231)', None), '09-344': Course('Physical Chemistry (Quantum): Microscopic Principles of Physical Chemistry', '09-344', 9, 'The measurement and theoretical description of the properties of atoms and molecules are presented. The elementary principles of quantum chemistry are developed. The many types of spectroscopy used to study atoms and molecules are described. Methods of atomic structure determination are discussed. The structure and properties of solids are also presented. The basic results of statistical chemistry are outlined and a brief connection to thermodynamics is made. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '(09-105 or 09-107) and (33-106 or 33-111', '09-231'), '09-105': Course('Introduction to Modern Chemistry I', '09-105', 10, 'This course begins with a very brief survey of some fundamental principles of chemistry and a presentation of chemically interesting applications and sophisticated problems. These will form the basis for introducing the relationships between the structure of molecules and their chemical properties and behavior. The subject matter will include principles of atomic structure, chemical bonding, intermolecular interactions and molecular structures of organic and inorganic compounds including some transition metal complexes. Relevant examples will be drawn from such areas as environmental, materials, and biological chemistry. 3 hrs. lec, 2 hrs. rec.', '', None), '09-104': Course('Fundamental Aspects of Organic Chemistry and Biochemistry', '09-104', 9, 'This course, which includes demonstrations and "hands-on" activities, is designed to engage non-majors in the fascination of chemistry. It is not essential that a student has completed 09-103 in order to take this course. The lecture part of this course will include wide ranging science topics designed to put the world of chemistry in perspective.  After achieving a competency in fundamentals we proceed to systematically survey the important topics of synthesis, structure and mechanism in organic chemistry. With these insights we finally confront the important biological molecules including DNA. 3 hrs lec.,1 hr rec.', '', None), '09-107': Course('Honors Chemistry: Fundamentals Concepts and Applications', '09-107', 10, 'Honors Chemistry is an introductory course that teaches the foundations of Modern Chemistry and applies them to current scientific issues, such as Green Chemistry, Biotechnology and Materials Science.  Topics include modern theories of bonding, organization of atoms, molecular interactions, biochemistry and transition metal chemistry.  Enrollment is limited to first-year students, with priority given to those in MCS. 3 hrs. lec., 2 hrs. rec.', '', None), '03-401': Course('Undergraduate Colloquium for Seniors', '03-401', None, 'The purpose of this seminar series is to update biology undergraduates about university and departmental functions, seminars, etc. that are pertinent or useful. In addition, research talks by faculty and undergraduates will be used to introduce students to the research being conducted in faculty laboratories. Additional topics may include graduate and medical school applications, career options, topics in the press, and important scientific discoveries.', '', None), '09-101': Course('Introduction to Experimental Chemistry', '09-101', 3, 'This is a seven week chemistry laboratory course that is designed to introduce students to some basic laboratory skills, techniques, and equipment commonly used in experimental chemical investigations. The experiments will apply concepts in organic synthesis, quantitative analysis using visible spectrophotometry, kinetics, acid-base chemistry, thermochemistry, transition metal chemistry, chromatography, and protein biochemistry.  1 hr. lec., 3 hrs. lab.', '', None), '09-103': Course('Atoms, Molecules and Chemical Change', '09-103', 9, 'This is a one-semester introductory college level course designed for non-science and engineering majors who have had a high school course in chemistry.  Students with primary or additional majors in MCS, CIT or SCS will not be allowed to enroll.  Chemistry topics will be introduced on an as needed basis in the contexts of air pollution, the ozone layer, global warming, acid rain, safe drinking water, alternative energy sources, plastics, and drug design.  Students will apply concepts in topics such as the classification of matter, the relationship between matter and energy, atomic theory and the Periodic Table, chemical bonding, molecular shapes, molecular polarity, interparticle forces, chemical reactions, stoichiometry, properties of aqueous solutions, acid-base chemistry, redox chemistry, and organic chemistry.  Students will gain an understanding of how chemistry impacts major environmental, social, political, and economic issues that we encounter daily.  They will also learn to apply chemical concepts to new situations or contexts. Students with credit for 09-105 or more advanced chemistry courses will not be allowed to enroll in this course.  3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '', None), '16-362': Course('Mobile Robot Programming Laboratory', '16-362', 12, 'This course is a comprehensive hands-on introduction to the concepts and basic algorithms needed to make a mobile robot function reliably and effectively. We will work in groups with Nomad Scout robots and interface to them using laptops programmed in the Java programming language in a modern code development environment. This is a lab course with emphasis is on hands-on learning. You will get experience in this course in addition to some theory. Lectures are focused on the content of the next lab. There is a lab every week and they build on each other so that a complete robot software system results. The course will culminate with a class-wide competition that tests the performance of all of your code implemented in the semester. Typically, your code is at least 5000 lines of Java written jointly with 2 other people. Students must have a 2nd year science/engineering level background in mathematics (matrices, vectors, coordinate systems, basic kinematics) to succeed in the course. Students must have mastered (1 programming course experience) computer programming in a procedural language like C or Java to succeed in the course. The following experience, while not required, will be an asset: a) familiarity with basic computer science data structures and algorithms (equivalent to taking 15-121), b) experience with Eclipse and Subversion or equivalent software development tools, c) experience collaboratively designing and implementing a software system &gt;= 5,000 lines of code.', '', None), '09-220': Course('Modern Organic Chemistry II', '09-220', 10, 'This course builds on 09-219 by introducing students to additional functional groups, chemical reaction mechanisms and synthetic strategies commonly used in the practice of organic chemistry. Advanced topics to be presented during the extra lecture will include multidimensional NMR spectroscopy, enantioselective synthesis, ionic polymerization, bioorganic and medicinal chemistry, natural products chemistry and toxicology. Students who complete 09-220 will have a strong foundation in synthetic, mechanistic and structural organic chemistry and will understand how this applies to human health and the environment. 4 hrs. lec, 1 hr. rec.', '09-219', None), '36-410': Course('Introduction to Probability Modeling', '36-410', 9, 'An introductory-level course in stochastic processes. Topics typically include Poisson processes, Markov chains, birth and death processes, random walks, recurrent events, and renewal theory. Examples are drawn from reliability theory, queuing theory, inventory theory, and various applications in the social and physical sciences.', '21-325 or 36-225 or 36-217 or 36-625', None), '09-222': Course('Laboratory II: Organic Synthesis and Analysis', '09-222', 12, 'In this second course in the laboratory sequence, students acquire laboratory skills relevant to synthesis and purification of organic compounds, as well as the practical use of chromatography and spectroscopy. Students will also further develop technical writing skills through preparation of lab reports. 2 hrs. lec., 6 hrs. lab.', '(09-217 or 09-219) and 09-22', '09-220 or 09-218'), '03-364': Course('Developmental Neuroscience', '03-364', 9, 'This course examines the principles that govern the developmental assembly of a complex nervous system. Topics range from the earliest steps of induction of neural tissue and birth of neurons to the plasticity within developing circuits and the development of behavior. By the end of this course students should be able to describe the major steps in neural development and to interpret key experiments using vertebrate and invertebrate models have helped to elucidate these steps.  This course is taught on the University of Pittsburgh campus by faculty from Carnegie Mellon and Pitt.', '03-362 or 03-240 or 03-363', None), '03-363': Course('Systems Neuroscience', '03-363', 9, 'Modern neuroscience is an interdisciplinary field that seeks to understand the function of the brain and nervous system.  This course provides a comprehensive survey of systems neuroscience, a rapidly growing scientific field that seeks to link the structure and function of brain circuitry to perception and behavior.  This course will explore brain systems through a combination of classical, Nobel prize-winning data and cutting edge primary literature.  Topics will include sensory systems, motor function, animal behavior and human behavior in health and disease.  Lectures will provide fundamental information as well as a detailed understanding of experimental designs that enabled discoveries.  Finally, students will learn to interpret and critique the diverse and multimodal data that drives systems neuroscience.', '03-121 or 03-762 or 03-362 or 85-219 or 15-386', None), '03-362': Course('Cellular Neuroscience', '03-362', 9, "Modern neuroscience is an interdisciplinary field that seeks to understand the function of the brain and nervous system. This course provides a comprehensive survey of cellular and molecular neuroscience ranging from molecules to simple neural circuits. Topics covered will include the properties of biological membranes, the electrical properties of neurons, neural communication and synaptic transmission, mechanisms of brain plasticity and the analysis of simple neural circuits. In addition to providing information the lectures will describe how discoveries were made and will develop students' abilities to design experiments and interpret data.", '03-121', None), '42-203': Course('Biomedical Engineering Laboratory', '42-203', 9, 'This laboratory course is designed to provide students with the ability to make measurements on and interpret data from living systems.  The experimental modules reinforce concepts from 42-101 Introduction to Biomedical Engineering and expose students to four areas of biomedical engineering: biomedical signal and image processing, biomaterials, biomechanics, and cellular and molecular biotechnology.  Several cross-cutting modules are included as well.  The course includes weekly lectures to complement the experimental component.    Prerequisites:  42-101 Introduction to Biomedical Engineering and 03-121 Modern Biology.  Pre-med students should register for 03-206.  Priority for enrollment will be given to students who have declared the Additional Major in Biomedical Engineering.', ' 42-101 Introduction to Biomedical Engineering and 03-121 Modern Biology.  Pre-med students should register for 03-206.  Priority for enrollment will be given to students who have declared the Additional Major in Biomedical Engineering', None), '42-200': Course('Sophomore BME Research Project', '42-200', None, 'Research projects for sophomores under the direction of a regular or adjunct BME faculty member.  Arrangements may also be made via the Associate Head of BME for off-campus projects provided that a regular or adjunct BME faculty member agrees to serve as a co-advisor.  The nature of the project, the number of units, and the criteria for grading are to be determined between the student and the research advisor.  The agreement should be summarized in a two-page project description with sign-off by the research advisor and a copy submitted for review and filing with the BME Department.  A final written report or oral presentation of the results is required.  Units may vary from 3 to 12 according to the expected time commitment, with one unit corresponding to 1 hour of research per week.', '', None), '05-431': Course('Software Structures for User Interfaces', '05-431', 6, "This course is intended for those with advanced programming skills who want to do serious development of graphical user interfaces. This course includes: an introduction to task analysis and functional design of the user interface; basic principles of computer graphics used in UI implementation; event handling and event dispatching models; screen update algorithms and multi-view architectures; input syntax formalisms and their transformation into programs; interactive geometry; architectures for advanced features such as cut/copy/paste, macros and groupware.  The course is intended for computer science majors. In some cases, the student and the Program Director will jointly determine the choice of 05-430 or 05-431, based upon the student's previous programming experience.  When registering for this course, undergraduate students are automatically placed the wait list. Students will be then moved into the class, based on if they are in the BHCI second major and year in school e.g. seniors, juniors, etc.", '', None), '05-430': Course('Programming Usable Interfaces', '05-430', 6, 'This course is for those with moderate programming skills who want to express their interactive ideas in working prototypes.  The course will cover several prototyping tools and require a number of prototypes to be constructed in each.  These will range from animated mock-ups through fully functional programs.  The course will also cover usability testing of interactive prototypes.  Prerequisities:  proficiency in a programming language such as C, programming methodology and style, problem analysis, program structure, algorithm analysis, data abstraction, and dynamic data, normally met through an introductory course in programming in C, C++, Pascal or JAVA.  When registering for this course, undergraduate students are automatically placed the wait list. Students will be then moved into the class, based on if they are in the BHCI second major and year in school e.g. seniors, juniors, etc', '15-127 or 15-112 or 15-100', None), '05-433': Course('User Interface Lab', '05-433', 9, None, '', None), '05-432': Course('Personalized Online Learning', '05-432', 12, 'Cognitive Modeling and Intelligent Tutoring Systems 05-432 / 05-832  This course is offered as a 9-credit version and a 12-credit version. The 9-credit version of the course does not involve programming, the 12-credit version involves rule-based programming, as detailed below.  This course addresses the use of cognitive psychology and cognitive task analysis to create computer-based intelligent tutoring systems. Students will learn data-driven and theoretical methods for creating cognitive models of human problem solving. Such models have been used to create educational software that has been demonstrated to dramatically enhance student learning in domains like mathematics and computer programming. This type of software, which originated at CMU and is now widely used in US high schools and middle schools,  is probably the premier application of cognitive science in education.  In addition to discussion and readings on methods and models of problem solving, learning, and tutor design, the course will have a substantial &#8220;learning by doing&#8221; component. Students will be analyzing data, designing cognitive models and interfaces, and implementing an intelligent tutoring system.  Students will use CTAT (the Cognitive Tutor Authoring Tools, see <a href="http://ctat.pact.cs.cmu.edu">http://ctat.pact.cs.cmu.edu</a>) to construct tutors. Tutors built with CTAT for middle-school mathematics can be found on the Mathtutor web site (<a href="http://mathtutor.web.cmu.edu">http://mathtutor.web.cmu.edu</a>).  The hands-on portion of the course differs between the 9-credit version or the 12-credit version. In the 9-credit version of the course, students will use the CTAT tools for non-programmers to create tutors. In this version of the course, no programming is required and no programming background is needed. In the 12-credit version of the course, students will learn to create rule-based cognitive models for more sophisticated tutors, a form of Artificial Intelligence programming. They will learn to program', '85-411 or 85-213 or 15-211', None), '03-240': Course('Cell Biology', '03-240', 9, 'This course provides descriptive information and mechanistic detail concerning key cellular processes in six areas: membrane function, protein targeting, signaling, cytoskeleton, cell division, and cell interaction. An attempt is made to introduce the methodology that was used to obtain this information and to discuss how our understanding of these processes relates to the treatment of human disease.', '03-121 and (03-232 or 03-231)', None), '05-434': Course('Applied Machine Learning', '05-434', 12, 'Machine Learning is concerned with computer programs that enable the behavior of a computer to be learned from examples or experience rather than dictated through rules written by hand. It has practical value in many application areas of computer science such as on-line communities and digital libraries. This class is meant to teach the practical side of machine learning for applications, such as mining newsgroup data or building adaptive user interfaces. The emphasis will be on learning the process of applying machine learning effectively to a variety of problems rather than emphasizing an understanding of the theory behind what makes machine learning work. This course does not assume any prior exposure to machine learning theory or practice. In the first 2/3 of the course, we will cover a wide range of learning algorithms that can be applied to a variety of problems. In particular, we will cover topics such as decision trees, rule based classification, support vector machines, Bayesian networks, and clustering. In the final third of the class, we will go into more depth on one application area, namely the application of machine learning to problems involving text processing, such as information retrieval or text categorization.', '', None), '42-202': Course('Physiology', '42-202', 9, 'This course is an introduction to human physiology and includes units on all major organ systems.  Particular emphasis is given to the musculoskeletal, cardiovascular, respiratory, digestive, excretory, and endocrine systems.  Modules on molecular physiology tissue engineering and physiological modeling are also included.  Due to the close interrelationship between structure and function in biological systems, each functional topic will be introduced through a brief exploration of anatomical structure.  Basic physical laws and principles will be explored as they relate to physiologic function.  Prerequisite or co-requisite:  03-121 Modern Biology, or permission of instructor.', '', '03-121'), '33-456': Course('Advanced Computational Physics', '33-456', 9, 'This course emphasizes application of practical numerical techniques to the types of problems that are encountered by practicing physicists. The student will be expected to understand the principles behind numerical methods such as SVD decomposition, chi-squared minimization, and Fast Fourier Transforms and Monte Carlo simulation of experiments. Applications will include data analysis and eigenvalue problems. Emphasis will be placed on the ability to implement complex algorithms accurately by devising methods of checking results and debugging code. The students will be expected to become proficient in Fortran or C programming.', '33-241', None), '09-445': Course('Undergraduate Research', '09-445', None, 'Properly qualified students may undertake research projects under the direction of members of the faculty, normally 6 to 12 hrs/week. A written, detailed report describing the project and results is required. Course may be taken only with the consent of a faculty research advisor in chemistry or on occasion in another department provided that the project is chemical in nature and with permission of the Director of Undergraduate Studies. The number of units taken generally corresponds to the actual number of hours the student actually spends in the lab doing research during the week. Maximum number of units taken per semester is 18.', '', None), '36-315': Course('Statistical Graphics and Visualization', '36-315', 9, 'Graphical displays of quantitative information take on many forms as they help us understand both data and models.  This course will serve to introduce the student to the most common forms of graphical displays and their uses and misuses.  Students will learn both how to create these displays and how to understand them. As time permits the course will consider some more advanced graphical methods such as computer-generated animations.  Each student will be required to engage in a project using graphical methods to understand data collected from a real scientific or engineering experiment. In addition to two weekly lectures there will be lab sessions where the students learn to use software to aid in the production of appropriate graphical displays.', '70-208 or 88-250 or 36-625 or 36-226 or 36-303 or 36-202 or 36-208 or 36-309', None), '33-106': Course('Physics I for Engineering Students', '33-106', 12, "This is a first semester, calculus-based introductory physics course. Basic principles of mechanics and thermodynamics are developed. Topics include vectors, displacement, velocity, acceleration, force, equilibrium, mass, Newton's laws, gravitation, work, energy, momentum, impulse, temperature, heat, equations of state, thermodynamic processes, heat engines, refrigerators, first and second laws of thermodynamics, and the kinetic theory of gases.", '', '21-120'), '42-447': Course('Rehabilitation Engineering', '42-447', 9, 'Rehabilitation engineering involves the application of engineering principles to design, develop, adapt, and apply technology to problems confronted by individuals with disabilities.  It differs from classical biomedical engineering by its focus on improving the quality of people&#8217;s lives, rather than improving medical treatment.  The course surveys assistive technologies for various functional limitations - including mobility, hearing, vision, communication, and cognition - applied to activities associated with independent living, education, employment, and integration into the community.  We consider human factors and market forces that make some innovative technologies successful and others commercial failures.  Engineering innovation by itself - without considering other factors &#8211; means that some innovative technologies don&#8217;t become or remain available to aid people with disabilities.', '', None), '33-107': Course('Physics II for Engineering Students', '33-107', 12, "This is the second half of a two-semester calculus-based introductory physics sequence for engineering students. The course covers waves, including standing and travelling waves, superposition, beats, reflection, interference, electricity, including electrostatics and electric fields, Gauss' law, electric potential, and simple circuits, magnetism, including magnetic forces, magnetic fields, induction and electromagnetic radiation.", '21-120 and 33-10', '21-122'), '36-490': Course('Undergraduate Research', '36-490', 9, 'This course is designed to give undergraduate students experience using statistics in real research problems. Small groups of students will be matched with clients and do supervised research for a semester.  Students will gain skills in approaching a research problem, critical thinking, statistical analysis, scientific writing, and conveying and defending their results to an audience. Eligible students will receive information about the application processes for this course early in the fall.', '36-40', '36-402'), '33-104': Course('Experimental Physics', '33-104', 9, 'This course provides first year students and sophomores with an introduction to the methods of experimental physics. Particular emphasis is placed on three aspects of experimentation: laboratory technique, including both the execution and the documentation of an experiment; data analysis, including the treatment of statistical and systematic errors and computer-aided analysis of experimental data; and written communication of experimental procedures and results. The concepts and skills for measurement and data analysis are acquired gradually through a series of experiments covering a range of topics from mechanics to nuclear and atomic physics.', '', None), '09-401': Course('Undergraduate Seminar V', '09-401', 1, 'Students attend seminars on current topics in chemistry.  Students are sent a menu of choices for each week of the semester and may select topics of interest.  Enrollment is restricted to students majoring in chemistry. 1 hr.', '', None), '09-402': Course('Undergraduate Seminar VI', '09-402', 3, "Students enrolled in this course present a 20 - 30 minute oral report on a current topic in chemistry. This may be from the student's research work or a special chemistry topic of general interest. Presentations or papers prepared for other courses are not acceptable for this purpose. Thoroughness in the use of the chemical literature is emphasized. The use of presentation aids such as PowerPoint is required. Other students in the class submit written evaluations of the presentation. Talks are recorded for viewing by the student and instructor as a means of providing individualized feedback about presentation skills. A seminar presentation is required of all chemistry majors. No exceptions possible. Enrollment is limited to students majoring in chemistry. 1 hr.", '', None), '09-106': Course('Modern Chemistry II', '09-106', 10, 'This course provides an overview of  themodynamics, kinetics and chemical equilibrium. Topics include the flow of energy in chemical systems; the spontaneity of chemical processes, i.e. entropy and free energy; the mechanisms and rates of chemical reations; and the use of chemical equilibrium to reason about acid-base chemistry, solubility and electrochemistry. Applications include the energy economy, biological systems and environmental chemistry. 3 hrs. lec., 2 hrs. rec.', '09-107 or 09-105', None), '33-201': Course('Physics Sophomore Colloquium I', '33-201', 2, 'This course (together with 33-202) is designed to give students an overview of the field of Physics and to help students make knowledgeable choices in both their academic and professional careers. We discuss several of the sub-fields of Physics in order to give students an understanding of the types of activities, from research to industrial applications, in each. Over the two semesters, we typically discuss six subfields in some detail with the goal of providing a minimal literacy in the relevant concepts and language. The course consists of one classroom lecture per week plus one hour per week of reading and/or problem solving.', '', None), '33-202': Course('Physics Sophomore Colloquium II', '33-202', 2, 'Continuation of 33-201.', '', None), '33-115': Course('Physics for Future Presidents', '33-115', 9, 'Countless topics of social and political importance are intimately related to science in general and physics in particular. Examples include energy production, global warming, radioactivity, terrorism, and space travel. This course aims to provide key bits of knowledge based on which such issues can be discussed in a meaningful way, i.e., on the level of arguments and not just vague beliefs. We will cover an unusually wide range of topics, including energy, heat, gravity, atoms, radioactivity, chain reactions, electricity, magnetism, waves, light, weather, and climate. No calculus or algebra will be required. The course is open for all students at CMU.', '', None), '33-114': Course('Physics of Musical Sound', '33-114', 9, 'An introduction to the physics and psychophysics of musical sound. Elementary physics of vibrating systems. Propagation of sound: traveling waves, reflection, and diffraction. Addition of waves: interference and beats. Anatomy of the ear and the perception of sound: loudness, pitch, and timbre. Standing waves and natural modes. Qualitative description of general periodic systems by Fourier analysis: the harmonic series and complex musical tones. The acoustics of musical instruments including percussion instruments, such as drums, bars, and struck and plucked strings; and instruments exhibiting self-sustained oscillations, including bowed strings, blown pipes, reeds, brasses, and singing. Intervals and consonance, musical scales, tuning and temperament. Basic room and auditorium acoustics. There are no formal prerequisites, but an ability to read music and having some previous musical experience will be very useful.', '', None), '33-445': Course('Adv Quantum Physics I', '33-445', 9, 'Mathematics of quantum theory, linear algebra and Hilbert spaces; review of classical mechanics; problems with classical mechanics; postulates of quantum theory; one dimensional applications; the harmonic oscillator; uncertainty relations; systems with N degrees of freedom, multi-particle states, identical particles; approximation methods.', '33-23', '33-331'), '33-444': Course('Introduction to Nuclear and Particle Physics', '33-444', 9, 'Description of our understanding of nuclei, elementary particles, and quarks, with equal emphasis on the nuclear and particle aspects of sub-atomic matter. We discuss the physics of accelerators, and how particle interactions with matter lead to various kinds of detector instrumentation. Then we discuss methods for measuring sub-atomic structure, symmetries and conservation laws, and the electromagnetic, weak, and strong interactions. We examine the quark model of the mesons and baryons, as well as several models of the atomic nucleus.', '33-338 and 33-234', None), '33-111': Course('Physics I for Science Students', '33-111', 12, "This calculus based course combines the basic principles of mechanics with some quantum physics and relativity to explain nature on both a microscopic and macroscopic scale. The course will build models to describe the universe based on a small number of fundamental physics principles. Some simple computer modeling will be done to develop insight into the solving of problems using Newton's laws. Topics covered will include vectors, momentum, force, gravitation, oscillations, energy, quantum physics, center of mass motion, angular momentum, statistical physics, and the laws of thermodynamics. No computer experience is needed.", '', '21-120'), '33-441': Course('Introduction to BioPhysics', '33-441', 10, 'This intermediate level course is primarily offered to Physics and Biology undergrads (junior/senior) and provides a modern view of molecular and cellular biology as seen from the perspective of physics, and quantified through the analytical tools of physics. This course will not review experimental biophysical techniques (which are covered, e.g., in 03-871). Rather, physicists will learn what sets &#8220;bio&#8221; apart from the remainder of the Physics world and how the apparent dilemma that the existence of life represents to classical thermodynamics is reconciled. They also will learn the nomenclature used in molecular biology. In turn, biologists will obtain (a glimpse of) what quantitative tools can achieve beyond the mere collecting and archiving of facts in a universe of observations: By devising models, non-obvious quantitative predictions are derived which can be experimentally tested and may lead to threads that connect vastly different, apparently unrelated phenomena. One major goal is then to merge the two areas, physics an biology, in a unified perspective.', '03-121 and (33-112 or 33-132 or 33-107)', None), '33-112': Course('Physics II for Science Students', '33-112', 12, "This is the second semester course that follows 33-111. Electricity and magnetism is developed, including the following topics: Coulomb's law, polarization, electric field, electric potential, DC circuits, magnetic field and force, magnetic induction, and the origins of electromagnetic waves.", '33-111 and 21-12', '21-122'), '16-299': Course('Introduction to Feedback Control Systems', '16-299', 12, 'This course is designed as a first course in feedback control systems  for computer science majors. Course topics include classical linear  control theory (differential equations, Laplace transforms, feedback  control), linear state-space methods (controllability/observability,  pole placement, LQR), nonlinear systems theory, and an introduction  to control using computer learning techniques. Laboratory work  includes implementation of controllers robotic devices. Priorities  will be given to computer science majors with robotics minor.', '21-122 and 15-122', None), '85-251': Course('Personality', '85-251', 9, 'The primary purpose of personality psychology is to understand human uniqueness&#8212;how and why it is that one person differs from others, in terms of the ways he or she thinks, feels, and acts. Students in the course will be exposed to several broad theoretical perspectives, each of which attempts to capture and understand the origins and consequences of individual distinctiveness from a slightly different vantage point. Included among these approaches are the dispositional, psychoanalytic, learning, phenomenological, and cognitive self regulation perspectives. This is a survey course and is intended to provide students with a broad background of theory and research in the area. Class meetings consist primarily of lecture, but there is some discussion too. In addition, classroom exercises will allow students to test their own personalities.', '', None), '33-100': Course('Basic Experimental Physics', '33-100', 6, 'This course provides students with a basic introduction to experimental physics. The content of the course and the particular experiments to be carried out are chosen to be especially useful for students who intend to work in the health sciences. Specific topics will range from mechanics to nuclear and atomic physics. This course is specifically geared toward pre-health students.', '', None), '85-482': Course('Internship in Psychology', '85-482', None, 'The Internship in Psychology is designed to enable students to gain experience in professional settings related to their studies in Psychology and earn credit for the intellectual work involved.  It is the students responsibility to locate an internship site and on-site supervisor, as well as to identify a CMU faculty sponsor. The student registers for the internship by submitting a completed internship form to Theresa Kurutz in Baker Hall 343.', '', None), '03-315': Course('Magnetic Resonance Imaging in Neuroscience', '03-315', 9, 'The course is designed to introduce students to the fundamental principles of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and its application in neuroscience. MRI is emerging as the preeminent method to obtain structural and functional information about the living human brain. This methodology has helped to revolutionize neuroscience and the study of human cognition. The specific topics covered in this course will include: introduction to spin gymnastics, survey of imaging methods, structural brain mapping, functional MRI (fMRI), and MR spectroscopy (MRS). Approximately, one third of the course will be devoted to introductory concepts of magnetic resonance, another third to the discussion of MRI methods, and the remaining third will cover a broad range of neuroscience applications. Guest lectures will be incorporated into the course from neuroscientists and psychologists who use MRI in their own research.', '03-121 and (21-117 or 21-122 or 21-121)', None), '42-201': Course('Professional Issues in Biomedical Engineering', '42-201', 3, 'This course exposes students to many of the issues that biomedical engineers face.  It provides an overview of professional topics including bioethics, regulatory issues, communication skills, teamwork, and other contemporary issues.  Outside speakers and case studies will describe real world problems and professional issues in biotechnology and bioengineering, and progress toward their solution.  Prerequisite or co-requisite:  42-101 Introduction to Biomedical Engineering', '42-101', None), '03-252': Course('Introduct to Computational Cell Biology', '03-252', 6, 'This course presents an overview of important modeling and image analysis applications of computers to solve problems in biology. It is intended for students without computer programming experience. Major topics covered are biological imaging (digital image processing, morphological image analysis, image databases, image classification and image-derived models) and biological modeling and simulation (including computer models of population dynamics, biochemical kinetics, neuron behavior, cell pathways, and the cell cycle).  Required recitations and homeworks consist of exercises making use of web site, software packages and simple Matlab scripts for these applications.  Course grade is based on recitation participation, homework assignments based on the exercises, and mid-term and final exams.  Note that this course is the second half of 03-250 (Introduction to Computational Biology) and that credit may not be given for both 03-250/02-250 and 03-252/02-252.  Prerequisites: 03-121 or permission of instructor.', '03-121 or permission of instructor', None), '03-251': Course('Introduction to Computational Molecular Biology', '03-251', 6, 'This 6-unit mini class intended to provide a general introduction to computational tools for biology with specific emphasis on molecular biology and genomics. Along with 03-252, it makes up one half of the full Introduction to Computational Biology, 03-250, although either half can be taken individually.  03-251 will examine important sources of biological data, how they are archived and made available to researchers, and what computational tools are available to use them effectively in research.  In the process, it will cover basic concepts in statistics, mathematics, and computer science needed to effectively use these resources and understand their results.   Specific topics to be covered include sequence data, searching and alignment, structural data, genome sequencing, genome analysis, genetic variation, gene and protein expression, and biological networks and pathways. This course is intended primarily for biological sciences or biomedical engineering majors at the undergraduate or graduate level who have had little or no prior experience with computer science or programming.  Students may not take both 03-250/42-334 and either 03-251 or 03-252 for credit. Prerequisites: 03-121 or permission of the instructors.', '03-121 or permission of the instructors', None), '03-250': Course('Introduction Computational Biology', '03-250', 12, 'This is a 12-unit class intended to provide a general introduction to computational tools for biology. The course is divided into two modules, which may be taken individually as courses 03-251/02-251 and 03-252/02-252.  Module 1 covers computational molecular biology/genomics.  It examines important sources of biological data, how they are archived and made available to researchers, and what computational tools are available to use them effectively in research.  In the process, it covers basic concepts in statistics, mathematics, and computer science needed to effectively use these resources and understand their results.   Specific topics covered include sequence data, searching and alignment, structural data, genome sequencing, genome analysis, genetic variation, gene and protein expression, and biological networks and pathways.  Module 2 covers computational cell biology, including biological modeling and image analysis.  It includes homeworks requiring use or modification of Matlab scripts.  The modeling component includes computer models of population dynamics, biochemical kinetics, cell pathways, neuron behavior, and stochastic simulations.  The imaging component includes basics of machine visions, morphological image analysis, image classification and image-derived models.  This course is intended primarily for biological sciences or biomedical engineering majors at the undergraduate or graduate level who have had little or no prior experience with computer science or programming.  Students may not take both 03-250/02-250 and either 03-251/02-251 or 03-252/02-252 for credit. Prerequisites: 03-121 or permission of the instructors.', '03-121 or permission of the instructors', None), '09-231': Course('Mathematical Methods for Chemists', '09-231', 9, 'This course covers mathematical techniques that are important in the chemical sciences. The techniques will be covered in the context of chemical phenomena, and combine topics from 3-dimensional calculus, differential equations, linear algebra and statistics. This course does not count towards the minor in chemistry. 3 hrs. lec.', '09-106 and (21-122 or 21-124)', None), '36-309': Course('Experimental Design for Behavioral and Social Sciences', '36-309', 9, 'Statistical aspects of the design and analysis of planned experiments are studied in this course. A clear statement of the experimental factors will be emphasized. The design aspect will concentrate on choice of models, sample size and order of experimentation. The analysis phase will cover data collection and computation, especially analysis of variance and will stress the interpretation of results. In addition to a weekly lecture, students will attend a computer lab once a week.', '36-217 or 36-201 or 36-207 or 36-220 or 36-247', None), '09-221': Course('Laboratory I:  Introduction to Chemical Analysis', '09-221', 12, 'This course is the first in a sequence of four laboratory courses on experimental aspects of chemistry required for the B.S. degree in chemistry. The experimental work emphasizes the techniques of quantitative chemical analysis. Included are projects dealing with a variety of intrumental and wet chemical techniques. The course is project-oriented with the experiments becoming more complex, requiring greater student input into the experimental design as the semester progresses. A mixture of individual and team experiments are conducted during the semester. In addition to techniques, safety, written and oral communication skills, and effective teamwork are emphasized.  2 hrs. lec., 6 hrs. lab.', '09-106', None), '33-101': Course('First Year Seminar', '33-101', 3, 'Various seminars are offered that introduce first-year students to current topics of modern physics. These are mini courses that meet for half a semester. In the past, seminar topics have included: Science and Science Fiction, Astrophysics, Black Holes, Cosmology and Supernovae, Elementary Particles, and The Building Blocks of Matter. These seminars are open only to MCS first year students.', '', None), '85-390': Course('Human Memory', '85-390', 9, 'Without memory, peope would barely be able to function: we could not be able to communication because we would not be able to remember meanings or words, nor what anyone said to us; we could have no friends because everyone would be a stranger (no memory of meeting anyone); we could have no sense of self because we could not remember anything about ourselves either; we could not predict anything about the future because we would have no recollections of the past; we would not know how to get around, because we would have no knowledge of the environment. This course will discuss issues related to memory at all levels: the sensory registers, i.e., how we perceive things; working or short-term memory; long-term memory or our knowledge base. We will discuss the differences between procedural/skill knowledge, and declarative/fact knowledge. The topics of memory monitoring, feeling and knowing, spread of activation within memory (priming), implicit memory, and amnesia will also be covered.', '', None), '36-149': Course('Statistics Freshman Seminar', '36-149', 9, None, '', None), '36-303': Course('Sampling, Survey and Society', '36-303', 9, 'This course will revolve around the role of sampling and sample surveys in the context of U.S. society and its institutions. We will examine the evolution of survey taking in the United States in the context of its economic, social and political uses. This will eventually lead to discussions about the accuracy and relevance of survey responses, especially in light of various kinds of nonsampling error. Students will be required to design, implement and analyze a survey sample.', '36-208 or 36-226 or 36-309 or 70-208 or 36-202 or 73-261 or 88-250 or 36-625', None), '05-331': Course('Building Virtual Worlds', '05-331', 24, 'This is a project course, where interdisciplinary teams build desktop and immersive (helmet-based) interactive virtual worlds. The course will cover world building, environmental design, non-linear storytelling, and related topics. Students will use 3D Studio Max (CAD modeler), paint tools, such as Adobe PhotoShop and DeepPaint, sound processing tools, and the Alice authoring system (www.alice.org/bvw.htm). Each year, we hold an exhibition in McConomy auditorium to show class projects to the Carnegie Mellon community. The goal of the course is to take students with varying talents, backgrounds, and perspectives and put them together to do what they couldn\'t do alone. The course is targeted at undergraduates, but grad students may also enroll. To enroll, students must have ONE of the following skills: Modeling with 3D Studio Max Painting using shadow/shape/light in a realistic style; Programming, as evidenced by using the Alice system (www.alice.org); Ability to compose and record original music; Storyboarding Production tracking. The key is that there are no "idea people" in the course; everyone must share in the mechanical creation of the worlds. This is a hands-on course and it takes a lot of time, but most students find it very fulfilling and fun. Note that we don\'t try to teach artists to program, or engineers to paint; we form teams where everyone does what they\'re already skilled at to attack a joint project.  Class time is roughly split between regular lectures, display/critique of group projects, and guest lectures.', '', None), '11-344': Course('Machine Learning in Practice', '11-344', 12, 'Machine Learning is concerned with computer programs that enable the behavior of a computer to be learned from examples or experience rather than dictated through rules written by hand.  It has practical value in many application areas of computer science such as on-line communities and digital libraries.  This class is meant to teach the practical side of machine learning for applications, such as mining newsgroup data or building adaptive user interfaces.  The emphasis will be on learning the process of applying machine learning effectively to a variety of problems rather than emphasizing an understanding of the theory behind what makes machine learning work.  This course does not assume any prior exposure to machine learning theory or practice. In the first 2/3 of the course, we will cover a wide range of learning algorithms that can be applied to a variety of problems.  In particular, we will cover topics such as decision trees, rule based classification, support vector machines, Bayesian networks, and clustering. In the final third of the class, we will go into more depth on one application area, namely the application of machine learning to problems involving text processing, such as information retrieval or text categorization.', '', None), '42-419': Course('Biomaterial/Host Interactions', '42-419', 12, 'The goal of this course is to provide students with hands-on experience in investigating host responses to materials.  Implant studies of tissue-engineering materials will be performed using animal models in a laboratory setting, and students will gain experience in the analysis of host responses.  Material biocompatibility and tissue regeneration will be addressed. Characterization techniques will include histology, real-time polymerase chain reaction, and immunofluorescent staining.  Laboratory work will be complemented with lectures.  Prerequisite:  junior or senior standing in Biomedical Engineering, or consent of instructor.', ' junior or senior standing in Biomedical Engineering, or consent of instructor', None), '03-392': Course('Microbiology Laboratory', '03-392', 6, 'This is an upper level biology course for students who have taken or are currently taking the Microbiology course and are interested in laboratory experience in microbiology.  It is designed with the recommendations of the American Society for Microbiology for a student laboratory course in mind in order to introduce the student to a broad spectrum of techniques in microbiology.  You will learn the skills needed to perform experiments that help to differentiate various types of microbes, examine antimicrobial and antibiotic sensitivity and resistance, and begin to explore microbial diversity. Finally, you will develop an understanding of the theory behind the techniques you use and will be given the opportunity to further develop your skills in the process of experimental design.', '', '03-391'), '36-220': Course('Engineering Statistics and Quality Control', '36-220', 9, 'This is a course in introductory statistics for engineers with emphasis on modern product improvement techniques. Besides exploratory data analysis, basic probability, distribution theory and statistical inference, special topics include experimental design, regression, control charts and acceptance sampling.  Not open to students who have received credit for 36-201, 36-207/70-207, 36-226, 36-626, or 36-247, except when AP credit is awarded for 36-201.', '21-112 or 21-121 or 21-120', None), '03-391': Course('Microbiology: Biophysic and Molecular Bio', '03-391', 9, 'The course provides introductory level molecular biology that is aimed for students from all disciplines of natural science. It covers microbiology, genetics, genomics and virology, as well as related biophysics of RNA and DNA packaging, protein self-assembly and molecular motors. We also review the latest biophysical methods with a focus on single molecule techniques that have revolutionized the biological sciences.', '03-232 or 03-231', None), '36-226': Course('Introduction to Statistical Inference', '36-226', 9, 'This course is the second half of a year long course in probability and mathematical statistics. Topics include maximum likelihood estimation, confidence intervals, and hypothesis testing. If time permits there will also be a discussion of linear regression and the analysis of variance. A grade of C or better is required in order to advance to 36-401, 36-402 or any 36-46x course.  Not open to students who have received credit for 36-626.', '15-359 or 36-225 or 36-217 or 21-325', None), '36-225': Course('Introduction to Probability Theory', '36-225', 9, 'This course is the first half of a year long course which provides an introduction to probability and mathematical statistics for students in economics, mathematics and statistics. The use of probability theory is illustrated with examples drawn from engineering, the sciences, and management. Topics include elementary probability theory, conditional probability and independence, random variables, distribution functions, joint and conditional distributions, law of large numbers, and the central limit theorem.  A grade of C or better is required in order to advance to 36-226 and 36-410. Not open to students who have received credit for 36-217 or 36-625.', '21-256 or 21-259', None), '05-413': Course('Human Factors', '05-413', 9, 'This course uses theory and research from human factors, cognitive science, and social science to understand and design the interactions of humans with the built world, tools, and technology.  The course emphasizes current work in applied domains such as automotive design, house construction, medical human factors, and design of information devices.  The course also will emphasize not only individual human factors (e.g., visual response, anthropometry) but also the organizational arrangements that can amplify or correct human factors problems.  Through reading, discussion, and projects, you will learn about human perceptual, cognitive, and physical processes that affect how people interact with, and use, technology and tools.  You will learn why we have so many automobile accidents, voting irregularities, and injuries from prescription medication. You will learn some tried and true solutions for human factors problems, and some of the many problems in human factors that remain. You will also have gained experience in research in this field.', '', None), '05-395': Course('Applications of Cognitive Science', '05-395', 9, "The goal of this course is to examine cases where basic research on cognitive science, including cognitive neuroscience, has made its way into application, in order to understand how science gets applied more generally.  The course focuses on applications that are sufficiently advanced as to have made an impact outside of the research field per se; for example, as a product,  a change in practice, or a legal statute.  Examples are virtual reality (in vision, hearing, and touch), cognitive tutors, phonologically based reading programs, latent semantic analysis applications to writing assessment, and measures of consumers' implicit attitudes.   The course will use a case-study approach that considers a set of applications in detail, while building a general understanding of what it means to move research into the applied setting.  The questions to be considered include:  What makes a body of theoretically based research applicable?  What is the pathway from laboratory to practice?  What are the barriers - economic, legal, entrenched belief or practice?   The format will emphasize analysis and discussion by students.  They should bring to the course an interest in application; extensive prior experience in cognitive science is not necessary.  The course will include tutorials on basic topics in cognitive science such as perception, memory, and spatial cognition.  These should provide sufficient grounding to discuss the applications.", '', None), '05-411': Course('Cognitive Crash Dummies', '05-411', 6, 'Crash dummies in the auto industry save lives by testing the physical safety of automobiles before they are brought to market. &#8220;Cognitive crash dummies&#8221; save time, money, and potentially even lives, by allowing computer-based system designers to test their design ideas before implementing them in products and processes. This mini course will review the state of the art of perceptual, cognitive and motor modeling for assessing designs before building working systems. This course will include reading breaking research in predicting different aspects of human performance and building models in established modeling frameworks. No prior experience in human performance modeling is assumed; students from all disciplines are welcome.', '', None), '05-410': Course('User-Centered Research and Evaluation', '05-410', 12, 'This course provides and overview and introduction to the field of human-computer interaction (HCI). It introduces students to tools, techniques, and sources of information about HCI and provides a systematic approach to design. The course increases awareness of good and bad design through observation of existing technology, and teaches the basic skills of task analysis, and analytic and empirical evaluation methods. This is a companion course to courses in visual design (51-422) and software implementation (05-430, 05-431).  When registering for this course, undergraduate students are automatically placed the wait list. Students will be then moved into the class, based on if they are in the BHCI second major and year in school e.g. seniors, juniors, etc  This course is NOT open to students outside the HCI major.   When registering for this course, undergraduate students are automatically placed the wait list. Students will be then moved into the class, based on if they are in the BHCI second major and year in school.', '', None), '05-417': Course('Computer-mediated Communication', '05-417', 6, 'This course examines fundamental aspects of interpersonal communication and considers how different types of computer-mediated communications (CMC) technologies affect communication processes. Among the topics we will consider are: conversational structure and CMC, tools to support nonverbal and paralinguistic aspects of communication such as gesture and eye gaze, and social and cultural dimensions of CMC.  Students will be expected to post to weekly discussion lists, to write a paper on a specific aspect of CMC, and to present a talk on their final project to the class. The course should be appropriate for graduate students in all areas and for advanced undergraduates.', '', None), '05-391': Course('Designing Human Centered Software', '05-391', 12, 'Why are things so hard to use these days? Why doesn&#8217;t this thing I just bought work? Why is this web site so hard to use? These are frustrations that we have all faced from systems not designed with people in mind.  The question this course will focus on is: how can we design human-centered systems that people find useful and usable? This course is an introduction to designing, prototyping, and evaluating user interfaces. If you take only one course in Human-Computer Interaction, this is the course for you.  This class is open to all undergrads and grad students, with either technical or non-technical backgrounds. We will cover theory as well as practical application of ideas from Human-Computer Interaction. Course work includes lectures, class discussion, homework, class presentations, and group project.', '', None), '33-120': Course('Science and Science Fiction', '33-120', 9, 'We will view and critique the science content in a selection of science fiction films, spanning more than 100 years of cinematic history, and from sci-fi TV shows from the past 50+ years. Guided by selected readings from current scientific literature, and aided by order-of-magnitude estimates and careful calculations, we will ponder whether the films are showing things which may fall into one of the following categories: Science fiction at the time of production, but currently possible, due to recent breakthroughs. Possible, in principle, but beyond our current technology. Impossible by any science we know. Topics to be covered include the future of the technological society, the physics of Star Trek, the nature of space and time, extraterrestrial intelligence, robotics and artificial intelligence, biotechnology and more. Success of this course will depend upon class participation. Students will be expected to contribute to discussion of assigned readings and problems, and to give brief presentations in class on assigned films.', '', None), '85-412': Course('Cognitive Modeling', '85-412', 9, 'This course will be concerned with modeling of agent behavior in a range of applications from laboratory experiments on human cognition, high-performance simulations such as flight simulators, and video game environments like Unreal Tournament.  The first half of the course will teach a high-level modeling language for simulating human perception, cognition, and action.  The second half of the course will be a project in which students develop a simulated agent or agents for the application of their choice.', '15-122 or 15-150 or 15-251 or 15-210', None), '85-241': Course('Social Psychology', '85-241', 9, 'The focus of this course will be on how peoples behavior, feelings and thoughts are influenced or determined by their social environment. The course will begin with lectures and readings on how social psychologists go about studying social behavior. Next, various topics on which social psychologists have done research will be covered. These topics will include: person perception, prejudice and discrimination, the nature of attitudes and how attitudes are formed and changed, interpersonal attraction, conformity, compliance, altruism, aggression, group behavior, and applications of psychology to problems in health care, law, politics, and the environment. Through readings and lectures on these topics, students will also be exposed to social psychological theories.', '', None), '33-124': Course('Introduction to Astronomy', '33-124', 9, 'Astronomy continues to enjoy a golden age of exploration and discovery. This course presents a broad view of astronomy, straightforwardly descriptive and without any complex mathematics. The goal of the course is to encourage non-technical students to become scientifically literate and to appreciate new developments in the world of science, especially in the rapidly developing field of astronomy. Subjects covered include the solar system, stars, galaxies and the universe as a whole. The student should develop an appreciation of the ever-changing universe and our place within it. Computer laboratory exercises will be used to gain practical experience in astronomical techniques. In addition, small telescopes will be used to study the sky. This course is specifically geared toward non-science/engineering majors.', '', None), '09-347': Course('Advanced Physical Chemistry', '09-347', 12, '09-347   Advanced Physical Chemistry Fall:  12 units A course of study designed to provide the microscopic basis of concepts encountered in the field of chemical engineering. The properties of macroscopic materials are calculated in terms of the microscopic properties of atoms and molecules. Both classical and quantum approaches are employed. The thermodynamic properties are developed in terms of the chemical potentials of the constituent particles. The transport properties are calculated using molecular dynamics and Brownian dynamics. Classical chemical kinetics is fully developed and applied  to complex reactions. Rate constants are calculated for simple reactions in gases and solutions. The course enrollment is limited to chemical engineering majors. 4 hrs. lec.', '(06-221 or 06-151) and (06-262 or 06-155) and (09-107 or 09-105)', None), '85-406': Course('Autism: Psychological and Neuroscience Perspectives', '85-406', 9, 'Autism is a disorder that affects many cognitive and social processes, sparing some facets of thought while strongly impacting others. This seminar will examine the scientific research that has illuminated the nature of autism, focusing on its cognitive and biological aspects. For example, language, perception, and theory of mind are affected in autism. The readings will include a few short books and many primary journal articles. The readings will deal primarily with autism in people whose IQ&#8217;s are in the normal range (high functioning autism). Seminar members will be expected to regularly enter to class discussions and make presentations based on the readings.   The seminar will examine various domains of thinking and various biological underpinnings of brain function, to converge on the most recent scientific consensus on the biological and psychological characterization of autism.  There will be a special focus on brain imaging studies of autism, including both structural (MRI) imaging of brain morphology and functional (fMRI and PET) imaging of brain activation during the performance of various tasks.', '85-429 or 85-211 or 85-219 or 85-355 or 85-213', None), '03-301': Course('Undergraduate Colloquium for Juniors', '03-301', None, 'The purpose of this seminar series is to update biology undergraduates about university and departmental functions, seminars, etc. that are pertinent or useful. In addition, research talks by faculty and undergraduates will be used to introduce students to the research being conducted in faculty laboratories. Additional topics may include graduate and medical school applications, career options, topics in the press, and important scientific discoveries.', '', None), '85-261': Course('Abnormal Psychology', '85-261', 9, 'The study of psychopathology is not an exact science; nor are there many  clear-cut parameters with which to differentiate "normal" and "abnormal"  behavior.&#160; This course will focus on learning about and understanding the  range of behaviors which fall within the province of "abnormal" psychology.  Its approach will be descriptive, empirical, theoretical and conceptual.  Students will examine definitions of ?abnormality? in an historical and contemporary context, explore issues relevant to diagnosis and patient care, be introduced to various psychological diagnostic categories, and develop an appreciation of the range of treatments for these disorders.&#160;.', '', None), '42-441': Course('Cardiovascular Biomechanics', '42-441', 9, 'This course covers the solid and fluid mechanics of the heart and vascular system as well as the mechanics of medical devices used to assist or replace cardiovascular function.  Prerequisite:  42-341 Introduction to Biomechanics.', ' 42-341 Introduction to Biomechanics', None), '02-422': Course('Advanced Algorithms for Computational Structural Biology', '02-422', 9, None, '', None), '02-223': Course('How to Analyze Your Own Genome', '02-223', 9, 'Do you want to know how to discover the tendencies hidden in your genome? Since the first draft of a human genome sequence became available about a decade ago, the cost of genome sequencing has decreased dramatically. Personal genome sequencing will likely become a routine part of medical exams for patients for prognostic and diagnostic purposes. Personal genome information will also play an increasing role in lifestyle choices, as people take into account their own genetic tendencies. Commercial services such as 23andMe have already taken first steps in this direction. Computational methods for mining large-scale genome data are being developed to unravel the genetic basis of diseases and assist doctors in clinics. This course introduces students to biological, computational, and ethical issues concerning use of personal genome information in health maintenance, medical practice, biomedical research, and policymaking. We focus on practical issues, using individual genome sequences (such as that of Nobel prize winner James Watson) and other population-level genome data. Without requiring any background in biology or CS, we begin with an overview of topics from genetics, molecular biology, stats, and machine learning relevant to the modern personal genome era. We then cover scientific issues such as how to discover your genetic ancestry, how to learn from genomes about migration and evolution of human populations, and how natural selection shaped our genomes. We discuss medical aspects such as how to predict whether you will develop diseases such as diabetes based on your own genome, how to discover disease-causing genetic mutations, and how genetic information can be used to recommend clinical treatments. No prereqs.', '', None), '09-323': Course('Bioorganic Chemistry Laboratory', '09-323', 12, 'Bioorganic chemistry is concerned with the action of synthesized compounds on biological systems.  In order to maximize the likelihood of identifying a biologically active compound, synthetic libraries are often employed, requiring extensive familiarity with simple, efficient chemical coupling steps and protecting group chemistry.  In this inquiry based laboratory course, using a process that mimics the current practice in drug discovery by pharmaceutical companies, students will rationally design a compound library in hopes of finding a compound active against a selected biological target, search for active compounds in the library, and then quantitatively characterize any identified compounds for activity.  Working in small groups, students will develop proposals for and execute the target assay selected, the library synthesis, and the screening approach.  Students will write reports summarizing the results in each phase of the course.   Throughout the course, students will be introduced to concepts relevant to industrial scientific research, including regulatory compliance, quality control and assurance, and intellectual property.', '(09-220 or 09-218) and 09-222', None), '09-322': Course('Laboratory IV: Molecular Spectroscopy and Dynamics', '09-322', 12, 'This laboratory course is devoted to physical chemistry experiments, which involve the use of modern spectroscopic instrumentation to probe the optical and magnetic properties of molecules. The experiments include the use of high-resolution infrared, laser Raman, NMR, EPR, fluorescence, and UV-visible spectroscopies. Additional experiments demonstrate methods for measuring enzyme-catalyzed reaction rate constants, and the use of scanning probe microscopy for imaging and characterization of biological macromolecules.Throughout the course the students will learn how to use computer algebra packages for rigorous data analysis and modeling and will develop the skills in basic electronics, and vacuum techniques. 2 hrs. lec., 6 hrs. lab.', '09-331 and 09-344 and 09-22', '09-345'), '16-421': Course('Vision Sensors', '16-421', 12, 'This course covers the fundamentals of vision cameras and other sensors - how they function, how they are built, and how to use them effectively. The course presents a journey through the fascinating five hundered year history of "camera-making" from the early 1500\'s "camera obscura" through the advent of film and lenses, to today\'s mirror-based and solid state devices (CCD, CMOS). The course includes a significant hands-on component where students learn how to use the sensors and understand, model and deal with the uncertainty (noise) in their measurements. While the first half of the course deals with conventional "single viewpoint" or "perspective" cameras, the second half of the course covers much more recent "multi-viewpoint" or "multi-perspective" cameras that includes a host of lenses and mirrors.', '21-241 and 21-111', None), '09-302': Course('Undergraduate Seminar IV', '09-302', 1, 'Students attend seminars presented by senior chemistry majors. Students provide peer evaluations of the seminars and through the process students become familiar with special topics in chemistry.  The course establishes what should be included in a good seminar. This seminar courses is one of 6 required for the chemistry major. If a schedule conflict exists, students may, with permission of the instructor, attend other chemistry seminars or make other arrangements to fulfill the requirement. 1 hr.', '', None), '05-320': Course('Social Web', '05-320', 12, 'With the growth of online environments like MySpace, Second Life, World of Warcraft, Wikipedia, blogs, online support groups, and open source development communities, the web is no longer just about information. This course, jointly taught by a computer scientist and a behavioral scientist, will examine a sampling of the social, technical and business challenges social web sites must solve to be successful, teach students how to use high-level tools to analyze, design or build online communities, and help them understand the social impact of spending at least part of their lives online.  This class is open to advanced undergraduates and graduate students with either technical or non-technical backgrounds. Course work will include lectures and class discussion, homework, class presentations, and a group research or design project.', '', None), '33-355': Course('Nanoscience and Nanotechnology', '33-355', 9, 'Offered alternative years. This course will explore the underlying science behind nanotechnology, the tools used to create and characterize nanostructures, and potential applications of such devices. Material will be presented on a level intended for upper-level science and engineering students. The course will start with a brief review of the physical principles of electric fields and forces, the nature of chemical bonds, the interaction of light with matter, and elastic deformation of solids. Characterization using electron microscopy, scanning probe methods, and spectroscopic techniques will then be described in detail. Fabrication using top-down and bottom-up methods will be discussed, contrasting these approaches and providing examples of each. Nanotechnology methods will be compared  with those used in the modern micro-electronics industry. Finally, examples of nanoscale components and systems will be described, including quantum dots, self-assembled monolayers, molecular computing, and others. Stand-alone laboratory exercises will be included as an important element of the course. These will focus on the use of scanning probe methods to study the nm-scale structure and atomic forces involved in various nanostructures. Students will sign up for these laboratory sessions and perform the exercises under the supervision of a teaching assistant.  In addition to the prerequisites, students should have taken a prior laboratory course in a science or engineering department and should have some familiarity with differential equations at an elementary level.', '33-112 or 33-107 or 33-132', None), '85-281': Course('Introduction to Clinical Psychology', '85-281', 9, 'This course is designed to introduce students to a wide variety of concepts in the area of clinical psychology. We will explore clinical psychology in an historical perceptive, ethics related to the practice of psychology, and various theories of psychotherapy (Incluing psychoanalytic, psychodynamic, existential, and cognitive behavioral).  Also, we will look at group theories underlying group therapy and family/systems therapy.', '85-251 or 85-261', None), '33-353': Course('Intermediate Optics', '33-353', 12, 'Offer alternative years. Geometrical optics: reflection and refraction, mirrors, prisms, lenses, apertures and stops, simple optical instruments, fiber optics. Scalar wave optics: wave properties of light, interference, coherence, interferometry, Huygens-Fresnel principle, Fraunhofer diffraction, resolution of optical instruments, Fourier optics, Fresnel diffraction. Laser beam optics: Gaussian beams. Vector wave optics: electromagnetic waves at dielectric interfaces, polarized light. The course will use complex exponential representations of electromagnetic waves.', '33-132 or 33-107 or 33-112', None), '09-301': Course('Undergraduate Seminar III', '09-301', 1, 'Students attend seminars on current topics in chemistry.  Students are sent a menu of choices for each week of the semester and may select topics of interest.  Enrollment is restricted to students majoring in chemistry. 1 hr.', '', None), '33-350': Course('Undergraduate Research', '33-350', None, 'The student undertakes a project of interest under the supervision of a faculty member. May include research done in a research lab, extending the capabilities of a teaching lab, or a theoretical or computational physics project. The student experiences the less structured atmosphere of a research program where there is much room for independent initiative. A list of research projects is available. The student must contact the Assistant Head for the Undergraduate Affairs before registering so that student project pairings can be set. Reports on results are required at end of semester.', '', None), '03-380': Course('Virology', '03-380', 9, 'The concepts and methods of virology are covered, with emphasis on animal viruses, within the framework of cell biology, genetics, molecular biology, immunology, pathology, and epidemiology. The strategies that a wide variety of different DNA and RNA viruses, including some new and emerging ones, use to replicate and express their genomes  during infection of host cells will be examined in some detail. The effects that viruses inflict on these cells will also be examined, as will some of the host cell responses generated by such virus-cell interactions, including interferon induction, the antiviralresponse generated by interferon, and oncogenic transformation. In addition, anoverview of procedures used for prevention and treatment of viral diseases via vaccinesand antiviral drugs, respectively, will be presented, as will a brief discussion of viroids and prions, and the characteristics of these agents which distinguish them from viruses.', '03-24', '03-330'), '03-411': Course('Topics in Research', '03-411', None, 'During the year students attend and submit brief summaries of weekly seminars given by outside speakers or members of the Biology Department on current research topics in modern biology; some seminars outside of the department may be substituted.', '', None), '85-428': Course('Neuro Basis of Cognitive Development', '85-428', 9, 'In this seminar, we will examine the neural basis of cognitive development by linking the functional properties of the developing child, as they are described in Piagetian and neo-Piagetian theories, to the neural systems that support them drawing on the framework provided by computational modeling. The focal issues will be the mapping between functional models and neural models, the normal unfolding of development, the interaction of learning and development, and brain plasticity.  The systems to be discussed are (1) language, (2) visuo-spatial processing, (3) learning and attention, (4) complex problem solving, and (5) perceptual-motor functions. The goal of the seminar is to relate and integrate insights from three disciplines: cognitive developmental psychology, neuroscience and computational modeling. The format of the course will be discussions of the readings along with various exercises to explore each component discipline and their interrelation in more detail.  For example, some of the exercises involve an introduction to brain imaging, an introduction to computational modeling, and further explorations of psychological experimentation, all within the context of cognitive development.', '85-419 or 85-213 or 85-411 or 85-412 or 85-423 or 85-211 or 85-219 or 85-414 or 85-429', None), '85-392': Course('Human Expertise', '85-392', 9, 'The process of becoming an expert involves many changes, some quantitative and some qualitative. This course will provide an up-to-date account of the theory and data concerning the development of expertise. Questions addressed include the following. What does it take to become an expert? Are experts born or made? Is the process of acquiring expertise common across different domains from music to sports to science?  Research studied in the course will employ a variety of methodologies, from case studies to protocol analysis to computational modeling.', '85-211 or 85-213', None), '03-412': Course('Topics in Research', '03-412', None, 'During the year students attend and submit brief summaries of weekly seminars given by outside speakers or members of the Biology Department on current research topics in modern biology. Some seminars outside of the department may be substituted.', '', None), '33-228': Course('Electronics I', '33-228', 10, 'An introductory laboratory and lecture course with emphasis on elementary circuit analysis, design, and testing. We start by introducing basic circuit elements and study the responses of combinations to DC and AC excitations. We then take up transistors and learn about biasing and the behavior of amplifier circuits. The many uses of operational amplifiers are examined and analyzed; general features of feedback systems are introduced in this context. Complex functions are used to analyze all of the above linear systems. Finally, we examine and build some simple digital integrated circuits.', '33-112 or 33-132 or 33-107', None), '33-225': Course('Quantum Physics and Structure of Matter', '33-225', 9, 'This course introduces the basic theory used to describe the microscopic world of electrons, atoms, and photons. The duality between wave-like and particle-like phenomena is introduced along with the deBroglie relations which link them. We develop a wave description appropriate for quanta which are partially localized and discuss the interpretation of these wavefunctions. The wave equation of quantum mechanics is developed and applied to the hydrogen atom from which we extrapolate the structure of the Periodic Table. Other materials-related applications are developed, for example, Boltzmann and quantum statistics and properties of electrons in crystals. This course is intended primarily for non-physics majors who have not taken 33-211.', '33-132 or 33-112 or 33-107', None), '33-224': Course('Stars, Galaxies and the Universe', '33-224', 9, 'The study of astronomy has blossomed over the past few decades as a result of new ground-based and space-based telescopes, and with the advantage of fast computers for analysis of the huge quantities of data. As our astronomical horizon expands, we are still able to use the laws of physics to make sense of it all. This course is for students who want to understand the basic concepts in astronomy and what drives astronomical objects and the universe. The course emphasizes the application of a few physical principles to a variety of astronomical settings, from stars to galaxies to the structure and evolution of the universe. Introductory classical physics is required, but modern physics will be introduced as needed in the course. The course is intended for science and engineering majors as well as students in other disciplines with good technical backgrounds. Computer lab exercises will be used to gain practical experience in astronomical techniques. In addition, small telescopes are available for personal sign-out for those who would like to use them, and outdoor observing sessions will be organized as weather permits.', '33-131 or 33-111 or 33-106', None), '02-252': Course('Introduction to Computational Cell Biology', '02-252', 6, 'This course presents an overview of important modeling and image analysis applications of computers to solve problems in biology. It is intended for students without computer programming experience. Major topics covered are biological imaging (digital image processing, morphological image analysis, image databases, image classification and image-derived models) and biological modeling and simulation (including computer models of population dynamics, biochemical kinetics, neuron behavior, cell pathways, and the cell cycle). Required recitations and homeworks consist of exercises making use of web site, software packages and simple Matlab scripts for these applications. Course grade is based on recitation participation, homework assignments based on the exercises, and mid-term and final exams. Note that this course is the second half of 02-250 (Introduction to Computational Biology) and that credit may not be given for both 03-250/02-250 and 03-252/02-252. Prerequisites: 03-121 or permission of instructor.', '03-121 or permission of instructor', None), '36-326': Course('Probability and Mathematical Statistics II', '36-326', 9, 'This course is a rigorous introduction to the mathematical theory of statistics.  A good working knowledge of calculus and probability theory is required.  Topics include maximum likelihood estimation, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, Bayesian methods, and regression.  A grade of C or better is required in order to advance to 36-401, 36-402 or any 36-46x course.  Not open to students who have received credit for 36-625. Prerequisites: 15-359 or 21-325 or 36-217 or 36-225 with a grade of A AND advisor approval.', '15-359 or 21-325 or 36-217 or 36-225 with a grade of A AND advisor approval', None), '02-250': Course('Introduction to Computational Biology', '02-250', 12, 'This is a 12-unit class intended to provide a general introduction to computational tools for biology. The course is divided into two modules, which may be taken individually as courses 03-251/02-251 and 03-252/02-252. Module 1 covers computational molecular biology/genomics. It examines important sources of biological data, how they are archived and made available to researchers, and what computational tools are available to use them effectively in research. In the process, it covers basic concepts in statistics, mathematics, and computer science needed to effectively use these resources and understand their results. Specific topics covered include sequence data, searching and alignment, structural data, genome sequencing, genome analysis, genetic variation, gene and protein expression, and biological networks and pathways. Module 2 covers computational cell biology, including biological modeling and image analysis. It includes homeworks requiring use or modification of Matlab scripts. The modeling component includes computer models of population dynamics, biochemical kinetics, cell pathways, neuron behavior, and stochastic simulations. The imaging component includes basics of machine visions, morphological image analysis, image classification and image-derived models. This course is intended primarily for biological sciences or biomedical engineering majors at the undergraduate or graduate level who have had little or no prior experience with computer science or programming. Students may not take both 03-250/02-250 and either 03-251/02-251 or 03-252/02-252 for credit. Prerequisites: 03-121 or permission of the instructors', '03-121 or permission of the instructor', None), '02-251': Course('Introduction to computational Molecular Biology', '02-251', 6, 'This 6-unit mini class intended to provide a general introduction to computational tools for biology with specific emphasis on molecular biology and genomics. Along with 02-252, it makes up one half of the full Introduction to Computational Biology, 02-250, although either half can be taken individually. 02-251 will examine important sources of biological data, how they are archived and made available to researchers, and what computational tools are available to use them effectively in research. In the process, it will cover basic concepts in statistics, mathematics, and computer science needed to effectively use these resources and understand their results. Specific topics to be covered include sequence data, searching and alignment, structural data, genome sequencing, genome analysis, genetic variation, gene and protein expression, and biological networks and pathways. This course is intended primarily for biological sciences or biomedical engineering majors at the undergraduate or graduate level who have had little or no prior experience with computer science or programming. Students may not take both 02-250/42-334 and either 02-251 or 02-252 for credit. Prerequisites: 03-121 or permission of the instructors', '03-121 or permission of the instructor', None), '11-441': Course('Search Engines and Web Mining', '11-441', 12, 'This course provides a comprehensive introduction to the theory and implementation of algorithms for organizing and searching large text collections. The first half of the course studies text search engines for enterprise and Web environments; the open-source Indri search engine is used as a working example. The second half studies text mining techniques such as clustering, categorization, and information extraction. Programming assignments give hands-on experience with document ranking algorithms, categorizing documents into browsing hierarchies, and related topics.', '', None), '03-330': Course('Genetics', '03-330', 9, 'The mechanisms of transmission of inherited traits in viruses, bacteria, fungi, plants and animals are discussed. Molecular mechanisms of gene expression and gene regulation are analyzed. Recombinant DNA and its applications in genetic analysis, biotechnology, forensics, agriculture, medicine, and the pharmaceutical industry are presented. Special topics in human genetics are considered, such as the genetics of cancer. Principles and methods for the study of developmental genetics, population genetics and complex traits are also introduced.', '03-232 or 03-231', None), '03-390': Course('Molecular and Cellular Immunology', '03-390', 9, 'This course offers the student a comprehensive view of modern immunology at the molecular and cellular level. The first half of the course presents the fundamentals of immunology, beginning with innate immunity, followed by a discussion of the structure and function of important molecules in the immune system, such as antibodies, major histocompatibility antigens, complement, and the T-cell receptor. This portion of the course is concluded with a discussion of the development and function of the cellular immune response. The second half of the course is focused on applied immunology and discusses hypersensitivity, autoimmunity, immunodeficiencies, tumor immunology, infectious disease, and transplantation immunology. Presentations at the end of the course provide an opportunity for the student to explore additional topics in contemporary immunology.', '(03-232 or 03-231) and 03-240', None), '42-300': Course('Junior BME Research Project', '42-300', None, 'Research projects for juniors under the direction of a regular or adjunct BME faculty member.  Arrangements may also be made via the Associate Head of BME for off-campus projects provided that a regular or adjunct BME faculty member agrees to serve as a co-advisor.  The nature of the project, the number of units, and the criteria for grading are to be determined between the student and the research advisor.  The agreement should be summarized in a two-page project description with sign-off by the research advisor and a copy submitted for review and filing with the BME Department.  A final written report or oral presentation of the results is required.  Units may vary from 3 to 12 according to the expected time commitment, with one unit corresponding to 1 hour of research per week.', '', None), '36-207': Course('Probability and Statistics for Business Applications', '36-207', 9, 'This is the first half of a year long sequence in basic statistical methods that are used in business and management. Topics include exploratory and descriptive techniques, probability theory, statistical inference in simple settings, basic categorical analysis, and statistical methods for quality control. Not open to students who have received credit for 36-201, 36-220, 36-625, or 36-247. Cross-listed as 70-207.', '21-112 or 21-120 or 21-121', None), '02-317': Course('Algorithms in Nature', '02-317', 9, 'Computer systems and biological processes often rely on networks of interacting entities to reach joint decisions, coordinate and respond to inputs. There are many similarities in the goals and strategies of biological and computational systems which suggest that each can learn from the other. These include the distributed nature of the networks (in biology molecules, cells, or organisms often operate without central control), the ability to successfully handle failures and attacks on a subset of the nodes, modularity and the ability to reuse certain components or sub-networks in multiple applications and the use of stochasticity in biology and randomized algorithms in computer science. In this course we will start by discussing classic biologically motivated algorithms including neural networks (inspired by the brain), genetic algorithms (sequence evolution), non-negative matrix factorization (signal processing in the brain), and search optimization (ant colony formation). We will then continue to discuss more recent bi-directional studies that have relied on biological processes to solve routing and synchronization problems, discover Maximal Independent Sets (MIS), and design robust and fault tolerant networks. In the second part of the class students will read and present new research in this area. Students will also work in groups on a final project in which they develop and test a new biologically inspired algorithm.  See also: www.algorithmsinnature.org Pre-requisite: 15-210, no prior biological knowledge required.', '15-210 and 15-251', None), '36-201': Course('Statistical Reasoning and Practice', '36-201', 9, 'This course will introduce students to the basic concepts, logic, and issues involved in statistical reasoning, as well as basic statistical methods used to analyze data and evaluate studies.  The major topics to be covered include methods for exploratory data analysis, an introduction to research methods, elementary probability, and methods for statistical inference.  The objectives of this course are to help students develop a critical approach to the evaluation of study designs, data and results, and to develop skills in the application of basic statistical methods in empirical research.  An important feature of the course will be the use of the computer to facilitate the understanding of important statistical ideas and for the implementation of data analysis. In addition to three lectures a week, students will attend a computer lab once a week. Examples will be drawn from areas of applications of particular interest to H&amp;SS students. Not open to students who have received credit for 36-207/70-207, 36-220, 36-225, 36-625, or 36-247.', '', None), '36-202': Course('Statistical Methods', '36-202', 9, 'This course builds on the principles and methods of statistical reasoning   developed in 36-201 (or its equivalents). The course covers simple and multiple regression, analysis of variance methods and logistic regression. Other topics may include non-parametric methods and probability models, as time permits. The objectives of this course is to develop the skills of applying the basic  principles and methods that underlie statistical practice and empirical  research. In addition to three lectures a week, students attend a computer lab once week for "hands-on" practice of the material covered in lecture. Not open to students who have received credit for: 36-208/70-208,  36-309.  Students who have completed 36-401 prior to 36-202 will not receive credit for 36-202.', '36-247 or 36-201 or 36-220 or 70-207 or 36-207', None), '42-400': Course('Senior BME Research Project', '42-400', None, 'Research projects for seniors under the direction of a regular or adjunct BME faculty member.  Arrangements may also be made via the Associate Head of BME for off-campus projects provided that a regular or adjunct BME faculty member agrees to serve as a co-advisor.  The nature of the project, the number of units, and the criteria for grading are to be determined between the student and the research advisor.  The agreement should be summarized in a two-page project description with sign-off by the research advisor and a copy submitted for review and filing with the BME Department.  A final written report or oral presentation of the results is required.  Units may vary from 3 to 12 according to the expected time commitment, with one unit corresponding to 1 hour of research per week.', '', None), '03-402': Course('Undergraduate Colloquium for Seniors', '03-402', None, None, '', None), '03-231': Course('Biochemistry I', '03-231', 9, 'This course provides an introduction to molecules and processes found in living systems. Amino acids, sugars, lipids and nucleotides and their corresponding higher structures, the proteins, polysaccharides, membranes and nucleic acids are studied. Kinetics and mechanisms of enzymes as well as elementary metabolic cycles and the energetics of biological systems are discussed.', '03-12', '09-217'), '03-230': Course('Intro to Mammalian Physiology', '03-230', 9, "This course will survey the major organ systems, with an emphasis on cellular physiology and biochemistry. Current ideas of research and scientific controversy will also be presented. This course is intended to broaden students' exposure to cellular processes in the context of complex organ systems.", '', '03-121'), '03-232': Course('Biochemistry I', '03-232', 9, 'This course provides an introduction to the application of biochemistry to biotechnology. The functional properties of amino acids, nucleotides, lipids, and sugars are presented. This is followed by a discussion of the structural and thermodynamic aspects of the organization of these molecules into higher-order structures, such as proteins, nucleic acids, and membranes. The kinetics and thermodynamics of protein-ligand interactions are discussed for non-cooperative, cooperative, and allosteric binding events. The use of mechanistic and kinetic information in enzyme characterization and drug discovery are discussed. Topics pertinent to biotechnology include: antibody production and use, energy production in biochemical systems, expression of recombinant proteins, and methods of protein purification and characterization. The course is an alternate to 03-231.', '09-219 or 09-21', '09-106 or 06-221'), '05-499': Course("Special Topic's in HCI", '05-499', None, None, '', None), '85-375': Course('Crosscultural Psychology', '85-375', 9, 'Human beings share a common genetic inheritance, but our cultural institutions differ in a bewildering variety of ways. This course explores the many different cultural expressions of basic human cognitive and social abilities and needs, We will look at cultural variations in child rearing, mother-child attachment, language socialization, categorization, reasoning, problem-solving, architecture, music, politics, warfare, food-gathering, sex roles, mental disorders, and altered states of consciousness, all with the goal of understanding how the shape of social systems and symbolic expression reflects the economic and adaptive needs of the culture and its people. Among the approaches to these phenomena we will consider are symbolic interaction, cognitive anthropology, dialectic materialism, and modern ethnology.', '85-221 or 85-251 or 85-241 or 85-261 or 85-102 or 85-219 or 85-198 or 85-211 or 85-100', None), '09-122': Course('Molecular Tools for Biological and Chemical Studies', '09-122', 6, 'The increased fluorescence of certain molecules, also known as dyes, can signal their binding to a specific biological target such as DNA. This phenomenon finds important application in the biological and medicinal field where dyes are used as molecular tools. For example, fluorescent dyes can be used to detect the expression of a gene; survival of cells; site of accumulation of a metabolite and many of them are used in diagnostics. This course is aimed at offering a hands-on laboratory experience in the interface of chemistry and biology, so called bioorganic chemistry. The student&#8217;s project will be to prepare a dye, thiazole orange, that will show increased fluorescence upon binding DNA or a protein, thus, signaling the binding event. A dye designed to prevent DNA binding will be tested alongside to highlight how molecular design works. Molecular size and geometry are important elements in the design of molecules that specifically bind biological targets; 3D molecular modeling software (freeware) and hand-held models will be used to analyze how these factors play a role in target-dye interaction.', '', None), '42-401': Course('Foundation of BME Design', '42-401', 3, 'This course introduces Biomedical Engineering students to the design of useful biomedical products.  Students will learn to identify product needs, how to specify problem definitions and to use project management tools.  Methods to develop creativity in design will be introduced.  Students will form project teams and select a project to be completed during the following semester in  42-402. This course culminates in the completion of a design brief. Prerequisite: Senior standing in Biomedical Engineering.  Co-requisite: 42-101.', 'Senior standing in Biomedical Engineering.  Co-requisite: 42-101', '42-101'), '85-382': Course('Consciousness and Cognition', '85-382', 9, 'This course will examine the relationship between cognition and consciousness.   One particular focus will be on the issue of how complex the processes that are largely unconsciously controlled may be and another is on the interaction of conscious and non-conscious processes in the control of cognition.  We will also very briefly examine relevant ideas about consciousness that arise in other fields such as philosophy of mind and physics.  The major topics to be included will be drawn from:  the experience and functionality of consciousness, neuroscience approaches to consciousness, perceptual and attentional work on consciousness, cognition in altered states of consciousness (in particular, dreaming), implicit memory, and the proceduralization of higher  level cognitive processes. The course will consist of our reading and discussing primary research literature from the above areas.  There will be a number of short written assignments based on the weekly reading and a term paper.', '85-211 or 85-213', None), '42-321': Course('Cellular and Molecular Biotechnology', '42-321', 9, 'This course will provide students with an introduction to biotechnology in an engineering context.  The focus will be on using microorganisms to prepare therapeutically and technologically relevant biochemicals.  Topics to be covered include cellular and microbial metabolism, recombinant DNA methodologies, bioreactor design, protein separation and purification, and systems approaches to biotechnology.  Prerequisites:  (42-202 Physiology OR 03-121 Modern Biology OR 03-232 Biochemistry) AND (06-262 Mathematical Methods of Chemical Engineering OR 21-260 Differential Equations) OR permission of instructor.', ' (42-202 Physiology OR 03-121 Modern Biology OR 03-232 Biochemistry) AND (06-262 Mathematical Methods of Chemical Engineering OR 21-260 Differential Equations) OR permission of instructor', None), '03-131': Course('Genes Drugs &amp; Diseases', '03-131', 9, 'The central goals of this course are to explore the genetic basis of diseases and to explain the molecular basis of action for various drugs used to treat diseases. The first part of the course provides the student with sufficient background to understand the biological basis of drug action with emphasis on retroviral inhibitors. The usefulness of genetic engineering in the production of proteins for drug discovery is then explored. This is followed by an overview of DNA replication, transcription, and protein synthesis, with an emphasis on the inhibitory action of antibiotics on prokaryotic processes.  The fundamental properties of carbohydrates, lipids, and membranes are discussed at a level to develop an understanding of penicillin and the treatment of elevated cholesterol levels.  Signaling processes in eukaryotic cells is discussed with reference to cancer treatment and pain management.  The treatment of disease using antibody, and the treatment of inappropriate immune responses (allergy) is also discussed. The course ends with a discussion of inheritance and genetic deficiencies that give rise to disease.', '', None), '85-370': Course('Perception', '85-370', 9, 'Perception, broadly defined, is the construction of a representation of the external world for purposes of thinking and acting.  Although we often think of perception as the processing of inputs to the sense organs, the world conveyed by the senses is ambiguous, and cognitive and sensory systems interact to interpret it.  In this course, we will examine the sensory-level mechanisms involved in perception by various sensory modalities, including vision, audition, and touch.  We will learn how sensory coding interacts with top-down processing based on context and prior knowledge and how perception changes with learning and development. We will look at methods of psychophysics, neuroscience, and cognitive psychology.  The goals include not only imparting basic knowledge about perception but also providing new insights into everyday experiences.', '', None), '33-231': Course('Physical Analysis', '33-231', 10, 'This course aims to develop analytical skills and mathematical modeling skills across a broad spectrum of physical phenomena, stressing analogies in behavior of a wide variety of systems. Specific topics include dimensional analysis and scaling in physical phenomena, exponential growth and decay, the harmonic oscillator with damping and driving forces, linear approximations of nonlinear systems, coupled oscillators, and wave motion. Necessary mathematical techniques, including differential equations, complex exponential functions, matrix algebra, and elementary Fourier series, are introduced as needed.', '21-122 and (33-132 or 33-112 or 33-107)', None), '33-342': Course('Thermal Physics II', '33-342', 10, 'This course begins with a more systematic development of formal probability theory, with emphasis on generating functions, probability density functions and asymptotic approximations. Examples are taken from games of chance, geometric probabilities and radioactive decay. The connections between the ensembles of statistical mechanics (microcanonical, canonical and grand canonical) with the various thermodynamic potentials is developed for single component and multicomponent systems. Fermi-Dirac and Bose-Einstein statistics are reviewed. These principles are then applied to applications such as electronic specific heats, Einstein condensation, chemical reactions, phase transformations, mean field theories, binary phase diagrams, paramagnetism, ferromagnetism, defects, semiconductors and fluctuation phenomena.', '33-341', None), '33-232': Course('Mathematical Methods of Physics', '33-232', 10, 'This course introduces, in the context of physical systems, a variety of mathematical tools and techniques that will be needed for later courses in the physics curriculum. Topics will include, linear algebra, vector calculus with physical application,  Fourier series and integrals, partial differential equations and boundary value problems. The techniques taught here are useful in more advanced courses such as Physical Mechanics, Electricity and Magnetism, and Advanced Quantum Physics.', '33-231', None), '85-442': Course('Health Psychology', '85-442', 9, 'This course is concerned with how behavior and psychological states influence the development of and recovery from disease.  The class provides an overview of existing psychological and epidemiological data on the relationship between behavior and disease and addresses the issue of how behavior, emotion and cognition can influence the disease processes.  Topics include: measures and concepts, stress and disease, stress and coping, personal control, helplessness and disease, social support and health, reactivity to stress, behavior and hypertension, coronary heart disease, infectious diseases and immune function, and the effectiveness of behavioral interventions in health. Special permission of instructor required.', '', None), '85-358': Course('Pro-Social Behavior', '85-358', 9, 'This course is an advanced seminar that focuses on social psychological research involving the examination of pro-social behavior.  A heavy emphasis will be placed on classic research on helping (which investigates how, when, and why we help strangers), as well as the wide body of literature on social support (which investigates how we help, and seek help from, those who are closer to us).  Research on both help-seeking and help-provision will be covered, as well as the implications of this type of pro-social behavior for relationships and health.  The course also will cover research on other types of pro-social behavior such as empathy, altruism, forgiveness, and cooperation.    This is an advanced seminar in which you will be expected to read original research articles and chapters on assigned topics and come to class prepared to discuss the material.  Readings will consist of theoretical and empirical articles from psychology journals and related sources.  Additional course requirements will involve short, weekly writing assignments, student presentations of research articles, and a written research proposal.  Over the course of the semester, students will design and carry out a small-scale, original investigation on a topic of interest.', '', '85-340'), '36-350': Course('Statistical Computing', '36-350', 9, 'Statistical Computing: An introduction to computing targeted at statistics majors with minimal programming knowledge.  The main topics are core ideas of programming (functions, objects, data structures, flow control, input and output, debugging, logical design and abstraction), illustrated through key statistical topics (exploratory data analysis, basic optimization, linear models, graphics, and simulation).  The class will be taught in the R language.   No previous programming experience required.  Pre-requisites: (36-202 or 36-208), plus ("computing at Carnegie Mellon" or consent of instructor).', '36-208 or 36-202 or 70-20', '36-225'), '03-439': Course('Introduction to Biophysics', '03-439', 9, 'Description: This intermediate level course is primarily offered to Physics and Biology undergrads (junior/senior) and provides a modern view of molecular and cellular biology as seen from the perspective of physics, and quanti&amp;#64257;ed through the analytical tools of physics. This course will not review experimental biophysical techniques (which are covered, e.g., in 03-871). Rather, physicists will learn what sets &#8220;bio&#8221; apart from the remainder of the Physics world and how the apparent dilemma that the existence of life represents to classical thermodynamics is reconciled. They also will learn the nomenclature used in molecular biology. In turn, biologists will obtain (a glimpse of) what  quantitative tools can achieve beyond the mere collecting and archiving of facts in a universe of observations: By devising models, non-obvious quantitative predictions are derived which can be experimentally tested and may lead to threads that connect vastly different, apparently unrelated phenomena. One major goal is then to merge the two areas, physics and biology, in a uni&amp;#64257;ed perspective.', '03-232 or 03-231', None), '85-363': Course('Attention, Its Development and Disorders', '85-363', 9, 'This seminar is on attention, its development, and disorders. The seminar will discuss a broad range of topics including: theoretical and practical implications of studying attention (for example, is it really dangerous to talk on the cell phone while driving? does listening to music help studying?); interrelationship of attention with other cognitive processes, such as perception and memory; challenges and opportunities for studying attention in infants and young children; biological and psychological foundations of attention disorders.   Classes will consist of a combination of lecture and discussion. Students will be expected to read original research articles, participate in class discussions, make presentations based on readings, and complete a written assignment.', '85-211 or 85-221', None), '85-362': Course('Applied Developmental Psychology', '85-362', 9, 'Developmentally appropriate" has become a popular label used to describe activities, materials, and environments designed for children. But what does it mean to be developmentally appropriate, and how is it determined? Are these activities and materials evaluated for their impact on children\'s development or are they simply designed with a superficial interpretation of theoretical positions or empirical findings? How do we decide what theory to apply when designing or evaluating materials, activities, or contexts for children, and are different theories more informative and applicable than others? The purpose of this class is to think deeply about how our theories and research findings have been and could be applied to support and enhance the development of children in a variety of contexts, such as at home, daycare, school, playgrounds, etc. and to evaluate different activities, materials and/or contexts in reference to various theories and empirical findings.  The overall purpose of the course is to understand how theory can inform practice and vice versa.', '85-221', None), '33-234': Course('Quantum Physics', '33-234', 10, 'An introduction to the fundamental principles and applications of quantum physics. A brief review of the experimental basis for quantization motivates the development of the Schrodinger wave equation. Several unbound and bound problems are treated in one dimension. The properties of angular momentum are developed and applied to central potentials in three dimensions. The one electron atom is then treated. Properties of collections of indistinguishable particles are developed allowing an understanding of the structure of the Periodic Table of elements. A variety of mathematical tools are introduced as needed.', '33-211', None), '85-377': Course('Attitudes and Persuasion', '85-377', 9, 'This advanced undergraduate course will focus on the topic of attitude change and how various persuasive techniques are used to shape human response. The dynamics of propaganda and what makes the techniques effective on social and consumer decisions will be addressed.  The primary goals of the course are to 1) understand the dynamics of attitude change; 2) explore the mechanism by which attitude change techniques operate and 3) examine relevant theories and research in persuasion.  Examples of topics covered include the origins of attitudes, how attitudes influence judgments, social power and attitude change, and how individual decisions are influenced by the mass media.   Classic and contemporary research in the area of persuasion will be examined in the form of course readings and assignments.', '85-241', None), '03-327': Course('Phylogenetics', '03-327', 9, 'An advanced introduction to theory and practice of phylogenetic analysis (evolutionary tree reconstruction), with a focus on molecular evolution.  Basic concepts will be introduced in the context of a historical survey of phylogeny reconstruction.  A comprehensive introduction to phylogenetic methods will be presented, including data selection, multiple sequence alignment, character state data versus distance matrices, sequence evolution models, and the four major approaches to phylogeny reconstruction:  Parsimony, Distance matrix, Maximum likelihood, and Bayesian analysis.  Sources of error and methods for assessing the reliability of phylogenetic inference will be discussed.  We will cover additional topics as time allows, such as phylogenetic hypothesis testing, genome scale approaches, the interface between phylogenetics and population genetics, gene tree reconciliation, horizontal gene transfer, and phylogenetic networks.', '03-310 or 03-232 or 03-231', None), '03-326': Course('Evolution of Regulatory Genomics', '03-326', 5, 'This course in will examine the processes by which genomes evolve and how this genetic variation leads to phenotypic diversity.  An introduction to gene regulation, how the genome controls development, comparisons of development and the phenotypic diversity in animals will be provided.  Then we will consider ways in which genomes evolve, followed by in depth coverage of how gene regulation has evolved (focusing on cis regulatory evolution and non-coding RNA regulatory evolution).  Finally the concept of gene regulatory network control of development and understanding evolution as change in these networks will be examined.   Concepts and specific examples will come through reading of primary literature and selected readings from advanced texts.', '03-23', '03-330'), '03-325': Course('Evolution', '03-325', 9, 'Evolution is the unifying theory of biology.  This course will provide a broad coverage of the concepts of evolution but will especially focus on the molecular basis of evolutionary change.  Topics will include (i) the history of evolutionary theories, before and after Darwin, and the evidence for evolution; (ii) the origins and radiations of key phylogenetic nodes including, life, multicellularity, animals, and mammals (iii) adaptation, fitness, variation and natural selection, (iv) evolution and development of animal body plans, and (v) cis-regulatory evolution and gene regulatory networks.  The main objective of the course is for students to gain a thorough understanding of the evolutionary, molecular basis of the diversity and origins of life.  Additionally, by the end of the course students should have gained a deeper understanding of all areas of biology through an appreciation of underlying historical processes.', '03-12', '03-330'), '42-426': Course('Biosensors and BioMEMS', '42-426', 9, 'This course emphasizes the principles of biomolecule-based sensing, including molecular recognition, biomolecular binding kinetics and equilibrium; methods of detection and signal transduction, including optical, colorimetric, fluorescence, potentiometric, and gravimetric techniques; statistical principles of high throughout screening; microfluidic and microarray device design principles and fabrication technologies; molecular motors.  Prerequisites:  03-231 OR 03-232 Biochemistry.', ' 03-231 OR 03-232 Biochemistry', None), '36-217': Course('Probability Theory and Random Processes', '36-217', 9, 'This course provides an introduction to probability theory. It is designed for students in electrical and computer engineering. Topics include elementary probability theory, conditional probability and independence, random variables, distribution functions, joint and conditional distributions, limit theorems, and an introduction to random processes. Some elementary ideas in spectral analysis and information theory will be given.  A grade of C or better is required in order to use this course as a pre-requisite for 36-226 and 36-410. Not open to students who have received credit for 36-225, or 36-625.', '21-122 or 21-112 or 21-259 or 21-256 or 21-123', None), '33-340': Course('Modern Physics Laboratory', '33-340', 10, "Emphasis is on hands-on experience observing important physical phenomena in the lab, advancing the student's experimental skills, developing sophisticated data analysis techniques, writing thorough reports, and improving verbal communication through several oral progress reports given during the semester and a comprehensive oral report on one experiment. Students perform three experiments which are drawn from the areas of atomic, condensed matter, classical, and nuclear and particle physics. Those currently available are the following: Zeeman effect, light scattering, optical pumping, thermal lensing, Raman scattering, chaos, magnetic susceptibility, nuclear magnetic resonance, electron spin resonance, X-ray diffraction, M&#246;ssbauer effect, neutron activation of radioactive nuclides, Compton scattering, and cosmic ray muons.", '33-234 and (33-341 or 33-338 or 33-331)', None), '03-201': Course('Undergraduate Colloquium for Sophomores', '03-201', None, 'The purpose of this seminar series is to update biology undergraduates about university and departmental functions, seminars, etc. that are pertinent or useful. In addition, research talks by faculty and undergraduates will be used to introduce students to the research being conducted in faculty laboratories. Additional topics may include graduate and medical school applications, career options, topics in the press, and important scientific discoveries.', '', None), '03-202': Course('Undergraduate Colloquium for Sophomores', '03-202', None, None, '', None), '03-203': Course('Bench to Bedside: Process of Regenerative Therapeutics', '03-203', 6, 'The goal of this mini-course is to provide students with a general background about the process of taking a regenerative therapeutic from the bench to the bedside.  A target clinical indication will be identified, for example, enhanced fracture healing in the distal radius of a post-menopausal osteoporotic patient. We will produce a regenerative therapeutic for that clinical indication and progress through the bench to bedside design and development. Students will be exposed to the process where each component and the final product will be tested using standard in vitro and in vivo protocols.  The goal will be accomplished through lectures and library assignments.', '', None), '03-205': Course('Electronics for Biological Applications', '03-205', 4, 'This mini will cover basic concepts in electronics.  The format for the course will be a weekly lecture and a hands-on laboratory project.  We will introduce key concepts behind the electronic circuitry and instrumentation commonly found in a modern biology laboratory.  The course will cover discrete electrical components, simple circuits, transistors, op-amps, digital electronics, bread-boarding, and the use of common analytical instruments.  We will also show how concepts in electronics provide a valuable conceptual framework for understanding biological phenomena.', '', None), '03-206': Course('Biomedical Engineering Laboratory', '03-206', 9, 'This laboratory course is designed to provide students with the ability to make measurements on and interpret data from living systems. The experimental modules reinforce concepts from 42-101 Introduction to Biomedical Engineering and expose students to four areas of biomedical engineering: biomedical signal and image processing, biomaterials, biomechanics, and cellular and molecular biotechnology. Several cross-cutting modules are included as well. The course includes weekly lectures to complement the experimental component. Prerequisites: 42-101 Introduction to Biomedical Engineering and 03-121 Modern Biology.  Priority for enrollment will be given to students who have declared the Additional Major in Biomedical Engineering. Notes:  This course number is reserved for students registered with the HPP program that, are CIT majors. If you require a biology lab for pre-health admissions requirements, please contact Dr. Conrad Zapanta and Dr. Maggie Braun (in the same email) for permission to register for 03-206 instead of 42-203.  Priority for enrollment will be given to students who have declared the Additional Major in Biomedical Engineering.', '42-101 Introduction to Biomedical Engineering and 03-121 Modern Biology.  Priority for enrollment will be given to students who have declared the Additional Major in Biomedical Engineering. Notes:  This course number is reserved for students registered with the HPP program that, are CIT majors. If you require a biology lab for pre-health admissions requirements, please contact Dr. Conrad Zapanta and Dr. Maggie Braun (in the same email) for permission to register for 03-206 instead of 42-203.  Priority for enrollment will be given to students who have declared the Additional Major in Biomedical Engineering', None), '33-331': Course('Physical Mechanics I', '33-331', 10, "Fundamental concepts of classical mechanics. Conservation laws, momentum, energy, angular momentum, Lagrange's and Hamilton's equations, motion under a central force, scattering, cross section, and systems of particles.", '33-232 and 21-259', None), '33-211': Course('Physics III: Modern Essentials', '33-211', 10, 'Physics III is primarily for third-semester students of physics, including all physics majors, but is open to any qualified student who wants an introduction to the physics of the 20th century. The course will have a strong component of Special Relativity, dealing with kinematics and dynamics, but not electricity and magnetism. (See 33-213 description.) It will introduce students to a conceptual theory, which is mathematically simple but (initially) non-intuitive. The course also provides a broad exposure to quantum phenomena and early quantum theory without getting overly mathematical. It leads into the more formal Quantum Physics course (33-234).', '33-132 or 33-112 or 33-107', None), '33-332': Course('Physical Mechanics II', '33-332', 10, "This is the second semester of a two-semester course on classical mechanics. The course will use the tools developed in 33-331 to examine motion in non-inertial reference frames; in particular, rotating frames. This then leads to the development of general rigid body motion, Euler's Equations. Finally, the course will cover coupled oscillations with particular emphasis on normal modes.", '33-331', None), '33-132': Course('Matter and Interactions II', '33-132', 12, "A more challenging alternative to 33-112, Physics for Science Students II. Emphasis on atomic-level description and analysis of matter and its electric and magnetic interactions. Coulomb's law, polarization, electric field, plasmas, field of charge distributions, microscopic analysis of resistor and capacitor circuits, potential, macroscopic analysis of circuits, Gauss' law, magnetic field, atomic model of magnetism, Ampere's law, magnetic force, relativistic issues, magnetic induction with emphasis on non-Coulomb electric field, Maxwell's equations, electromagnetic radiation including its production and its effects on matter, re-radiation, interference. Computer modeling and visualization; desktop experiments.", '21-120 and 33-13', '21-122'), '33-131': Course('Matter and Interaction I', '33-131', 12, "A more challenging alternative to 33-111, Physics for Science Students I. Students with particularly strong physics backgrounds may volunteer for this course. Modeling of physical systems, including 3D computer modeling, with emphasis on atomic-level description and analysis of matter and its interactions. Momentum, numerical integration of Newton's laws, ball-and-spring model of solids, harmonic oscillator, energy, energy quantization, mass-energy equivalence, multiparticle systems, collisions, angular momentum including quantized angular momentum, kinetic theory of gases, statistical mechanics (temperature, entropy, and specific heat of the Einstein solid, Boltzmann factor).", '', '21-120'), '03-121': Course('Modern Biology', '03-121', 9, 'This is an introductory course that provides the basis for further studies in biochemistry, cell biology, genetics and molecular biology.  This course emphasizes the chemical principles underlying biological processes and cell structures as well as the analysis of genetics and heredity from a molecular perspective. This is the introductory biology course for all science and non-science majors.', '', None), '33-338': Course('Intermediate Electricity and Magnetism I', '33-338', 10, "This course includes the basic concepts of electro- and magnetostatics. In electrostatics, topics include the electric field and potential for typical configurations, work and energy considerations, the method of images and solutions of Laplace's Equation, multipole expansions, and electrostatics in the presence of matter. In magnetostatics, the magnetic field and vector potential, magnetostatics in the presence of matter, properties of dia-, para- and ferromagnetic materials are developed.", '33-232 and 21-259', None), '03-122': Course('Organismic Botany', '03-122', 9, 'This course provides an integrated overview of botany at the level of organism and above, including historical perspectives. It provides an introduction to the subdisciplines of systematics, evolution, plant geography, and ecology, and surveys the anatomical, morphological, developmental, and environmental diversification of major groups within the plant kingdom.', '03-121', None), '03-125': Course('Evolution and History of Life', '03-125', 9, 'Evolutionary theory is the unifying principle of biology.  A good comprehension of the concepts that underlie this theory is therefore important to properly appreciate and understand any biological process. This course is designed for students intending to continue studies in biology so that they may gain an understanding of the evolutionary framework in their more advanced courses, and also non-biology majors who want to extend their knowledge of biology at an introductory level.  The lectures will include (i) an examination of the history and development of evolutionary theory, (ii) consideration of some of the facts that have established the theory, (iii) an introduction to the concepts of phylogenetics, (iv) discussion of the patterns and mechanism that lead to the diversity and origins of the groups of life, (v) an introduction to genetics and population genetic theory, and (vi) discussion of and how this applies to natural selection and speciation.  The course will also include some more specialist topics, including evolution of development, sexual selection, evolutionary applications to medicine and conservation biology, and genome evolution.  Assessment will be based on several in-class exams and quizzes, homework assignments, a written term paper, and a final exam.', '03-121', None), '03-124': Course('Modern Biology Laboratory', '03-124', 9, 'This laboratory is designed to introduce students to modern concepts in the biological sciences. The experiments illustrate many of the principles covered in 03-121 and 03-230. Experimentation using living organisms and/or their tissues, cells or molecules is an essential component of this course.', '', '03-121'), '03-127': Course('How Biological Experiments Work - A Project Course', '03-127', 9, 'The goal of this course is to provide an understanding of the nuts and bolts of biological experimentation. We will discuss the molecular principles behind the wide variety of experiments that were used to discover how cells work. The first half of the class will be a lecture based discussion of key experimental methods used in biological research. The second half of the class will be dedicated to group projects that create "story boards" to explain in molecular terms how these experiments work. The story boards will be used by modelers at the Pittsburgh Supercomputing Center to generate high-end animations of these experimental processes. This will prepare students for working in research labs and biology courses beyond "Modern Biology".  This course is limited to first year students in MCS.', '03-121', None), '03-126': Course('Cellular Response to the Environment', '03-126', 4, 'This laboratory course provides a multifaceted view of the cell, with the opportunity for new discovery, through microscopic imaging of a cell&#8217;s response to environmental changes.  We will identify yeast gene products that undergo changes in expression or subcellular localization after simple environmental perturbations or drug treatments.  Students will be trained in basic molecular biological methods, including recombinant DNA manipulation, and basics of functional genomic resources.    Enrollment is limited to first year students in MCS.  Special permission required.', '', '03-121'), '33-341': Course('Thermal Physics I', '33-341', 10, 'The three laws of classical thermodynamics, which deal with the existence of state functions for energy and entropy and the entropy at the absolute zero of temperature, are developed along phenomenological lines. Elementary statistical mechanics is then introduced via the canonical ensemble to understand the interpretation of entropy in terms of probability and to calculate some thermodynamic quantities from simple models. These laws are applied to deduce relationships among heat capacities and other measureable quantities and then are generalized to open systems and their various auxiliary thermodynamic potentials; transformations between potentials are developed. Criteria for equilibrium of multicomponent systems are developed and applied to phase transformations and chemical reactions. Models of solutions are obtained by using statistical mechanics and are applied to deduce simple phase diagrams for ideal and regular solutions. The concept of thermodynamic stability is then introduced and illustrated in the context of phase transformations.', '33-232 and 33-234', None), '33-241': Course('Introduction to Computational Physics', '33-241', 9, 'The course emphasizes the formulation of physical problems for machine computation with exploration of alternative numerical methods. Work will be done on a range of computers from workstations to high performance computing platforms. Examples are drawn from Physics I and II, and Experimental Physics, as well as concurrent physics courses.', '15-100 and 21-122 and 33-104 and (33-112 or 33-107 or 33-132)', None), '85-395': Course('Applications of Cognitive Science', '85-395', 9, 'The famous psychologist George Miller once said that Psychology should "give itself away."  The goal of this course is to look at cases where we have done so &#8212; or at least tried.  The course focuses on applications that are sufficiently advanced as to have made an impact outside of the research field per se.  That impact can take the form of a product,  a change in practice, or a legal statute. The application should have a theoretical base, as contrasted, say, with pure measurement research as in ergonomics. Examples of applications are virtual reality (in vision, hearing, and touch), cognitive tutors based on models of cognitive processing, phonologically based reading programs, latent semantic analysis applications to writing assessment, and measurses of consumers\' implicit attitudes.  The course will use a case-study approach that considers a set of applications in detail, while building a general understanding of what it means to move research into the applied setting.  The questions to be considered include:  What makes a body of theoretically based research applicable?  What is the pathway from laboratory to practice?  What are the barriers - economic, legal, entrenched belief or practice?  The format will emphasize analysis and discussion by students.', '', None), '33-398': Course('Special Topics', '33-398', 9, '', '(33-231 or 21-260) and 21-341', None), '85-421': Course('Language and Thought', '85-421', 9, 'This course allows the student to explore ways in which the mind shapes language and language shapes the mind. Why are humans the only species with a full linguistic system? Some of the questions to be explored are: What kinds of mental abilities allow the child to learn language? What are the cognitive abilities needed to support the production and comprehension of sentences in real time? How do these abilities differ between people? Are there universal limits on the ways in which languages differ? Where do these limitations come from cognition in general or the specific language facility? Why is it so hard to learn a second language? Are there important links between language change and cultural change that point to links between language and culture?', '85-213 or 80-150 or 80-180 or 85-211', None), '85-219': Course('Biological Foundations of Behavior', '85-219', 9, 'This course will provide students with a general introduction to the underlying biological principles and mechanisms which give rise to complex human cognitive, perceptual and emotional behavior. Topics to be covered include: the anatomical structure of nerve cells and how they communicate, properties of brain organization and function, processing in sensory and motor systems, biological characteristics of human cognition, and neural and hormonal influences on health and emotion. This course will focus on how emerging methods and approaches are beginning to make it possible for psychologists, computer scientists, and biologists to gain an integrated understanding of complex behavior.', '', None), '33-339': Course('Intermediate Electricity and Magnetism II', '33-339', 10, "This course focuses on electro- and magnetodynamics. Topics include Faraday's Law of induction, electromagnetic field momentum and energy, Maxwell's equations and electromagnetic waves including plane waves, waves in non-conducting and conducting media, reflection and refraction of waves, and guided waves. Electromagnetic radiation theory includes generation and characteristics of electric and magnetic dipole radiation. The Special Theory of Relativity is applied to electrodynamics: electric and magnetic fields in different reference frames, Lorentz transformations, four-vectors, invariants, and applications to particle mechanics.", '33-338', None), '85-352': Course('Evolutionary Psychology', '85-352', 9, 'This course will cover both the fundamentals of evolutionary psychology, including the theories of natural and sexual selection, with the overarching aim of providing an overview of the field at an advanced level. We will examine the relevance of evolutionary thinking to a range of psychological phenomena including problems of survival, long-term mating strategies, short-term sexual strategies, parenting, kinship, cooperative alliances, aggression and warfare, conflict between the sexes, and prestige, status, and social dominance. We will also examine evolutionary approaches to sensation and perception, development, consciousness, cognition, language, and abnormal behavior. Juniors and Seniors only or permission of instructor. Pre req: 85-102, 85-211, 85-221, 85-241 or 85-251', '85-102 or 85-211 or 85-251 or 85-241 or 85-221', None), '85-354': Course('Infant Language Development', '85-354', 9, "While adults struggle to learn languages, almost all infants acquire language with seemingly little effort.  This course examines infants' learning abilities and language milestones with a focus on several different theoretical accounts of language development, and the way empirical data can be used to assess those theories.  The course is reading intensive, and evaluation will be based on both written assignments and oral participation.", '85-221', None), '85-355': Course('Introduction to Cognitive Neuroscience', '85-355', 9, 'Cognitive neuroscience is an emerging interdisciplinary field in which psychological, physiological, and computational methodologies are brought to bear in understanding the neural basis of cognitive processes.  In this course, we will consider the application of methodologies such as physiological recordings from neurons in awake, behaving animals, functional neuroimaging (PET and fMRI) of normal subjects performing cognitive tasks, behavioral studies of brain-injured patients with selective cognitive deficits, and computational modeling of normal and impaired processing, in understanding cognitive domains such as high-level vision and attention, learning and memory, reading and language, meaning and semantics, and the organization and control of action. In each instance, the emphasis will be on how the application of converging methodologies, particularly those related to brain organization and function, leads to important insights into the nature of cognitive processes that would be difficult to obtain through any one conventional methodology alone.', '85-211 or 85-219', None), '85-356': Course('Music and Mind: The Cognitive Neuroscience of Sound', '85-356', 9, 'This course will take a multidisciplinary approach to understand the neural systems that contribute to auditory perception and cognition, using music and speech as domains of inquiry. Students will master topics in acoustics, psychophysics, cognitive psychology, cognitive development, neurophysiology, and neuropsychology. The early part of the course will provide students with a common foundation in acoustics, signal processing, and auditory neuroscience. Later in the semester, the focus will turn to developing analytical skills through critical evaluation of primary-source experimental literature. Hands-on laboratories and homework sets in sound manipulation and experimentation also will constitute a means of learning about auditory cognitive neuroscience. Throughout, the focus will be upon understanding general cognitive and perceptual challenges in perceiving and producing complex sounds like speech and music. Topics may include biological vs. cultural influences, development in infancy, perception versus production, time perception, effects of experience on perceptual processing, comparative studies of animals, attention, development of expertise, effects of brain damage, and emotional expression. Topics will be addressed from the perspective of cognitive neuroscience, in that we will attempt to understand the neural processes that give rise to auditory perception and cognition.', '(85-370 or 85-219 or 85-211) and (85-320 or 85-310 or 85-340)', None), '03-210': Course('Independent Study', '03-210', 36, 'Students will read papers from the original literature under the direction of a faculty member. Students will be required to demonstrate mastery of the readings by discussions with the sponsoring faculty member, oral presentations, or writing of one or more papers summarizing and extending the information in the readings. If appropriate, students may write a program(s) to satisfy this last requirement. A student may take this course only once.  This is a mini format course.  Special permission required.', '', None), '85-211': Course('Cognitive Psychology', '85-211', 9, 'How do people perceive, learn, remember, and think? This course will consider perception, language, attention, learning, memory, reasoning, and decision making.  Experimental findings and formal models will be discussed in each part of the course.', '', None), '85-213': Course('Human Information Processing and Artifical Intelligence', '85-213', 9, 'This class will review various results in cognitive psychology (attention, perception, memory, problem solving, language) and use of artificial intelligence techniques to simulate cognitive processes.', '15-122 or 15-150', None), '85-414': Course('Cognitive Neuropsychology', '85-414', 9, 'This course will review what has been learned of the neural bases of cognition through studies of brain-damaged patients as well as newer techniques such as brain stimulation mapping, regional metabolic and blood flow imaging, and attempt to relate these clinical and physiological data to theories of the mind cast in information-processing terms. The course will be organized into units corresponding to the traditionally-defined subfields of cognitive psychology such as perception, memory and language. In each area, we will ask: To what extent do the neurological phenomena make contact with the available cognitive theories? When they do, what are their implications for these theories (i.e., Can we confirm or disconfirm particular cognitive theories using neurological data?)? When they do not, what does this tell us about the parses of the mind imposed by the theories and methodologies of cognitive psychology and neuropsychology?', '85-211 or 85-219', None), '85-444': Course('Relationships', '85-444', 9, 'The primary goal of this course is to introduce you to social psychological theory and research on the topic of relationships.  Although a variety of relationship phenomena will be discussed, a heavy emphasis will be placed on research that addresses fundamental processes in close relationships.  The coverage of material will include a review of historical roots and classic approaches to the scientific study of relationships, as well as exciting new research and theory on particular subtopics.  The majority of class time is spent discussing and evaluating recent research. Special emphasis also is given to learning and critically evaluating the methodological tools that are used to study close relationships.  The goal is for students to leave this course with a broad overview of the field and an in-depth understanding of particular subtopics.    This is an advanced seminar in which students will be expected to read original research articles and chapters on assigned topics and come to class prepared to discuss the material.  Readings will consist of theoretical and empirical articles from psychology journals and related sources.  Additional course requirements will involve short, weekly writing assignments, student presentations of research articles, and a written research proposal.  Over the course of the semester, students will design and carry out a small-scale, original investigation on a relationships topic of interest.', '', '85-340'), '85-446': Course('Psychology of Gender', '85-446', 9, 'This course is devoted to the investigation of psychological gender rather than biological sex. That is, sex differences will be explored from a social psychological (e.g., socialization) perspective. Implications of both male gender role and female gender role in the areas of relationships and health will be the course focus.', '85-251 or 85-241', None), '03-442': Course('Molecular Biology', '03-442', 9, 'The structure and expression of eukaryotic genes are discussed, focusing on model systems from a variety of organisms including yeast, flies, worms, mice, humans, and plants. Topics discussed include (1) genomics,proteomics, and functional proteomics and (2) control of gene expression at the level of transcription of mRNA from DNA, splicing of pre-mRNA, export of spliced mRNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm, and translation of mRNA.', '03-330', None), '03-115': Course('Phage Genomics Research', '03-115', 6, 'This course will provide an introduction to biological investigation through a research project in bacteriophage genomics. Genomics combines experimental and computational approaches for large-scale analysis of the biological information contained in DNA sequences. The ability to analyze the complete DNA of any organism has revolutionized modern genetics and is influencing many areas of biology and medicine. The most abundant biological entities are bacteriophages (viruses that infect bacteria). Their enormous diversity and number make bacteriophages important models for the study of gene structure, function and regulation, population genetics and evolution. In addition they are the source of important tools in biotechnology. The research goals of this course will be to identify new bacteriophage species and incorporate them into a comparative genomic study to better understand the genetic organization and evolution of these organisms. While accomplishing these goals students will develop an understanding of the research process, including the ability to design experiments and interpret novel data.  Fall semester: Samples will be collected in the field. From these samples students will identify and purify bacteriophages. The bacteriophages will be characterized structurally by electron microscopy, and their DNA will be purified and sequenced.', '', '03-110 and 03-121'), '03-116': Course('Phage Genomics Research', '03-116', 6, 'Spring Semester: The DNA sequences will be analyzed with bioinformatic tools and compared with those of phages isolated at other locations to identify genes, their organization, the differences that may characterize different phage groups, and how these have arisen during evolution.', '03-115', None), '33-499': Course('Supervised Reading', '33-499', None, 'The student explores a certain area of advanced physics under the supervision of a faculty member. The student must contact a faculty member and the Assistant Head for Undergraduate Affairs before registering.', '', None), '03-445': Course('Undergraduate Research', '03-445', None, 'Students may investigate research problems under the supervision of members of the faculty. Permission of a faculty advisor required.', '', None), '09-102': Course('Special Topics', '09-102', 3, 'A selection of mini-courses offered to introduce first-year students to special topics in modern chemistry. The courses meet for half a semester and may include some hands-on laboratory and computer experiences. Topics vary, but have included: Forensic Chemistry in the Criminal Justice System, Macromeolecules for Nanotechnology, Popularization of Science Through Books, Plays and Film, Kaboom and Other Approaches to Teaching Science, Dating Using Radioactivity and Computer Molecular Modeling. Enrollment limited to first-year MCS and SHS students.', '', None), '36-461': Course('Special Topics', '36-461', 9, 'Epidemiology is concerned with understanding factors that cause, prevent, and reduce diseases by studying associations between disease outcomes and their suspected determinants in human populations. Epidemiologic research requires an understanding of statistical methods and design.  Epidemiologic data is typically discrete, i.e., data that arise whenever counts are made instead of measurements. In this course, methods for the analysis of categorical data are discussed with the purpose of learning how to apply them to data. The central statistical themes are building models, assessing fit and interpreting results.  There is a special emphasis on generating and evaluating evidence from observational studies. Case studies and examples will be primarily from the public health sciences.  Prerequisites: 36-401 (C or better).', '36-401 (C or better)', None), '36-462': Course('Topics in Statistics: Data Mining', '36-462', 9, 'Data mining is the science of discovering patterns and learning structure in large data sets.  Covered topics include information retrieval, clustering, dimension reduction, regression, classification, and decision trees.  Prerequisites: 36-401 (C or better).', '36-401 (C or better)', None), '36-463': Course('Multilevel and Hierarchical Models', '36-463', 9, 'Multilevel and hierarchical models are among the most broadly applied "sophisticated" statistical models, especially in the social and biological sciences.  They apply to situations in which the data "cluster" naturally into groups of units that are more related to each other than they are the rest of the data. In the first part of the course we will learn about Bayesian statistical methods. In the second part we will relate multilevel and hierarchical models to other areas of statistics, and in the third part of the course we will build and apply these models using a variety of data sets and examples.  Prerequisites: 36-401 (C or better).', '36-401 (C or better)', None), '36-464': Course('Topics in Statistics: Applied Multivariate Methods', '36-464', 9, 'This course is an introduction to applied multivariate methods. Topics include a discussion of the multivariate normal distribution, the multivariate linear model, repeated measures designs and analysis, principle component and factor analysis. Emphasis is on the application and interpretation of these methods in practice. Students will use at least one statistical package.  Prerequisites: 36-401 (C or better).', '36-401 (C or better)', None), '03-350': Course('Developmental Biology', '03-350', 9, 'Developmental biology is the study of how organisms arise from a single cell &#8212; the fertilized egg. The molecular pathways that control development also underlie many human diseases. Developmental biology encompasses stem cell biology, cell-cell signaling, regulation of gene expression, gene networks, morphogenesis, and cell/tissue differentiation. This course serves as an introduction to the major concepts, experimental methodologies, research questions, and model organisms in developmental biology.', '03-240', None), '42-431': Course('Introduction to Biomedical Imaging and Image Analysis', '42-431', 12, 'This course gives an overview of tools and tasks in various biological and biomedical imaging modalities, such as microscopy, magnetic resonance imaging, x-ray computed tomography, ultrasound and others. Students will be exposed to the major underlying principles in modern imaging systems as well as state of the art methods for processing biomedical images such as deconvolution, registration, segmentation, pattern recognition, etc. The discussion of these topics will draw on approaches from many fields, including physics, statistics, signal processing, and machine learning. As part of the course, students will be expected to complete an independent project. Students will have the opportunity to visit laboratory to see real biomedical imaging devices in action.  Prerequisites: 18-290 Signals and Systems or permission of the instructor, working knowledge of Matlab, and some image processing experience. Cross-listed courses: 18-496', '18-290 Signals and Systems or permission of the instructor, working knowledge of Matlab, and some image processing experience. Cross-listed courses: 18-49', None), '03-302': Course('Undergraduate Colloquium for Juniors', '03-302', None, None, '', None), '03-051': Course('Study Abroad', '03-051', None, None, '', None), '03-050': Course('Study Abroad', '03-050', None, None, '', None), '09-321': Course('Laboratory III: Molecular Design and Synthesis', '09-321', 12, 'In this third course in the laboratory sequence, students will learn a variety of more advanced techniques for organic synthesis and characterization, and will gain experience with developing and designing synthetic procedures. Student writing skills are further reinforced through preparation of detailed lab reports. 2 hrs. lec., 6 hrs. lab.', '(09-218 or 09-220) and 09-222', None), '33-301': Course('Physics Upperclass Colloquium I', '33-301', 1, 'Upperclass Physics majors meet together for 1 hour a week to hear discussions on current physics research from faculty, undergraduate and graduate students, and outside speakers. Other topics of interest such as application to graduate school, areas of industrial research and job opportunities are also be presented.', '', None), '33-302': Course('Physics Upperclass Colloquium II', '33-302', 1, 'Continuation of 33-301.', '', None), '85-221': Course('Principles of Child Development', '85-221', 9, 'This course is about normal development from conception through adolescence. Topics include physical, perceptual, cognitive, emotional and social development. Students will learn facts about children at various points in development, theories about how development works, and research methods for studying development in infants and children. Students will be encouraged to relate the facts, theories and methods of developmental psychology to everyday problems, social issues and real world concerns.', '', None), '16-385': Course('Computer Vision', '16-385', 9, 'Basic concepts in machine vision, including sensing and perception, 2D image analysis, pattern classification, physics-based vision, stereo and motion, and solid model recognition.', '(18-202 and 15-122) or (15-122 and 21-259 and 21-241)', None), '16-384': Course('Robot Kinematics and Dynamics', '16-384', 12, 'Foundations and principles of robotic kinematics. Topics include transformations, forward kinematics, inverse kinematics, differential kinematics (Jacobians),  manipulability, and basic equations of motion. Course also include programming on robot arms.', '15-122 or 18-202 or 24-311 or 21-241 or 16-311', None), '36-208': Course('Regression Analysis', '36-208', 9, 'This is the second half of a year long sequence in basic statistical methods that are used in business and management. Topics include time series, regression and forecasting. In addition to two lectures a week, students will attend a computer lab once a week. Not open to students who have received credit for 36-202, 36-626. Cross-listed as 70-208.  Students who have completed 36-401 prior to 36-208 will not receive credit for 36-208.', '(21-121 or 21-120 or 21-112) and (36-220 or 36-247 or 70-207 or 36-201 or 36-207)', None), '42-444': Course('Medical Devices', '42-444', 9, 'This course is an introduction to the engineering, clinical, legal and regulatory aspects of medical device performance and failure. Topics covered include a broad survey of the thousands of successful medical devices in clinical use, as well as historical case studies of devices that were withdrawn from the market. In-depth study of specific medical devices will include: cardiovascular medicine, orthopedics, and general medicine.  We will study the principles of operation (with hands-on examples), design evolution, and modes of failure. Additional lectures will provide basic information concerning biomaterials used for implantable medical devices (metals, polymers, ceramics) and their biocompatibility, mechanisms of failure (wear, corrosion, fatigue, fretting, etc.).  The level of technical content will require junior standing for MCS and CIT students, a degree in science or engineering for non-MCS or non-CIT graduate students, or permission of the instructor for all other students.', '', None), '16-264': Course('Humanoids', '16-264', 12, 'This course surveys perception, cognition, and movement in humans, humanoid robots, and humanoid graphical characters. Application areas include more human-like robots, videogame characters, and interactive movie characters.', '', None), '16-467': Course('Human Robot Interaction', '16-467', 12, 'The field of human-robot interaction (HRI) is fast becoming a significant area of research in robotics. The basic objective is to create and investigate interfaces that enable natural and effective modes of interaction with robotic technologies. HRI is highly interdisciplinary, bringing together methodologies and techniques from robotics, artificial intelligence, human-computer interaction, human factors, interaction design, psychology, anthropology, education, drama, and other fields.  This course is primarily lecture-based, with in-class participatory mini-projects, group homework assignments, and a group term project that will enable students to put theory to practice using state-of-the-art interactive robots. The topics covered will include man-machine coupling, underlying robotic technologies, as they relate to human-robot interaction, interaction methodologies and techniques, the singularity, and will include significant discussion of application domains that feature HRI.  This course has no prerequisites, but some basic familiarity with robots is recommended (programming knowledge is not necessary, but is useful for the term project).', '', None), '09-204': Course('Professional Communication Skills in Chemistry', '09-204', 3, 'This required course for chemistry majors promotes development of  written and oral communication skills in various formats within the discipline.  Students are expected to develop these skills by becoming more familiar with the style and format of the chemical literature, current topics in chemistry, and research projects in the Department.  Other learning outcomes include developing critical reading skills, providing effective feedback to peers&#8217; written and oral communication, demonstrating the ability to revise written work, and using chemical structure drawing software. 1 hr. lec.', '09-221', None), '09-202': Course('Undergraduate Seminar II: Safety and Environmental Issues for Chemists', '09-202', 1, 'Issues and topics focused on laboratory safety are discussed in this class.  The topics are selected to supplement information covered in 09-221, Laboratory I.  This course is intended to provide the necessary safety training for students wishing to undertake undergraduate research projects in the laboratory and is taught in collaboration with the Office of Environmental Health and Safety.   Enrollment is limited to chemistry majors. 1 hr.', '', None), '09-201': Course('Undergraduate Seminar I', '09-201', 1, 'Issues and topics of importance to beginning chemistry majors are discussed in this course. It provides a general introduction to the facilities, faculty and programs of the Department of Chemistry and introduces students to career and research opportunities in the field of chemistry. Enrollment limited to students majoring in chemistry.  1 hr.', '', None), '05-291': Course('HCI for Computer Scientists', '05-291', 12, 'This course introduces the skills and concepts of Human Computer Interaction (HCI) that enable computer scientists to design systems that effectively meet human needs.  A concrete illustration of the practice of HCI, this course covers iterative design processes, interactive prototype construction, discount evaluation techniques, and the historical context of HCI. The course is intended for undergraduates and graduate students not majoring in HCI.  Students considering a major in HCI should instead take 05-410, Introduction to HCI Methods.  The prerequisite for HCI for non-majors is 15-211.', '15-211', None), '85-310': Course('Research Methods in Cognitive Psychology', '85-310', 9, 'This is a course in which students develop the research skills associated with cognitive psychology and cognitive science. Students learn how to design and conduct experiments, and analyze and interpret the data they collect. The course covers a variety of experimental designs, e.g., factorial, Latin Squares. Analyses of response times, qualitative data, and signal detection are also covered. Cognitive modeling will also be discussed. Topics include mental imagery, memory, and perception. The class format consists of lectures, discussions and student presentations. You must have either taken 36-309 previously or 36-309 can be taken as co-req in Fall semester. In the Spring semester 36-309 is prereq.', '85-213 or 85-21', '36-309'), '02-261': Course('Quantitative Cell and Molecular Biology Laboratory', '02-261', 9, 'This is an introductory laboratory-based course designed to teach basic biological laboratory skills used in exploring the quantitative nature of biological systems and the reasoning required for performing research in computational biology.  Over the course of the semester, students will perform many experiments and quantitatively analyze the results of these experiments. Students will also have the opportunity to design experiments based on the data they collect.  During this course students will be using traditional, well-developed techniques to answer open questions. *What changes occur in the splicing of genes as an organism ages? What changes do cells undergo during apoptosis? *Understanding the results of these experiments will require students to think critically about the results they generate, the appropriate controls required to confirm results, and the biological context within which these results were obtained.  During this course students will gain experience in many aspects of scientific research, including:  \xb7 Sequencing and analyzing a large and diverse population of DNA \xb7 Designing and performing PCR for a variety of analyses \xb7 Maintaining cell cultures \xb7 Taking brightfield and fluorescent microscopy images \xb7 Developing methods for automated analysis of cell images \xb7 Communicating results to peers and colleagues  Course Outline: 1 &#8211; 3 hour lab per week 1 &#8211; 1 hour lecture per week  9 units.', '', None), '11-411': Course('Natural Language Processing', '11-411', 12, "This course will introduce students to the highly interdisciplinary area of Artificial Intelligence known alternately as Natural Language Processing (NLP) and Computational Linguistics. The course aims to cover the techniques used today in software that does useful things with text in human languages like English and Chinese. Applications of NLP include automatic translation between languages, extraction and summarization of information in documents, question answering and dialog systems, and conversational agents. This course will focus on core representations and algorithms, with some time spent on real-world applications. Because modern NLP relies so heavily on Machine Learning, we'll cover the basics of discrete classification and probabilistic modeling as we go. Good computational linguists also know about Linguistics, so topics in linguistics (phonology, morphology, and syntax) will be covered when fitting. From a software engineering perspective, there will be an emphasis on rapid prototyping, a useful skill in many other areas of Computer Science. In particular, we will introduce some high-level languages (e.g., regular expressions and Dyna) and some scripting languages (e.g., Python and Perl) that can greatly simplify prototype implementation.", '15-122', None), '85-341': Course('Organizational Communication', '85-341', 9, "Much of the work in groups and organizations consists of communication. You communicate to get information that will be the basis of decisions, to provide a vision for the people who work for and with you, to coordinate activity, and to sell yourself and your work. The goal of this course is to identify sources of communication problems within an organization and ways to overcome them. To do this requires that we know how communication normally works, what parts are difficult, and how to fix it when it goes wrong. The focus of this course is on providing you with a broad understanding of the way communication operates within dyads, work groups, and organizations. This course is not a practicum in public speaking or writing, although you will get some experience writing, speaking, and managing impressions. Rather the intent is to give you theoretical and empirical underpinnings for the communication you will undoubtedly do when you return to work. Readings come from both the research and the managerial literatures. Among the topics considered are managerial communication, persuasion and conformity, self presentation and person perception, social networks. Cases and group projects give you an opportunity to apply what you've learned.", '36-247 or 36-220 or 70-207 or 36-207 or 36-217 or 36-201 or 36-225', None), '09-209': Course('Kitchen Chemistry Sessions', '09-209', 3, 'Ever wanted to boil water in ice? Cook an egg so the yolk is set but the white still runny? Lick a lemon or drink vinegar but have it taste&#8221;sweet? Make &#8220;caviar&#8221; from fruit juice and noodles from yogurt? Explore the science of molecular gastronomy through the lectures and demonstrations that reveal the chemistry and biochemistry of food ingredients and their preparation. Then use a kitchen as your &#8220;laboratory&#8221; to test hypotheses and delve into molecular cooking - you may just get to eat your lab results.  Students enrolling in this course are assumed to have a college level background in chemistry including introductory organic chemistry.  Students without a solid chemistry background should take the lower level 09-109. 3 hrs. lec. and lab', '09-219 or 09-217', None), '03-101': Course('Biological Sciences First Year Seminars', '03-101', None, 'Various seminars are offered that introduce first-year students to current topics of modern biology. These are mini courses that meet for half a semester. Topics have included: Proteins in Disease, Genes and Diseases, Pills and Poisons, Curing Cancer, Organ Transplantation &amp; Blood Substitutes, and Prions &#8212; Mad Cows and Englishman. Courses restricted to first year students in the Mellon College of Science.', '', None), '85-443': Course('Social Factors and Well-Being', '85-443', 9, 'This course will focus on the role that our social environment plays in our feelings of well-being and in the maintenance of our mental and physical health.  Topics to be discussed include marriage, widowhood, loneliness, social support, social participation, social aspects of personality (e.g., social anxiety, extraversion, agreeableness, and hostility), social stressors (betrayal and conflict), discrimination, and socioeconomic status. We will consider how each social factor develops, the extent to which we can alter it or its effects on our lives, and how it influences our overall well-being.  Instructor permission is required.', '', None), '03-345': Course('Experimental Cell and Developmental Biology', '03-345', 12, 'This laboratory is designed to teach concepts and experimental methods in cell and developmental biology. Students work with a variety of organisms to examine how cells traverse development from rapidly dividing, undifferentiated cells, through cell commitment and the establishment of spatial and temporal patterns of gene expression, to the specific characteristics and responses of terminally differentiated cells. The course makes extensive use of video microscopy with phase contrast, DIC and fluorescence microscopes. Biochemical, immunological and molecular biological techniques are used to probe the molecules and processes of cells undergoing development. Experimentation using living organisms and/or their tissues, cells or molecules is an essential component of this course.', '03-343 and (03-231 or 03-232) and 03-240 and 03-33', '03-350'), '03-344': Course('Experimental Biochemistry', '03-344', 12, 'This course is designed to be taken as a sequel to 03-343. Experiments cover a variety of methods for investigating the structure and function of biological molecules. Experimental methods with proteins, enzyme kinetics, lipids, spectroscopy, and isolation and quantization of biological molecules are covered. During several experiments, students design their own projects. Experimentation using living organisms and/or their tissues, cells or molecules is an essential component of this course.', '03-343 and (03-232 or 03-231)', None), '33-448': Course('Introduction to Solid State Physics', '33-448', 9, "This course gives a quantitative description of crystal lattices, common crystal structures obtained by adding a basis of atoms to the lattice, and the definition and properties of the reciprocal lattice. Diffraction measurements are studied as tools to quantify crystal lattices, including Bragg's law and structure factors. Diffraction from amorphous substances and liquids is also introduced. The various types of atomic bonding, e.g., Van der Waals, metallic, ionic, covalent and hydrogen are surveyed. Binding energies of some crystalline structures are calculated. Models of crystal binding are generalized to include dynamics, first for classical lattice vibrations and then for quantized lattice vibrations known as phonons. These concepts are used to calculate the heat capacities of insulating crystals, to introduce the concept of density of states, and to discuss phonon scattering. The band theory of solids is developed, starting with the free electron model of a metal and culminating with the properties of conductors and semiconductors. Magnetic phenomena such as paramagnetism and the mean field theory of ferromagnetism are covered to the extent that time permits.", '33-341 and (33-225 or 33-234)', None), '42-402': Course('BME Design Project', '42-402', 9, 'This course focuses on integrated product development for biomedical products. Teams will consist of a variety of Biomedical Engineering students. The course consists of modules including the development of a project plan, background research, hazard analysis, setting product specifications based on user requirements, detailed design and analysis, prototype development and final documentation and presentation. Additional relevant professional development topics are also covered, including technical public speaking, proposal preparation, personal time management, and other topics. All products developed will respond to the needs of appropriate market segments; resulting products will be deemed safe, effective, useful, usable and desirable by those segments. Students will produce a form model, functional prototype, marketing plan, and manufacturing plan of their product.   Prerequisite: 42-401 (3 units, Fall)  Foundations of Biomedical Engineering Design', '42-401 (3 units, Fall)  Foundations of Biomedical Engineering Desig', None), '03-343': Course('Experimental Techniques in Molecular Biology', '03-343', 12, 'This laboratory course is designed to teach experimental methods of modern biology. Experiments in microbial genetics, molecular biology and eukaryotic genetics are performed. Emphasis is placed on understanding and applying the biological principles of each experiment. This course is designed to be taken during the junior year and is intended to prepare students for undergraduate research. Experimentation using living organisms and/or their tissues, cells or molecules is an essential component of this course.', '(03-231 or 03-232) and 09-22', '03-330'), '03-342': Course('Introduction to Biological Laboratory Practices', '03-342', 1, 'This course is designed for students in the BS in Computational Biology degree program. It will be taught as a first mini as a required co-requisite for 03-343, Experimental Genetics and Molecular Biology and is designed to be an introduction to basic laboratory practices.   The course will introduce biological and chemical safety training and basic laboratory practices.  Techniques of solution preparation and titration, pipetting, UV/VIS spectroscopy, and quantitation of biological compounds will be covered.', '', '03-343'), '09-348': Course('Inorganic Chemistry', '09-348', 10, "The focus of this class is understanding the properties of the elements and of the inorganic compounds. The electronic structure of elements is discussed as the basis for the element's organization in the Periodic Table and for their properties. The systematic chemistry of main group elements and of transition metals is presented. The number of inorganic compounds is extremely large and their properties are extremely diverse. Therefore in this course, the presentation of physical and chemical properties of inorganic compounds is based upon the observation of the trends in the respective properties and the relation between these trends and the place of the elements in the Periodic Table. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.", '(09-105 or 09-107) and 21-120', None), '33-446': Course('Advanced Quantum Physics II', '33-446', 9, 'Classical symmetries; quantum symmetries; rotations and angular momentum; spin; addition of angular momentum; the hydrogen atom; quantum "paradoxes" and Bell\'s theorem; applications.', '33-445', None), '85-340': Course('Research Methods in Social Psychology', '85-340', 9, 'This course is designed to provide students with the necessary knowledge to evaluate research, make transitions between theory and the operations that test the theory, and to design and carry out original research. Topics will include the nature of proof and causal inference, manipulation of indepen-dent variables, measurement of dependent variables, questionnaire design, experimental ,and quasi-experimental, design and ethical issues involved in doing research. Survey, observational and experimental techniques as applied in both field and laboratory settings will be covered. Students will be expected to criticize completed research. They are also expected to design measures and complete their own original studies. During the course of the semester students will also be expected to design and carry out an original research project as well.You must have either taken 36-309 previously or 36-309 can be taken as co-req in Fall semester. In the Spring semester 36-309 is prereq.', '85-251 or 85-24', '36-309'), '16-311': Course('Introduction to Robotics', '16-311', 12, 'This course presents an overview of robotics in practice and research with topics including vision, motion planning, mobile mechanisms, kinematics, inverse kinematics, and sensors. In course projects, students construct robots which are driven by a microcontroller, with each project reinforcing the basic principles developed in lectures. Students nominally work in teams of three: an electrical engineer, a mechanical engineer, and a computer scientist. This course will also expose students to some of the contemporary happenings in robotics, which includes current robot lab research, applications, robot contests and robots in the news.', '18-202 or 21-241 or 21-260 or 24-311', None), '85-422': Course('Infancy', '85-422', 9, 'The purpose of this course is to provide students with an extensive background in the field of infant development and to acquaint them with the special methodological and theoretical problems that characterize research in the field. The course will be discussion-oriented and every student will be required to participate actively in both preparing for and contributing to discussion. Specific content areas to be covered include perception, memory, conceptual development, attachment, emotions, social development, and the origins of language. We will cover general readings as well as conflicting empirical studies and theoretical accounts that we will attempt to disentangle and resolve in class discussion.', '85-221', None), '85-423': Course('Cognitive Development', '85-423', 9, 'The general goals of this course are that students become familiar with the basic phenomena and the leading theories of cognitive development, and that they learn to critically evaluate research in the area. Piagetian and information processing approaches will be discussed and contrasted. The focus will be upon the development of childrens information processing capacity and the effect that differences in capacities have upon the childs ability to interact with the environment in problem solving and learning situations.', '85-221', None), '33-467': Course('Astrophysics of Stars and the Galaxy', '33-467', 9, 'The physics of stars is introduced from first principles, leading from star formation to nuclear fusion to late stellar evolution and the end points of stars: white dwarfs, neutron stars and black holes. The theory of stellar structure and evolution is elegant and impressively powerful, bringing together all branches of physics to predict the life cycles of the stars. The basic physical processes in the interstellar medium will also be described, and the role of multi-wavelength astronomy will be used to illustrate our understanding of the structure of the Milky Way Galaxy, from the massive black hole at the center to the halo of dark matter which emcompasses it.', '33-224 and 33-23', '33-341'), '33-466': Course('Extragalactic Astrophysics and Cosmology', '33-466', 9, 'Starting from the expanding universe of galaxies, this course lays out the structure of the universe from the Local Group of galaxies to the largest structures observed. The observational pinnacle of the Big Bang theory, the microwave background radiation, is shown to provide us with many clues to conditions in the early universe and to the parameters which control the expansion and fate of the universe. Current theories for the development of galaxies and clusters of galaxies are outlined in terms of our current understanding of dark matter. Observational cosmology continues to enjoy a golden era of discovery and the latest observational results will be interpreted in terms of the basic cosmological parameters.', '33-234 and 33-224', None), '85-426': Course('Learning in Humans and Machines', '85-426', 9, 'This course provides an introduction to probabilistic models of cognition. The focus is on principles that can help to explain human learning and to develop intelligent machines. Topics discussed will include categorization, causal learning, language acquisition, and inductive reasoning.', '15-121 or 15-111 or 15-122', None), '42-341': Course('Introduction to Biomechanics', '42-341', 9, 'This course provides a general survey of the application of solid mechanics and rigid body dynamics to the study of the human cardiovascular and musculoskeletal systems.  The mechanical properties and behavior of heart, blood vessel, bone, muscle and connective tissues are discussed and methods for the analysis of human motion are developed.  Both analytic and experimental results are presented through readings from reports in recent journals and the relevance of these results to the solution of unsolved problems is highlighted.  The development of appropriate models for particular problems is also considered.  Pre-requisites:  21-260  Differential Equations AND (24-262 Stress Analysis OR 12-331 Solid Mechanics OR equivalent).  Useful, but not required:  24-141 Statics and Dynamics AND 24-202 Mechanics of Deformable Solids.', '24-262 and 21-260', None), '09-331': Course('Modern Analytical Instrumentation', '09-331', 9, 'This course will cover all aspects of analytical instrumentation and its application to problems in materials, environmental, and biological chemistry. Topics covered will include mass spectrometry, optical spectroscopies and NMR. In addition, the course will emphasize how to select an analytical method appropriate to the problem at hand, how to optimize the signal to noise obtained by a measurement, and the quantitative analysis of experimental data. Some basic electronics will be covered as well.  3 hrs. lec.', '09-222 and 09-22', '09-344'), '85-429': Course('Cognitive Brain Imaging', '85-429', 9, "This seminar will examine how the brain executes higher level cognitive processes, such as problem-solving, language comprehension, and visual thinking.  The topic will be addressed by examining what recent brain imaging studies can tell us about these various kinds of thinking.  This new scientific approach has the potential of providing important information about how the brain thinks, indicating not only what parts perform what function, but also how the activity of different parts of the brain are organized to perform some thinking task, and how various neurological diseases (e.g. aphasia, Alzheimer's) affect brain activity. A variety of different types of thinking will be examined, including short-term working memory storage and computation, problem solving, language comprehension, visual thinking.  Several different technologies for measuring brain activity (e.g. PET and functional MRI and also some PET imaging) will be considered, attempting to relate brain physiology to cognitive functioning.  The course will examine brain imaging in normal subjects and in people with various kinds of brain damage.", '85-211 or 85-213 or 85-414 or 85-412 or 85-419', None), '36-402': Course('Advanced Data Analysis', '36-402', 9, 'This course introduces modern methods of data analysis, building on the theory and application of linear models from 36-401.  Topics include nonlinear regression, nonparametric smoothing, density estimation, generalized linear and generalized additive models, simulation and predictive model-checking, cross-validation, bootstrap uncertainty estimation, multivariate methods including factor analysis and mixture models, and graphical models and causal inference. Students will analyze real-world data from a range of fields, coding small programs and writing reports.  Prerequisites: 36-401', '36-40', None), '09-214': Course('Physical Chemistry', '09-214', 9, 'This is a one-semester course intended primarily for students majoring in Biological Sciences, students pursuing a B.A. degree program in Chemistry, and students in the B.S.A.program with a concentration in chemistry. The course focuses on thermodynamics, transport and reaction rates and their application to chemical and biological systems. Emphasis is given to attaining a good fundamental understanding of entropy and free energy. This is more a concepts than skills building course. Topics include applications of thermodynamics to chemical and biochemical equilibria, electrochemistry, solutions, and chemical kinetics. 3 hrs. lec. Prerequisites: 09106 and 21122 and (33111 or 33106)', '09106 and 21122 and (33111 or 33106', None), '09-217': Course('Organic Chemistry I', '09-217', 9, 'This course presents an overview of structure and bonding as it pertains to organic molecules. Selected topics include: introduction to functional group chemistry, stereochemistry, conformational analysis, reaction mechanisms and use of retrosynthetic analysis in the development of multistep syntheses. Methods for structure determination of organic compounds by modern spectroscopic techniques are introduced. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '09-107 or 09-105', None), '36-401': Course('Modern Regression', '36-401', 9, 'This course is an introduction to the real world of statistics and data analysis. We will explore real data sets, examine various models for the data, assess the validity of their assumptions, and determine which conclusions we can make (if any). Data analysis is a bit of an art; there may be several valid approaches. We will strongly emphasize the importance of critical thinking about the data and the question of interest. Our overall goal is to use a basic set of modeling tools to explore and analyze data and to present the results in a scientific report. A minimum grade of C in any one of the pre-requisites is required.  A grade of C is required to move on to 36-402 or any 36-46x course.', '(36-226 or 36-310 or 36-625) and (21-241 or 21-240)', None), '09-219': Course('Modern Organic Chemistry', '09-219', 10, 'Traditional introductory organic chemistry courses present structure, reactivity, mechanisms and synthesis of organic compounds. Students taking 09-219 will be exposed to the same topics, but presented in greater depth and broader context, with applications to allied fields such as (1) polymer and materials science, (2) environmental science and (3) biological sciences and medicine. This will be accomplished through an extra 50 minute lecture period, where more advanced topics and applications will be discussed. Topics will include computational chemistry, green chemistry, chiral separations, photochemistry, reaction kinetics, controlled radical polymerizations and petroleum cracking. Students who complete 09-219 will have a strong foundation in organic chemistry as well as a sophisticated understanding of how organic chemistry is currently practiced. 4 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '09-107 or 09-105', None), '09-218': Course('Organic Chemistry II', '09-218', 9, 'This course further develops many of the concepts introduced in Organic Chemistry I, 09-217. Emphasis is placed on the utilization of reaction mechanisms for understanding the outcome of chemical transformations, and the employment of a wide variety of functional groups and reaction types in the synthesis of organic molecules. Also included in the course will be special topics selected from the following; polymers and advanced materials, biomolecules such as carbohydrates, proteins and nucleic acids, and drug design. 3 hrs. lec., 1 hr. rec.', '09-219 or 09-217', None), '42-411': Course('Engineering Biomaterials', '42-411', 9, 'This course will cover structure-processing-property relationships in biomaterials for use in medicine. This course will focus on a variety of materials including natural biopolymers, synthetic polymers, and soft materials with additional treatment of metals and ceramics. Topics include considerations in molecular design of biomaterials, understanding cellular aspects of tissue-biomaterials interactions, and the application of bulk and surface properties in the design of medical devices. This course will discuss practical applications of these materials in drug delivery, tissue engineering, biosensors, and other biomedical technologies.  Cross-listed with 27-411  ', '06-221 or 24-221 or 27-215', None), '85-484': Course('Practicum in Child Development', '85-484', 9, "This guided field experience is designed to help students deepen their understanding of developmental psychology by assisting in a preschool or kindergarten classroom and discussing the ways that their experiences relate to the theories they have learned previously and to new readings. Each student will individually schedule a consistent 6 hours per week helping in a Children's School classroom (preferably 2 or 3 chunks of time).  Classroom duties will include working one-on-one and with small groups of students as they do puzzles, art projects, dramatic play, etc., as well as helping with snack, playground supervision, classroom cleanup, and storytime.  Each student will be expected to keep a journal 1) relating general experiences to developmental theories and 2) documenting the development of a particular child during the semester.  All students will meet for a 1 hour weekly discussion with the director. Discussion topics and related readings will be selected collaboratively, based on issues/questions raised by the group's observations and discussions.", '85-221', None), '85-380': Course('In Search of Mind: The History of Psychology', '85-380', 9, 'This course will focus on three aspects of the origin and growth of experimen-tal psychology. The first is the prehistory of psychology, where the connection of the discipline to the development of modern science, and in particular, its origins in philosophy and physiology, is examined. The second focus of the course is on the different approaches and attempts to define the field that have contested for dominance during much of the life of the discipline. The final major focus of the course is on the modern period (roughly the last forty years) where the influences that brought about the modern counter-revolution in psychology will be examined, and where some conjecture about likely future directions will occur. Two prior courses in psychology.', '', None), '85-320': Course('Research Methods in Developmental Psychology', '85-320', 9, 'This is a laboratory course, in which the student will have direct experience working with children, as well as writing research reports and designing and critiquing research in child development. The purpose of the course is to develop research expertise that will assist the student both in carrying out research and in evaluating the research of others. Special emphasis will be given to the unique methodological problems associated with the study of development. You must have either taken 36-309 previously or 36-309 can be taken as co-req in Fall semester. In the Spring semester 36-309 is prereq.', '85-22', '36-309'), '85-419': Course('Introduction to Parallel Distributed Processing', '85-419', 9, 'This course will provide an overview of parallel-distributed processing models of aspects of perception, memory, language, knowledge representa-tion, and learning. The course will consist of lectures describing the theory behind the models as well as their implementation, and students will get hands-on experience running existing simulation models on workstations.', '85-211 or 85-213', None), '02-450': Course('Automation of Biological Research', '02-450', 9, 'Biology is increasingly becoming a &#8220;big data&#8221; science, as biomedical research has been revolutionized by automated methods for generating large amounts of data on diverse biological processes.  Integration of data from many types of experiments is required to construct detailed, predictive models of cell, tissue or organism behaviors, and the complexity of the systems suggests that need for these models to be constructed automatically. This requires iterative cycles of acquisition, analysis, modeling, and experimental design, since it is not feasible to do all possible biological experiments. This course will cover a range of automated biological research methods (especially high-throughput, robotic methods for protein structure determination, gene sequencing, cell-based drug screening, and nanoassays), and a range of computational methods for automating the acquisition and interpretation of the data (especially active learning, proactive learning, compressed sensing and model structure learning).  It assumes a basic knowledge of machine learning. Class sessions will consist of a combination of lectures and discussions of important research papers. Grading will be based on class participation, homeworks, and a final project.   Prerequisites: 15-122 or instructor permission.', '15-122 or instructor permission', None), '85-102': Course('Introduction to Psychology', '85-102', 9, 'This course examines major areas of scientific psychology in some depth, the attempt being to develop basic models of our behavior and thought that explain wide areas of our functioning. The primary focus is on the areas of neural and motivational control of behavior, memory and thought, social interaction, and psychological development. Specific topics within these areas include brain function, motivational control systems, learning, cognitive and perceptual information processing, problem solving, obedience and conformity, social interaction, emotion, attitude consistency and change, how our social, cognitive and language functions develop, the importance of childhood to adult functioning, and psychopathology. In addition to the lecture, the course includes a weekly recitation section meeting and weekly short WEB-based laboratory experiences in which students get to perform actual experiments, interpret real data, and experience many psychological phenomena.', '', None), '09-455': Course('Honors Thesis', '09-455', 6, 'Students enrolled in the departmental honors program (B.S. with Departmental Honors or combined 4-year B.S./M.S. degree) are required to enroll in this course to complete the honors degree requirements. A thesis written in an acceptable style describing an original research project, and a successful oral defense of the thesis topic before a THesis Committee are required. Limited to students accepted into the honors program. (B.S. Honors candidates normally enroll for 6 units; B.S./M.S. candidates enroll for 15 units.).', '', None), '36-247': Course('Statistics for Lab Sciences', '36-247', 9, 'This course is a single-semester comprehensive introduction to statistical analysis of data for students in biology and chemistry. Topics include exploratory data analysis, elements of computer programming for statistics, basic concepts of probability, statistical inference, and curve fitting. In addition to two lectures, students attend a computer lab each week. Not open to students who have received credit for 36-201, 36-207/70-207, 36-220, or 36-226.', '21-120 or 21-121 or 21-112', None), '85-480': Course('Internship in Clinical Psychology', '85-480', None, 'This course introduces students to Clinical Psychology and related mental health fields.  Students&#8217; learning is facilitated through classroom-based activities and by learning about clinical research and/or practice in designated field settings.  Students spend 3 hours per week in class and 6 hours per week in an applied or research setting. Please contact Dr. Beth Zimick if you are interested in enrolling at bethc@andrew.cmu.edu.', '85-251 or 85-261', None),'76-338': Course('Media and Film Studies', '76-338', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Fall 2012: New media isn\'t new; old media isn\'t dead. The term "new media" itself presumes that a wholly original technology replaces another outdated one. This course will trace a history of media change from 1844 to the present day, or, roughly from the telegraph to the iPad, though we will dedicate the bulk of our attention to the mid to late twentieth century. Rather than accept a straightforward linear narrative of innovation, we will, instead, privilege use, reception, and context. The class will also explore various "dead media," technologies that got left behind in the march of progress towards the digital. By approaching the very idea of new media critically, the class intends to deepen students\' understanding of both the historical and contemporary position of the digital media we rely upon to interact with the world around us. While the course readings will be comprised primarily of theoretical and historical approaches to media, we will also draw off many primary sources such as science-fiction, classics of American literature from writers such as Walt Whitman and Thomas Pynchon, as well as documents in which technical pioneers such as Alan Turing outline the form and function of concepts and devices that directly shape modern day computing. Since this course will cover multiple forms of media, students will be expected to develop methods to deal with the specifics of each medium. Students will keep media journals chronicling their interaction with various forms of media - new and old - and experiment with a small sample of digital archives and digital production software in order to complete a case study midterm project on an overlooked medium (or aspect of a medium) of their choice.', '76-101', None), '76-339': Course('Advanced Film and Media Studies', '76-339', 9, 'This course will focus on the global film and media industry from the late 1960s to our present. We will be motivated by two questions: what is a blockbuster and how has this concept changed as media has changed over the last forty years?  When Steven Spielberg\'s Jaws was released in 1975 it radically changed the global distribution and marketing of film.  Spielberg\'s film - like many cinematic blockbusters after it - was a mix of transgressive cinematic genres, advanced filmmaking techniques, classical Hollywood narrative and form. While this class is focused on "national" medias our approach to the blockbuster will attend to this aforementioned mix, which is the product of transnational and transhistorical economic and aesthetic forces. To that end the class will start with New Hollywood films such as Bonnie and Clyde and blockbuster television events like Roots. We will later move to blockbusters that come from other "national" film traditions such as Luc Besson\'s The Fifth Element, Bong Joon-ho\'s The Host and Rajkumar Hirani\'s 3 Idiots.  While the intellectual foundations of this course are in the film industry we will also look at how the blockbuster concept has migrated to interactive entertainment (video games), sports telecasts, the music industry and the Internet.', '76-101', None), '76-483': Course('Corpus Analysis in Rhetoric', '76-483', 9, 'This course investigates methods for analyzing rhetoric as it mainly exists in digital environments (e.g. blogs, newsgroups, homepages, political sites, facebooks and so on). The focus will be on verbal rhetoric, but students who wish to analyze visual rhetoric interactively with verbal rhetoric will be welcome to do so. In the first part of the course, we will review various methods for analyzing digital texts descriptively (viz., concordance, collocate and keyword analysis) and inferentially, through multivariate analysis (e.g., manova, factor analysis, discriminant analysis, cluster analysis). To learn these methods, in the first half of the course, we will use simple textual data sets supplied by the instructor. In the second half of the class, students will choose their own digital environments to analyze and they will be expected to write publishable-quality rhetorical analyses of these environments. To meet this expectation, students will need to do considerable background research in the digital environments they are studying.', '76-101', None), '76-334': Course('19th Century Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-334', 9, 'It started with a financial panic that closed the New York Stock Exchange for ten days. One quarter of the nation&#8217;s transportation companies went bankrupt, as did nearly 20,000 businesses. Unemployment reached 14%. Four years later it was officially declared a &#8220;depression.&#8221; When did all of this happen? Was it 2009? Or the 1930s? No, it was the depression triggered by the financial panic of 1873. Out of this period, also known as the &#8220;Gilded Age,&#8221; came a unique strain of American literature. Frank Norris&#8217;s grisly tale of an overbearing dentist and his miserly wife, McTeague, Andrew Carnegie&#8217;s autobiography, Upton Sinclair&#8217;s iconic The Jungle, Edith Wharton&#8217;s tragic love story House of Mirth, Charlotte Perkins Gilman&#8217;s feminist utopian novel, Herland, William Dean Howell&#8217;s capitalist satire, The Rise of Silas Lapham, Theodor Drieser&#8217;s mournful Sister Carrie&#8212;all of these writings react to, and try to shape, the economy of a century ago. These novels, which were often critical of corporate capitalism, give us a rich and detailed picture of the last time in the US that Americans suffered under the kind of gap we have today between rich and poor. In the US today the top 1% controls 42% of the country&#8217;s wealth, while the bottom 80% controls a mere 7% of the country&#8217;s wealth. What can we learn about the present by reading the fictions of financial crisis and inequality in the past?', '76-101', None), '76-335': Course('20th Century Literary and Cultural Studies:', '76-335', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester.  Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. EXAMPLE Spring 2012: This course will survey American fiction from 1945 to 1980. "Post-1945" has typically been the catch-all to describe American literature after the modernist period, and has often been called "contemporary." However, that designation now seems inadequate: writers who became prominent in the immediate postwar era are historically removed, and writers arising since 1980 form a distinctly different generation, with a different sensibility. This course will account for the immediate postwar period, with the working hypothesis that we need to create a new construal of American literature and its recent past. It will look at authors such as Norman Mailer, Flannery O\'Connor, Saul Bellow, John Updike, and Thomas Pynchon.', '76-101', None), '76-337': Course('Global Literature', '76-337', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Spring 2013: In this course we will focus on novels, short stories, plays and poetry by African, Indian, Irish, and Caribbean writers contributing to a field sometimes called global literature. Contemporary writers from around the world have produced a new body of Anglophone literature that provides vibrant portrayals of the fraught issues facing people in former British colonies. Although the course will focus on literary text, though our reading we will also explore some of the central concepts of postcolonial and global studies, including race, ethnicity, cultural hybridity, nationalism, and modernity. Writers might include Ngugi wa Thiong'o, J.M. Coetzee, Brian Friel, Chimamanda Ngozi Adichie, Arundhati Roy, Jamaica Kincaid, and Aravind Adiga.", '76-101', None), '76-330': Course('Medieval Literature', '76-330', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester.  Consult the course descriptions provided by the department each semester for current offerings. EXAMPLE: Fall 2011: Renaissance scholars sometimes promote the misconception that Shakespeare was the first writer to create characters with inner lives (rather than just social roles), that he was the inventor of the human, as Harold Bloom puts it. The varieties of writing&#8212;from the 700s to the 1400s&#8212;we will take up in this course will, I think, challenge that view. Some of the texts in which medieval men and women represented themselves are reflective, some are outrageous, some are charming, some are funny&#8212;all are populated by human beings we can recognize in spite of unfamiliar modes of presentation. We will explore both well-known fictions like Beowulf, The Song of Roland, Dante&#8217;s Inferno, and Malory&#8217;s Morte Darthur, and some not so well known. The lives of women in the Middle Ages will be a particular focus for the course. Students will also choose one twentieth-century fiction based on medieval materials to read and discuss with the class. Course requirements include regular attendance and participation in discussions, three brief papers and a final exam.', '76-101', None), '76-331': Course('Renaissance Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-331', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Consult the Course Descriptions provided by the Department each semester for current offerings.  EXAMPLE: X-Files of the Seventeenth Century.  Ghosts, monsters, prodigies, demons, and other strange phenomena:  many of these so called "preternatural" occurrences were becoming the object of overlapping (and sometimes conflicting) forms of explanation during the seventeenth century.  Whereas some of these phenomena could be explained philosophically - with reference to natural causes - others belonged to religious debate or seemed exclusively to exist in the imagination.  Using a broad range of texts, we will examine the widespread interest in the preternatural in seventeenth century culture, exploring the political, religious, and ideological consequences of this fascination.  Texts for the class will include images of natural "marvels" and "monstrosities," collections of "curiosities," plays by William Shakespeare and Ben Jonson, utopian fiction by Margaret Cavendish, selections from Edmund Spenser\'s Faerie Queene, seventeenth century crime pamphlets, philosophical texts by Francis Bacon, Robert Hooke\'s images from the microscope, readings in Renaissance and classical poetics, and various religious texts.  Students can expect the reading for this class to be demanding but interesting. Several written assignments, a final exam, and conscientious participation in class discussion will be required.', '', None), '76-332': Course('African American Literature', '76-332', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester.  Consult the course descriptions provided by the department each semester for current offerings. Spring 2013: This course will be an in-depth study of Ralph Ellison\'s works as well as the writers and thinkers that influenced him. Ellison\'s life spanned much of the twentieth century and his writings reflect the political controversies, aesthetic movements, and social-historical events that define the long twentieth century. In some respects this course will function as a traditional single author study in that we will read Ellison\'s most important works including his early short stories, Invisible Man (1952), the posthumously published but never completed late novel Three Days Before the Shooting (2010) as well as much of his occasional literary criticism, book reviews, and magazine articles. At the same time, we will treat Ellison as a heuristic through which we will investigate the concept of race and its relationship to democracy, hegemony, and neo-liberalism at three distinct periods of Ellison\'s career: his "left" writings of the 1930s and early 40s, his Cold War writings of the 1950s - 1970s, and finally the posthumous reception of Ellison\'s work in the late 1990s into the present. To do this we will read the work of critics like Antonio Gramsci, Lord Raglan, Hannah Arendt, Edward Said, and Paul Gilroy alongside fiction writers like Franz Kafka, Richard Wright, and Ayn Rand.', '76-101', None), '76-333': Course('African American Studies', '76-333', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Fall 2012: In this course students will explore "post-race" idealism within American literary and popular culture. With the election of President Barack Obama, the first African-American President of the United States, media pundits, historians and politicians marked the twenty-first century as the century we transcended "race" in American life. But what does it mean to be "post-race?" Where does this concept come from? Is this a good thing? Does being "post-race" mean the same thing to everyone? How does being post-race differ from multiculturalism? In order to explore these questions we will read or watch works such as Phillip Roth\'s The Human Stain, Jeff Chang\'s Can\'t Stop Won\'t Stop: A History of the Hip-Hop Generation, Barack Obama\'s Dreams From My Father, Toni Morrison\'s A Mercy, Paul Haggis\' Crash and Timothy Chey\'s Fakin da Funk. We will also analyze contemporary print advertising, television commercials as well as explore theoretical and literary-critical approaches to the idea of race and post-race in American culture.', '76-101', None), '76-239': Course('Introduction to Film Studies', '76-239', 9, 'This course will serve as an introduction to the history and theory of film. It will cover the history of film from 1895 to the present, focusing on the technological, industrial, and aesthetic development of the medium. It will also introduce students to significant currents of film theory from auteur theory, to psychoanalytic criticism, to recent developments in the philosophy and historiography of film. We will closely trace the development of the American film industry in its relation to other national cinemas, beginning with the earliest films of Thomas Edison, the brothers Lumi&#232;re, and other pioneers of the medium. We will also look at (among other things) examples of classical Hollywood production, Italian neorealism, The French new wave, new German cinema, The new Hollywood, Bollywood, the American blockbuster, new Asian cinemas, and the recent, amorphous category of American &#8220;indie.&#8221; In doing so, we will attempt to define and interrogate the notion of a national cinema. In addition to acquiring overall knowledge of film and film theory, students will develop the skills necessary for critical analysis of cinema and media arts.', '76-101', None), '76-238': Course('Media and Film Studies', '76-238', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Spring 2013: When we reflect on the role of media in our lives, we ought to consider both their meanings and functions. Media objects like advertisements, newspapers, and television shows all have various meanings for audiences, but they also serve central - and sometimes very different - functions in our economy, our democracy, and our everyday lives. The course will offer students a survey of various ways of understanding media objects, including aesthetic, formalistic, ideological, and economic approaches media. Students will practice their interpretation by encountering media objects like the classic 1939 propaganda film The Middleton Family at the New York World\'s Fair, simultaneously a scandalous love story, a reassuring American myth, a piece of self-serving public relations for the Westinghouse company, and a determined apologia for capitalism produced at the height of the New Deal era. Other visual media that we will analyze will include films like Network (Sidney Lumet, 1976) as well as smaller-scale objects like advertisements and internet "front pages." Interpretive and critical secondary texts will feature works by scholars like Theodor Adorno, Marshall McLuhan, John Berger, Raymond Williams, Noam Chomsky, and Mark Crispin Miller.', '76-101', None), '76-235': Course('20th Century American Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-235', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Example, Fall 2010: 20th Century American Bestsellers: In this course we will work to construct a story about the United States and its literary tastes in the twentieth century by reading a selection of bestselling American fiction from the last 100 years. The class will introduce students to concepts central to the cultural study of popular texts, as well as a number of more and less familiar authors and novels. Readings will include only novels that appeared on yearly Publisher&#8217;s Weekly top-ten bestsellers lists from 1900 to 1975. Winston Churchill&#8217;s A Far Country, Edith Wharton&#8217;s The Age of Innocence, Margaret Mitchell&#8217;s Gone with the Wind, Sloan Wilson&#8217;s The Man in the Gray Flannel Suit, J. D. Salinger&#8217;s Franny and Zooey, and E. L. Doctorow&#8217;s Ragtime are just a few of the novels that have shown up on this list. To complete our sketch of popular contemporary fiction, students will present on a bestseller from the last three decades and its reception. Moving through the wide range of texts that became bestsellers, from Wharton to Dan Brown or Stephen King, will allow us to consider whether Daniel J. Boorstin really got the whole picture when he said, &#8220;A best-seller was a book which somehow sold well because it was selling well.&#8221; Course requirements will include a midterm exam, a presentation, and a final paper based on the presentation, as well as intensive reading.', '76-101', None), '76-237': Course('Postcolonial Liturature', '76-237', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings.', '', None), '76-232': Course('African American Literature', '76-232', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Spring 2012: The purpose of this course is to introduce you to diverse examples of African-American literary expression. You will read canonical works like Fredrick Douglass' Narrative of the Life of Fredrick Douglass, an American Slave, Zora Neale Hurston's Their Eyes Were Watching God and Toni Morrison's Sula as well as not so canonical but more contemporary works like Aaron McGruder and Reginald Hudlin's graphic novel Birth of a Nation, Kyle Baker's comic-series Truth: Red, White and Black and Paul Beatty's Tuff. Along with these primary works this course will also introduce you to the field of African-American literary criticism. These secondary readings will help you explore the historical, aesthetic and political issues that surround these works of art, give you a sense of how criticism functions and the multitude of forms it can take.", '76-101', None), '76-294': Course('Interpretive Practices', '76-294', 9, 'This course introduces students to the theories and practices of interpretation.  Combining the approach of critical theoretical study with close textual analysis, we will consider how meaning is produced through language and narrative.   Theoretical approaches include those that explore the role of the author, those emphasizing the workings of language, such as structuralism and post-structuralism, as well as those that underscore the relationship between texts and contexts, such as feminism, critical race theory, and postcolonial studies.   Critical readings will be read alongside literary works from multiple genres and cultural contexts.', '76-101', None), '76-449': Course('20th Century American Literary and Cultural Studies: College Fiction and Film', '76-449', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Spring 2010: College seems a space apart, before you enter the real world. Accordingly, we don't think of fiction and film that depicts life in college as all that serious. However, there is a growing tradition of fiction of university life, whether of students or professors. In particular, a great many prominent contemporary writers have written novels set on campuses, and a number of major film directors have turned their lights on university life. In this course, we will survey the realm of college fiction and film, from F. Scott Fitzgerald to Michael Chabon. We will try to put together its history, distinguish its major types, and diagnose its contemporary representations. We will also look at relevant historical, theoretical, and sociological works that bear on the university. There will be several short papers and one longer final paper.", '76-101', None), '76-322': Course('Global Masala: South Asians in the Diaspora', '76-322', 9, 'This course looks at the writings and experiences of South Asians (people from the Indian subcontinent and its environs) living in such places as the United States, Britain, and the Caribbean. During the semester, we will read literary works alongside histories of South Asian immigrants and theoretical works about diaspora. In the process, we will consider such themes as identity, immigration, race, class and globalization. We will examine the histories of migration and study how the experience of living between two homelands has been theorized. In addition to examining diasporic literature, the course will investigate present day South Asian global cultures including popular culture, film, music, and dance. Possible readings include works by V.S. Naipaul, Hanif Kureishi, Meera Syal, Salman Rushdie, Jhumpa Lahiri, Nadeem Aslam, Mohsin Hamid, and Michael Ondaatje.', '76-101', None), '76-321': Course('Genre Studies', '76-321', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Fall 2011: Poe defined the short story as something that could be read at one sitting. While simple enough, the definition suggests a concern with concentrated form and unified artistic effect. in a sense, the short story has been around as long as people have been telling each other tales, to be sure, but as a literary form it came into its own in modern times, during the 19th century and it continues to be produced in considerable numbers. For many readers one of the great features is the one Poe pointed to: it is short. People who have never finished a novel by Henry James must be legion. So we can experience something with genuine literary merit, in an accessible form. Concentration, of course, can bring issues of comprehension and often short stories can seem puzzling or incomplete to the average reader. This class will attempt to develop our abilities to read with care and attention&#8212;and feeling&#8212;in order to make us better readers of any artistic text. The challenges of the short form turn out to be excellent opportunities for learning a lot, in a little space. We&#8217;ll make use of several inexpensive anthologies, and look at one or two central writers (Hemingway, for example) in more depth. The class will require the writing of a few short papers, engaging in online discussions on Blackboard, and three in class tests.', '76-101', None), '76-327': Course('Special Topics in Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-327', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Fall 2012: This course surveys twentieth-century poetry of the Americas. As such, it brings together poets who are usually studied independently of each other due to boundaries of nation and language. Sharing a 500-year history of forced migration and territorial conquest, the Americas, as a space for comparative poetics, enables alternative trajectories of modernity to emerge. Some of the questions we will consider include: What happens when we shift from a transatlantic focus on Anglo-American modernism to a hemispheric focus on the poetry of the Americas? What new concerns of major American modernist poets&#8212;such as T.S. Eliot, Hilda Doolittle, and William Carlos Williams&#8212;surface when we read them alongside their Latin American contemporaries&#8212;such as Ruben Dario, Delmira Augustina, and Xul Solar&#8212;instead of their usual British counterparts? What role does poetry of the African diaspora play in a hemispheric poetics? Does a shared politics of form come into relief, for example, when we pair the Harlem Renaissance blues lyrics of Langston Hughes with the Afro-Cuban verse of his contemporary Nicolas Guillen? What new discoveries might we make reading English-language feminist poets Adrienne Rich and Audre Lorde next to their Spanish-language peers Soledad Farina and Daisy Zamora (both of whom were forced into exile by state violence)? Throughout the course, we will be interested in asking what new possibilities arise (as well as what limits) when we read poetry across linguistic and national lines. Our goal is to locate overlooked correspondences, as well as to identify problems of translation (broadly conceived to include not only issues to language, but historical and social impasse as well). (See Department for full description.)', '76-101', None), '76-325': Course('Topics in Rhetoric', '76-325', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Fall 2012: What do we mean when we say that someone has "twisted" our words, or that our words have been "taken out of context?" Why is Martin Luther King Jr. best remembered for saying, "I have a dream," and not for saying, "War is the greatest plague that can affect humanity?" What are political "talking points" and how are they perpetuated? How does a claim (unfounded or not) become a fact? How does a fact become a myth? These are just some of the questions that we will consider. More specifically, this is a course in how meaning changes as texts created in one context and for specific purposes are repeated, cited, and used in other contexts and for other purposes, sometimes related and relevant, sometimes not. More technically, we\'ll be focusing on the rhetorical nature of intertextual discourse. Our goal will be to examine the ways that people of all kinds&#8212;including politicians, journalists, and scientists&#8212;strategically draw upon and transform the statements, arguments, and evidence of other people to promote their own viewpoints or purposes. We will begin by investigating scholarship that views language as an extended conversation in which people struggle to have their own voices heard, and other voices countered or even suppressed. Later, we will survey a number of studies that suggest how individuals and organizations recontextualize and reinterpret prior discourse for persuasive ends. More specifically, we will analyze how the micro-features of the language (for example, qualifications, evaluations, and attributions) are used to persuade audiences that certain assertions are (not) factual, that certain speakers are (not) authoritative, and that certain proposed actions are (un)desirable. Ultimately, you will conduct your own research on intertextual rhetoric on a topic of specific interest to your', '76-101', None), '76-324': Course('Topics in Rhetoric', '76-324', 9, 'In this course, we will study communication strategies of effective leaders &#8212; people who seek to promote change in various professional, political, or cultural contexts. The main goals of the course are to understand rhetorical challenges that leaders face in different fields, to examine the language they use, and to learn (through theory, analysis, and practice) the most effective rhetorical strategies that can empower a leader. By drawing on the literature from management, organizational communication, psychology, and rhetoric, we will address a set of questions that include: (1) What makes an effective leader? (2) How do leaders use language and for what purposes? (3) What rhetorical strategies can be most useful to leaders to achieve their goals? (4) What is the role of creativity in leadership, and especially in the leader&#8217;s use of language? We will mine the literature on leadership for theoretical insights on rhetoric. Students will be expected to lead discussions on readings, a midterm that synthesizes the readings, and a final project that reviews the literature and provides an annotated bibliography in some subfield of rhetorical leadership.', '', None), '76-435': Course('20th Century American Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-435', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings Example, Fall 2010: Before the Beat Generation there was the Lost Generation. Both moments of literary history have an important relevance for our time, and both produced many major literary works. The 20\'s, like the 50\'s and 60\'s were marked by the effects of World War. Gertrude Stein seems to have started the whole generation-naming fad with her comment to Hemingway, "You are all a lost generation." Paul Fussell identifies the cultural effect of WWI as the production of "irony" as the central quality of modern identity. Of course, the "lost" generation wasn\'t really lost even if it was searching for new ways of understanding experience. And "beat" generation wasn\'t beaten down either. And irony wasn\'t invented yesterday even if it still is a dominant mode of modern experience. The last generation to have a really significant name, the beat generation was marked in part by an interest in jazz, and an intense interest in the power of writing. Writing was both a form of recording a response (often oppositional, often ecstatic) to what was going on in the world, and it was also a way of re-inventing the world by discovering some kind of previously hidden secret that only "writing" could uncover. There is a continuing interest in beat writing these days, days which are usually taken to be characterized by a decline in print literacy accompanied by a growth in force of electronic media. So, amongst other things, reading the Beats offers us an opportunity to explore our own times, as well as to read (or-read) a body of powerful visionary literature from the recent past. See English Department for full description.', '76-101', None), '76-432': Course('Advanced Seminar in African American Studies', '76-432', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester.  Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Fall 2011: This course will be an in-depth study of James Baldwin&#8217;s works as well as the writers and thinkers that influenced him. Baldwin&#8217;s rumination on American life during and after the epoch defining events of Civil Rights Era reflects the great political and cultural transformations the country struggled through. In this course students will read canonical works such as Notes of A Native Son and Giovanni&#8217;s Room as well as lesser know works like One Day When I Was Lost, Baldwin&#8217;s screenplay for a never-to-be-produced film project on Malcolm X and Little Man, Little Man: A Story of Childhood, a children&#8217;s novel he published in 1976. Besides Baldwin&#8217;s works we will read and connect Baldwin&#8217;s thoughts on literature, race, sexuality and politics to some of his immediate contemporaries like Richard Wright, William Faulkner, Flannery O&#8217;Connor and others who had an influence on Baldwin&#8217;s imagination and craft.', '76-101', None), '76-431': Course('Chaucer', '76-431', 9, "We will read most of Chaucer's Canterbury Tales and his narrative poem Troilus and Criseyde (considered by some the first English novel). Our texts are in Middle English&#8212;Chaucer's language is odd-looking, but easily mastered. We will also read some brief accounts of 14th-century institutions and traditions (chivalry, religious life, marriage, etc.). Most class meetings will consist of discussions that examine these fictions in relation to the social conditions they imply and the tellers&#8217; stakes in the telling. While we are discussing the General Prologue, I will ask each of you to identify the pilgrim through whose eyes you will try to read each of the tales (in addition, of course, to seeing from your own vantage point). As the course goes on, you will become an expert on one of the social roles portrayed in Chaucer's fictional universe. Required are near-perfect attendance, steady participation, and three papers. Graduate students will meet for an extra hour a week, read additional materials, and write longer papers.", '76-101', None), '76-430': Course('Arthurian Legends in the 20th Century', '76-430', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Spring 2013: Arthurian tales have been told and retold in Anglo-American culture for centuries - they have been appropriated for novels (of which medieval romances are the ancestors), poems, operas, films and visual art of many kinds. The Monty Python group assumed that their satire Monty Python and the Holy Grail would be understood in some detail in order for its humor to be appreciated; the nineteenth century poets and novelists had made the same assumption. It is no exaggeration to say that our own structures of feeling concerning love, sex, and adventure still reflect this influence. This course will juxtapose some of the medieval tales that found the genre with their more recent counterparts, for example Chretien's Lancelot with Malory's retelling of that story in Morte D'Arthur, Tennyson's retelling of Malory, and T. H. White's Once and Future King (the basis of the musical and film Camelot). Recent novels such as Scott Spencer's Endless Love, A.S. Byatt's Possession, and Umberto Eco's Name of the Rose are also set beside their medieval antecedents. Full participation in all class meetings, brief responses to our texts, and two prepared papers are required for everyone in the course; an additional hour for the discussion of critical and theoretical texts is offered for grad students.", '76-101', None), '76-439': Course('Advanced Seminar in Film and Media Studies', '76-439', 9, 'In the late 1700s moral crusaders were worried about the latest media scandal: the surge in women reading novels. As one observer complained, &#8220;Women, of every age, of every condition&#8221;retain a taste for novels. I find [novels]&#8221;in the work-bag of the seamstress, in the hands of the lady who lounges on the sofa, the mistresses of nobles, the mistresses of snuff-shops, the belles who read them in town, and the chits who spell them in the country.&#8221; While today we might be genuinely concerned about texting while driving, or the depression associated with high levels of facebook use, in this class we won&#8217;t judge so much as we will analyze. We will look at what historical media trends have in common with, and how they are different from, the media trends of today. We will read about the print revolution, the electronic media revolution, the current digital revolution, and we will also try to peer into the future. Importantly, we will take a literary and cultural studies approach to this material. We will ask, specifically, what can the humanities teach us about media revolutions over time? How is narrative, or story telling, central to each media revolution? Texts for the class will include: Super Sad True Love Story, Digital Labor: The Internet as Playground and Factory, Revolution and the Word, Spreadable Media: Creating Value and Meaning in a Networked Culture, and Black Code: Inside the Battle For Cyberspace.', '', None), '76-438': Course('Advanced Seminar in American Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-438', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Fall 2012: Today, television is "old media." But what was television like when it was "new media?" In this course, we will think about how television transformed American culture. We will look at individual genres, like drama, sitcoms, westerns, variety shows, and game shows. We will watch I Love Lucy, I Remember Mama, The Goldbergs, The Milton Berle Show, Amos n Andy, Queen for a Day, The Phil Silvers Show, the western Cheyenne, The Honeymooners, Leave It to Beaver, and teleplays like Marty and A Man is Ten Feet Tall. We will think about the social and political history of television, including television and the Cold War, television and Civil Rights, and television and electoral politics. Ultimately, the framing question of this class will be a media studies question: how do media technologies change our lives, and how do they NOT change our lives? How is the television revolution similar to our current digital revolution? What can we learn about new media by studying old media?.', '', None), '76-217': Course('Contempory American Literary &amp; Cultural Studies', '76-217', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Summer 2010. It has been said that the teenager is the most free and least happy of all living beings. Given America\'s current obsession with youth culture, it\'s hard to imagine a time when the word "teenager" did not exist. However, this word came into being largely as a result of the post World War II boom in consumerism when advertisers needed a new way to define an emerging demographic group with its own disposable income and spending power. Through a survey of twentieth century literature that focuses on the teenage experience, we\'ll explore the changing meanings of young adulthood over the last one hundred years. What is the relationship between the invention of the teenager and modernist aesthetics? What characteristics were considered markers of young adulthood in the 1920\'s? In the 1950\'s? In 2000? How are the experiences of angst, anomie and the unfulfilled American dream connected to modern Western life through the teenage subject? How do tropes of individualism, rebellion, freedom and resistance connect the literature of teen angst with other genres of American literature? How has teen angst been both an impediment to and the inspiration for cultural resistance and social change? To answer these questions, we will compare texts such as Philip Roth\'s Portnoy\'s Complaint, Anzia Yezierska\'s The Bread Givers, J.D. Salinger\'s Catcher in the Rye, Margaret Atwood\'s The Edible Woman, Dave Eggers\' A Heartbreaking Work of Staggering Genius, and Banana Yoshimoto\'s Kitchen. See English Department for full description.', '76-101', None), '76-215': Course('19th Century American Literature', '76-215', 9, "Topics vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Spring 2010: In this class, we will be reading many of the major works of  Edgar Allan Poe, Nathaniel Hawthorne, and Herman Melville. Often described as America's Dark Romantics, these three authors are frequently read as reacting to the current of optimism and idea of human perfectibility that characterized antebellum America and the Transcendentalist movement. We will begin by reading most of Poe's short fiction and novellas and a number of his poetic and journalistic works. We will also read Hawthorne's two major novels House of the Seven Gables and The Scarlet Letter, as well as a number of his shorter works from Twice-Told Tales. The class will also look at a number of Melville's major works beginning with his first novel Typee, his short story collection The Piazza Tales, and culminating with Moby Dick. In addition to reading these canonical authors for their artistic merit, we will also consider the ways in which their works interacted with some of the prevailing ideas of their historical moments.", '76-101', None), '76-213': Course('19th Century British Literature', '76-213', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Spring 2012: Women writers played an essential role in the construction of Victorian literary culture. In this course we will read novels, poems, and periodical extracts by a diverse body of nineteenth-century female authors as a means of better understanding women\'s historic and aesthetic impact on Victorian culture. While some of our authors are well known, like the wildly popular poet Elizabeth Barrett Browning, we will also encounter the \'lost\' author, journalist, and controversial anti-feminist Eliza Lynn Linton. The writing of Victorian women exemplifies important social debates from the nineteenth-century. Social taboos such as divorce, suffrage, Bloomerism, children out of wedlock, and women in the workforce were all topical in Victorian culture. As the conflicted and introspective heroine of George Eliot\'s The Mill on the Floss reminds readers, the role of marriage as a woman&#8217;s sole profession was becoming increasingly untenable in the modern era. Victorians were forced to ask what other function were women fit to occupy. From the Pre-Raphaelite poetry of Christina Rossetti, to the gothic horror of Emily Bronte\'s Wuthering Heights, "the woman question" served as a lightening rod for a variety of nineteenth-century cultural anxieties. The woman as deviant and criminal which we will encounter in Mary Elizabeth Braddon\'s Lady Audley\'s Secret was an especially controversial aspect of the female-dominated genre of "Sensation Fiction." Margaret Oliphant records in an 1867 review from Blackwoods: "What is held up to us as the story of the feminine soul as it really exists underneath its conventional coverings is a very fleshy and unlovely record.(See Dept. for full desc.).', '', None), '76-443': Course('Contemporary British and American Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-443', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Fall 2010: This class is somewhat of a continuation of 76-346 Major Works of Modern Poetry although that class is not a pre-requisite for this one. The terms 'modern' and 'contemporary' are arbitrary ones in literary history, with 'modern' tending to mean roughly the period 1900-1925 and 'contemporary' the period after that, 1925&#8212;'60 or '70, roughly. We'll be looking at the post-T.S. Eliot poets, and there is a wide range of significant, interesting and challenging writers to choose from. Our choices might well include some of the following: Elizabeth Bishop, Delmore Schwartz, Randall Jarrell, John Berryman, Dylan Thomas, Robert Lowell, Robert Duncan, Lawrence Ferliinghetti, Richard Wilbur, Philip Larkin, Anthony Hecht, Denise Levertov, Kenneth Koch, James Merrill, Robert Creeley, Allen Ginsberg, John Ashberry, Adrienne Rich, Ted Hughes, Sylvia Plath etc.  Clearly we will not deal in depth with all of them, but we will considerably widen our range of reading and understanding the best that has been thought and said in recent times. Our purpose in large part will be to become familiar with the major writers of the 'contemporary' time frame. We will focus our attention primarily on developing our abilities to read and understand poetry, learning the kind of flexible hypothesis-making needed to deal with imaginative uses of language. We will work on training our ears to hear the particular music of individual voices. Which is to say that we will make the 'understanding' of poetry derivative of the musical, or simply artistic, appreciation of it.", '76-101', None), '76-440': Course('Postcolonial Theory', '76-440', 9, 'Arjun Appadurai argues that one of the primary transformations in this period of globalization has been in the capacity for people to imagine themselves or their children will live and work in places other than where they were born. Although the novel has long been consider a national form, contemporary novels frequently represent transnational mobility, both in their plots and as global commodities.  A significant body of contemporary literature focuses on imaginative and physical movement across national borders. This global literature course combines literary and theoretical readings to examine the experiences of transnationalism and diaspora. Theories of transnationalism look at the interconnections that cut across nations. The concept of diaspora, a term first used to reference the movement of a people out of a homeland, has become a way to think about the identities of immigrants, migrant workers, and refugees. Readings for the course will be drawn from a diverse group of writers from around the globe. Literary readings might include works by Amitav Ghosh, Jamaica Kincaid, Nuruddin Farah, Christina Garcia, and Monica Ali; theoretical readings might include works by Salman Rushdie, Paul Gilroy, Gloria Anzald\xfaa, Arjun Appadurai, Inderpal Grewal and Avtar Brah.', '', None), '76-446': Course('Allegory', '76-446', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Fall 2012: Allegory has both a broad meaning involving any attachment of ideas to literary structure and a narrow meaning in which simple morality tales feature characters like Fellowship and Good Deeds. We will make use of both broad and narrow definitions. The long reign of "realistic" fiction was levered against allegory, which was was often dismissed of as simpleminded, unattractively didactic, and "medieval." More recently, sometimes in connection with our current interest in "alternative universes," the term and the concept have taken on a new importance in political discourse and in the interpretation of science fiction. The course will consider some medieval, some twentieth century, and some very recent allegories (mostly on film or video), in an attempt to explore theories of both allegorical and realistic narrative modes.', '76-101', None), '76-444': Course('Studies in Print Culture', '76-444', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Fall 2012: The first modern media age emerged in the eighteenth-century, with new forms of print, orality, and their impact on a growing public. We will consider early modern and Enlightenment practices of communication, media, and the book, then explore their Romantic and Victorian transformations in the nineteenth century. Reading histories of the book, novels, and early journalism &#8211; along with a good deal of current book-history and media scholarship &#8211; we will aim to understand the relation between print as a set of material forms, on the one hand, and wider cultural processes at work in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries. These included the power of the early modern Republic of Letters and its disintegration by 1800, then the ensuing reconfiguration of its knowledges in the nineteenth-century cultural fields and disciplines. We will also look at the forming and division of new reading publics and their ways of reading print; important changes in book production, typography, printing methods (hand-press to steam press), and bookselling. We will study the relation between the aesthetic powers of the "text" and the sociocultural impact of the "book." We will also use some tools in "digital humanities" to help study book history. Books and other print formats were "new media" in their time, and we will try to see them as emerging in cultural history. You will have hands-on experience with earlier books, periodicals, and other forms of print as we meet several times in the Rare Book Room at Hunt Library and the printshop. Each student will be asked to make a class presentation on a rare text as published in the period 1450-1800. Two papers will be required &#8211; one shorter paper and a longer research paper on an issue of understanding the uses of print and critical theories in book history before the twentieth century.', '76-101', None), '76-359': Course('Planning and Testing Documents', '76-359', 9, 'We often send the documents we produce out into the world, having worked hard on them and hoping that they achieve the purposes that we intend for them. In some situations, this suffices. In others, however, we may need more than hard work and hope&#8212;we may need to know that a document is working: Are thousands or even millions of people going to be using the document? Can they comprehend it? Can they follow its directions safely? Are they fearful or confident as they do so? In Planning and Testing Documents, you will study and practice methods for providing valid and reliable answers to these types of questions, both in the lab&#8212;before a document goes out the door&#8212;and in the field&#8212;after a document is in the world. Learning about the problems readers have using documents can be a rewarding experience for professional writers. And the reasons for doing so are several: Various studies have shown that reader feedback helps professional writers optimize the effectiveness of their documents, that professional writers themselves are unable to predict the problems readers experience, and that writers become more aware of their audiences and improve as writers when they are regularly confronted with reader feedback. Topics will include both basic issues that pertain to all empirical research methods&#8212;sampling, response rates, validity and reliability, the design of questionnaires, scales and surveys, the ethical issues involved in doing research with people&#8212;as well as methods specifically relevant to planning and testing documents, such as subject matter expert (SME) observation and interviews, think-aloud usability testing (you&#8217;ll learn more than the &#8220;crash course&#8221; basics that you learned in your introductory professional writing course), plus-minus testing method, designing comprehension tests, and other reader-focused evaluation methods. (See Dept. for full description)', '76-390 or 76-272 or 76-271 or 76-270', None), '76-354': Course('South Asian Literature', '76-354', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Please consult the English Department for the most current description. Example, Fall 2011: This course focuses on twentieth-century literature written in English from India, Pakistan and other parts of South Asia, as well as by people of South Asian origin. The course will begin by looking at literary representations that portray the struggle for decolonization and the trauma of partition. As we move forward to the contemporary period, we will examine the competing aesthetics of social and magical realism. We will then look back at India from the perspective of the diaspora, considering themes of identity, immigration and globalization from the perspective of South Asians writing in Britain and the United States. Texts might include works by Rabindranath Tagore, Saadat Hasan Manto, Mahasweta Devi, Salman Rushdie, Hanif Kureishi, Amitav Ghosh, Aravind Adiga, Romesh Gunesekera, Chitra Banerjee Divakaruni and Jhumpa Lahiri.', '76-101', None), '76-355': Course('Leadership, Dialogue, and Change', '76-355', 9, 'Leadership is often associated with the exercise of institutional authority or individual power. However the tradition of leadership based on dialogue shows us a powerful counter-rhetoric&#8212;one which organizes people to work together on complex problems through problem-posing, pragmatic inquiry, and the inclusion of marginalized perspectives.  We will examine how this approach to leadership and change works in public voices of writers from Emerson and Martin Luther King, to the community organizing of an Alinsky, to the cultural critiques of African-American and feminist scholars such as Cornel West or bell hooks, and&#8212;equally importantly&#8212;in the ways ordinary professionals include voices and integrate social values into effective workplace writing, and the ways students call forth change on campuses. This introduction to the rhetoric of making a difference shows how its roots in American philosophical pragmatism created a focus on outcomes, not just ideals, and translated commitments into strategic rhetorical practices.  In this course you will develop your own skills in writing and leadership by working as a &#8220;rhetorical consultant&#8221; to a campus or community group: learning how to investigate and define a shared problem, to develop a briefing book for deliberation, and to support inclusive decision making by documenting rival perspectives and options (see <a href="http://www.cmu.edu.thinktank">http://www.cmu.edu.thinktank</a>). This portfolio project will also demonstrate your research skills and ability to support a problem-solving dialogue within an intercultural community or complex organization.', '76-101', None), '76-353': Course('Global Studies', '76-353', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Fall 2012: This course looks at the relationship between women and globalization. Globalization has been defined as the "creation of new and the multiplication of existing social networks and activities that increasingly overcome traditional political, economic, cultural, and geographical boundaries." What, then, are the roles and places of women in these new networks and activities? What is the function of the text&#8212;fiction, memoir, scholarly article or film&#8212;in describing these roles and places? This course will begin exploring these questions historically by theorizing women\'s relation to the nation in nationalist struggles. We will look specifically at the close connection between women and elements of tradition, including religion. Moving into the contemporary moment, we will examine the experiences of immigrant women and women in the global factory. As a way to interrogate our own assumptions, we will consider heated debates about global feminism. Throughout the course, we will think through the role of cultural representations in these issues.  Readings will be drawn from around the world, and include theoretical works as well as literary and filmic representations.', '76-101', None), '76-350': Course('History  of Critical Ideas', '76-350', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Spring 2013: This course studies the long-debated, volatile problem of how readers or spectators respond to texts (in print, theatrical performances and dramaturgy, film, or painting). Aristotle, Plato, Longinus and other ancients theorized about audience response in terms of its danger or advantage to the polis; in that broad sense, the problem has always been political as well as psychological and aesthetic. Eighteenth-century thinkers formulated notions of "beauty" and "standards of taste" to measure audience response to poetry and visual art. Romantic writers developed psychologies of reading as symbolic interpretations. The rise of mass culture links the politics of reading or viewing to questions of consumption and the market of cultural goods. Guided by recent critical theory as well as classic questions, we will ask how the reading or viewing subject is "constructed" by the printed or filmic text; how institutions like schools control the process of interpretation; how individual readers "appropriate" texts for themselves against their authors\' intentions. We will also follow the lead of historians by asking how individual readers used books or other media to refashion their lives. What people do with texts, and what texts to do people, will be the threads we trace through readings in literary criticism and theory, film and theater criticism, history of reading, and the sociology of culture. There will be two film screenings, two short papers, and one longer paper required of all students. Participation and regular attendance is expected.', '76-101', None), '76-262': Course('Survey of Forms: Nonfiction', '76-262', 9, 'According to The National Endowment for the Arts, creative nonfiction is &#8220;factual prose that is also literary.&#8221; Memoir, the essay, and literary journalism are just three kinds of writing that fit into this very broad, very vital genre. While creative nonfiction often borrows techniques from fiction, such as narrative, scene, dialogue, and point of view, creative nonfiction is based on actual events, characters and places. What distinguishes creative nonfiction from journalism is that it conveys more than bare-bones facts and that language, analysis and narrative voice are integral parts of each piece. In this course, students will have the chance to read widely within the genre. Exercises and writing assignments will give students the chance to write their own pieces, so that by the end of the semester, everyone will have written four different kinds of creative nonfiction.', '76-101', None), '76-260': Course('Survey of Forms: Fiction', '76-260', 9, 'Section A: This course introduces students to the forms of fiction. Students will read a variety of short stories, and one novel, complete a series of exercises, and be asked to write their own story at the end of the course. We will focus on learning point of view options, plot, sense of place, and above all, the work of making a memorable character. Students will come to understand how to create a vivid scene that springs to life on the page, by learning to use fresh language in dialogue and description. Assignments will be completed in a series of drafts; students will learn to revise, line by line. The readings will be literary fiction; if you are a student who reads fantasy and science fiction exclusively, the readings of this course will likely not appeal to you. The class will be run, primarily, as a discussion, and demands daily attendance. Section B: This is an introduction to the reading and writing of fiction designed as the first in a sequence of courses for creative writing majors and also as a general course for students wanting some experience in creative writing. Character development and the creation of scenes will be the principal goals in the writing of a short story or stories during the course of the semester - to a minimum of 15 pages. Revisions will be important and reading assignments will illustrate the different elements of fiction reviewed and practiced. A journal is required and two quizzes on the reading material.', '76-101', None), '76-261': Course('Survey of Forms: Creative Nonfiction', '76-261', 9, 'The National Endowment for the Arts defines "creative nonfiction" as "factual prose that is also literary."  In this survey course, students will read a wide range of work that falls into this lively genre, including memoir, travel writing, the personal essay, and nature writing. Weekly writing assignments will give students the chance to work on short pieces of their own creative nonfiction.', '76-101', None), '76-267': Course('Introduction British Poetry', '76-267', 9, "This course is a broad, introductory survey of British poetry from Beowulf to the present. Working through the Norton Anthology of Poetry, students will read and analyze many of Britain's most thoughtful, playful, and rewarding poems while tracking themes that will certainly include tradition, nationhood, empire, identity, gender, and theology, among others. No prior familiarity with British poetry is required, but students should be prepared, firstly, to investigate and take seriously formal poetic techniques such as versification, syntax, lineation, and sound. Secondly, students should be prepared to entertain the suggestion that British poetry has served many different ends over its long history, and that the expression of private passions&#8212;to which so many discussions of poetry stubbornly return - may in fact be among the least interesting of them. Short, written analyses will be required in advance of most classes; there will also be at least one research paper, one presentation, and one exam.", '76-101', None), '76-265': Course('Survey of Forms: Poetry', '76-265', 9, 'Survey of Forms: Poetry is a course in the writing of verse. Students will study the traditions of English and American poetry. There are weekly reading and writing assignments. Additionally there are - hour examinations and the submission of a final project to consist of all work completed during the course. Presence in class is mandatory, as is participation in class discussion and attending evening performances by visiting writers.', '76-101', None), '76-269': Course('Survey of Forms: Screenwriting', '76-269', 9, 'It is not so difficult to learn the format or even to master the style of the screenplay - the challenge lays in writing image-driven stories with believable dialogue, vivid characters, and a coherent, well-structured plot. To that end, students will view short and feature-length films, paying special attention to such fundamentals as character development and story structure. Students will read screenplays to see how scripts provide the blueprints for the final product, and write analytical papers. To gain experience and confidence, students will work on a number of exercises that will lead them toward producing a polished short screenplay by the end of the semester.', '76-101', None), '76-451': Course('Topics in Language Study', '76-451', 9, 'Seminars focusing on topics in linguistics and discourse studies. Topics will vary by semester. Consult detailed course descriptions available from the Department each semester for details. May be repeated for credit. Fall 2011: The linguistic and social history of the English language from its earliest attestations until the global spread of English and the emergence of the spectrum of &#8220;Englishes&#8221; in the modern world. We will single out some of the critical periods of change and study them for their linguistic and sociocultural significance. The periods studied will include: the Germanic background; Old English; English from the Norman Conquest (1066) until the introduction of printing (1476); Early Modern English; Present Day English. We will study short texts characteristic of their time and examine linguistic and sociocultural features diagnostic of their age, social class, and region.', '76-101', None), '76-450': Course('History of Critical Ideas: Problems of Reading, Interpretation &amp; Spectatorship', '76-450', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Consult the English Department for the most current description. Example, Fall 2011: "I\'m not a lawyer, but&#8221;" How many times have you heard this disclaimer, closely followed by a lay analysis of law? This course, an introduction to the cultural study of law for graduate students and advanced undergraduate students, can be seen as an introduction to what goes into the making of such a statement. Where do we get our ideas about law? What do we mean when we say &#8220;law&#8221;? What counts as law? How does culture influence law, and law, culture? And to what degree must history condition any answers we might be tempted to give? Students in the course will study works in a range of genres (novels, plays, poems, judicial opinions, pamphlets) and develop methods for investigating ways that law and culture have been made by one another from the 16th-century to the present. Readings will include influential theoretical accounts of law (Aristotle, Hobbes, Kant, E.P. Thompson, Habermas, Hart, Derrida, MacKinnon) and canonical texts in &#8220;Law and Literature,&#8221; such as Shakespeare&#8217;s Measure for Measure.  As a counterpoint to the fiercely ahistorical &#8220;law and economics&#8221; movement, however, the course will put special emphasis on rooting intersections of law and culture in rich historical context, considering both local and international legal contexts (sometimes in highly technical detail) alongside so-called &#8220;ephemera&#8221; of culture. Students will tackle the especially fruitful &#8220;case&#8221; of Renaissance Britain before developing their own final research projects, whether on the Renaissance or another period of their choosing. (See dept. for full description)', '76-101', None), '76-100': Course('Reading and Writing for an Academic Context', '76-100', 9, "76-100 is an academic reading and writing course for multilingual students, especially those who are not native speakers of English or who consider English to be their weaker language.  The course, designed as a prerequisite for 76-101, emphasizes reading comprehension strategies for reading a variety of text types in English (e.g., journalism, textbook selections, popular press arguments, and academic journal articles).  Throughout the semester, students use these sources to write summaries and short position papers. The course introduces students to readers' expectations for North American rhetorical style at the sentence, paragraph, and whole text or genre levels.  Within the course we discuss explicit genre and linguistic norms for writing in academic English so that writers can connect with their readers.  Students who take this course qualify through an online placement test that is administered through the university prior to the fall semester. (All sections are offered MWF).  Each 76-100 course is structured by the reading and writing objectives of the course as well as a vocabulary for writing in English, but some courses present different themes (or content) in their readings.", '', None), '76-349': Course('Lost Generation', '76-349', 9, 'Before the Beat Generation there was the Lost Generation. Both moments of literary history have an important relevance for our time, and both produced many major literary works. The 20s, like the 50s and 60s, were marked by the effects of World War. Gertrude Stein seems to have started the whole generation naming fad with her comment to Hemingway, "You are the lost generation." Paul Fussell identifies the cultural effect of WWI as the production of \'irony\' as the central quality of modern identity (Some Beat writers make a similar claim for the effects of WWII). This class is neither a prequel nor a sequel to the Beat writers class; it is related in theme but focused on different writers and texts. Students might consider taking this class as a point of entry to \'The Beat,\' or might consider this class as a follow-on to \'The Beat\' in order to understand more fully some of the central literary and historical issues of our time. In both cases we focus on the intersection between cultural change and major war. The Lost Generation class might include, for example, work by Stein, Hemingway, W.B. Yeats, Ezra Pound, T.S. Eliot, the major War Poets, F. Scott Fitzgerald, Robert Graves, Vera Brittain, and Evelyn Waugh.', '76-101', None), '76-457': Course('Topics in Rhetoric', '76-457', 9, 'In this unsettled age, when large portions of the earth&#8217;s surface are being ravaged by industrialism, when on several continents indigenous peoples are being forcibly uprooted&#8221;, when philosophers and poets (and even the odd sociologist or two) are asserting that attachments to geographical localities contribute fundamentally to the formation of personal and social identities, when new forms of &#8216;environmental awareness&#8217; are being more radically charted and urgently advocated than ever in the past&#8221;it is unfortunate that [we] seldom study what people make of places.  (Keith H. Basso, &#8220;Wisdom Sits in Places&#8221;)  It is sometimes claimed that place is no longer important in human life, now that we spend more and more time in virtual spaces and participate more and more in global economic and social networks. In this course we will test this claim, first by reading and discussing theories of place and space from critical theory and cultural geography, and then by reading about and carrying out case studies exploring intersections between discourse (talk and writing) and place. Our methods will include bibliographic and archival research, discourse analysis, and ethnographic techniques. Students&#8217; projects will draw on your professional and scholarly interests and expertise, and the places and discourse practices you study can range from the local (a workplace, for example) to the global (the internet, for example). My project, and our first case study, explores the changing (but persistent) roles of regional US dialects in the formation and use of identities.', '76-101', None), '76-345': Course('Renaissance Studies', '76-345', 9, 'In the age of Shakespeare and Milton (the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries), poetry, international politics, and theology were far more intertwined than they are today. While dedicated primarily to poetry, this course will investigate the implications of this intertwining in practice. Seeking to do justice to the true interdisciplinarity of Renaissance poetry, the course supposes that poetry and verse technique mattered so much in the period due to questions spanning art, politics, and theology of how power (verbal power, divine power, political power) should be represented. Biographically, many canonical poets we\'ll study in the course worked as ambassadors, representing power abroad (Wyatt, Sidney, Donne, Marvell). Many more poets including Shakespeare and Milton thematized diplomacy, in both its divine and more worldly forms ("angel," in fact, means "messenger"). Poetry too was seen in similar terms. As Coleridge would later write, poems were "the envoys or representatives of&#8221;vital passion." Readings including Shakespeare\'s Hamlet, Milton\'s Paradise Lost, and John Donne\'s "The Ecstasy" will be introduced and contextualized through writers such as Pseudo-Dionysius, John Calvin, Thomas Hobbes, Alberico Gentili, and George Puttenham. Topics to be considered will include historical poetics, divinity, sovereignty, immunity, license, fidelity, craft, and accommodation. Assignments and class discussions will be occasions to practice historically-informed criticism; to compare conceptual structures within seemingly distinct domains of history and thought; and to articulate major fissures and changes in Renaissance angelology, diplomatic practice, and literary craft.', '76-101', None), '76-344': Course('Studies in Print Culture', '76-344', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Fall 2012: Censorship? Banned books? Book burnings? Could it happen here? In 20th-century America some of the most important films and books were banned, censored, produced in other countries, or written under an alias. But artists don't like to be silenced, and many of them found ways to tell their stories, regardless of the consequences. In this course we will examine three kinds of censorship: political censorship, racial censorship, and censorship based on sex/sexuality. We will read texts such as Kate Chopin's The Awakening, John Steinbeck's The Grapes of Wrath (and film), J.D. Salinger's The Catcher in the Rye, Harper Lee's To Kill a Mockingbird (and film), Kurt Vonnegut's Slaughterhouse Five, Toni Morrison's Beloved (and film), Richard Wright's Native Son, and Truman Capote's In Cold Blood (and film). We will also celebrate the American Library Association's banned book week, which is September 30th to October 6th.", '76-101', None), '76-347': Course('American Literary and Cultural Studies: Comtemporary Fiction', '76-347', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the Department each semester for current offerings. Example, Fall 2011: This course will survey recent American fiction, roughly from 1980 to the present. Many critics have defined the previous era as &#8220;postmodern,&#8221; but no one quite knows what to call this contemporary period, so one purpose of the course will be to define it. We will read stories and novels by writers beginning with the &#8220;minimalism&#8221; of Raymond Carver, reading up to current work by Junot Diaz and Cormac McCarthy.', '76-101', None), '76-346': Course('Renaissance Studies', '76-346', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Fall 2010: The starting point for this course is a question at the nexus of theology, politics, and art that no less central to the age of Shakespeare and Milton than it is today: how should power be represented? Biographically, many canonical poets of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries worked as ambassadors, representing power abroad (Wyatt, Sidney, Donne, Marvell). Many more poets including Shakespeare and Milton thematized diplomacy, in both its divine and more worldly forms. What, then, can structures of mediation like diplomacy and angelic intervention tell us about works like Sidney's sonnet sequence Astrophil and Stella, Shakespeare's Hamlet, or Milton's Paradise Lost? And what can Renaissance poetry tell us about topics such as sovereignty, immunity, license, fidelity, automation, and accommodation? The course will include introductory and contextual readings from Genesis, Pseudo-Dionysius, John Calvin, Thomas Hobbes, Alberico Gentili, and George Puttenham. Assignments and class discussions will be occasions to practice historically-informed criticism; to compare conceptual structures within seemingly distinct domains of history and thought; and to articulate major fissures and changes in Renaissance angelology, diplomatic practice, and literary craft.", '76-101', None), '76-341': Course('Advanced Gender Studies', '76-341', 9, 'This course will examine, through cultural, historical, and theoretical case studies, the concept of &#8220;trans&#8221; as a crossing of boundaries between gendered and sexed identities.  In many different cultures and historical periods, individuals have eluded the policing of these boundaries as &#8220;passing&#8221; women or men, only to be discovered, often only through illness or death, as biologically the opposite of their &#8220;passing&#8221; gender.  Others, such as hermaphrodites and postmodern transsexuals like Sandy Stone, have chosen to &#8220;come out&#8221; as gender indeterminate, neither unambiguously male nor female.  What are we to make of these transgender phenomena and what is their impact on how we understand gender and sexual identity?  We will be looking at records of &#8220;real world&#8221; case studies, but also at trans as it is imagined in memoir and fiction, and as a powerful theoretical concept in the field of queer studies.', '76-101', None), '76-340': Course('Topics in Rhetoric', '76-340', 9, 'Ever since the development of radio in the early 20th century, Americans have expected that we would soon all talk alike. The conviction that the media would make us all sound the same revived with the widespread adoption of television, starting in the 1940s, and the development of the internet in the 1990s led to worry about how soon we&#8217;d all be writing the same. But fears of the homogenizing effects of the mass media on American English have proven to be exaggerated: Americans still talk and write in many different ways. In this course we explore why this should be. Why don&#8217;t we all speak alike? Why do we need variation in language? We will explore how regional and social dialects and varieties come to be and what their functions are, and you will learn how to hear, see, and describe varieties of language. We will also touch on American languages other than English. Documentary films and online materials about language will be the basis for another strand of the course, as we work together to explore how linguistic variety can best be represented and explained in non-technical ways, and in a variety of media, for the general public. Reading will be mainly in two books: American English, by Walt Wolfram and Natalie Schilling-Estes (2nd. edition), and Language in the USA: Themes for the Twenty-First Century, edited by Edward Finegan and John R. Rickford. There will be regular homework assignments, a midterm exam, and a final project.', '76-101', None), '76-271': Course('Introduction to Professional and Technical Writing', '76-271', 9, 'Documents that are labeled professional and technical are woven into the activities they support.  People do things with these documents: choose health plans, refinish furniture, construct websites, identify flowers, operate nuclear reactors, donate to political campaigns, learn chemistry, hire employees, etc. They read and use these documents on the phone, in a cab, in the back yard, in business class before the flight leaves the runway, in the desert. They use them in leisurely comfort, in well-worn desk chairs, and under severe time constraints on the factory floor. : The primary challenge of a professional writing task is to create a document that someone can read and use easily. That is why courses like this fall under the purview of rhetoric: rhetoric is a discipline that has long been concerned with the crafting of discourse that translates into action. Not incidentally, it foregrounds audiences and situations in the crafting of such discourses. In order to create documents that work, writers must know as much as possible about the audience, the purpose of the document, and the social and physical environment in which it will be read and used. In this class, you will develop an approach to writing professional documents; you will learn to construct knowledge about and analyze an audience, a purpose, and a context, to transform that analysis into a plan for creating a document that does what you want it to do, and to execute, evaluate and revise that document. : What about genres? Recurrent situations lead to recurrent document features&#8212;consider this syllabus, for instance. Carolyn Miller (1984) proposed in a landmark article that &#8220;genres are typified rhetorical actions based in recurrent situations,&#8221; and that a genre&#8217;s formal features arise out of the features of the situation it is linked to.  Please see English Dept. for full course description.', '76-101', None), '76-270': Course('Writing for the Professions', '76-270', 9, 'Writing in the Professions is a writing course specifically designed for juniors and seniors in all majors other than English. The course is appropriate for upper-level students in all CMU colleges, has no writing prerequisites, and assumes that you may not have had much college-level writing instruction past your freshman year. The basic idea of the course is to give you experience in developing the writing skills you will be expected to have as you make the transition from student to professional. The course will cover resume writing, proposal writing, writing instructions, the difference between writing for general and specific audiences, and analysis of visual aids in various texts. The course requires that students work both independently and in groups.', '76-101', None), '76-273': Course('Presenting a Public Self', '76-273', 9, 'Presenting your work and ambitions in public forums is a skill that you will be expected to demonstrate as you emerge from undergraduate studies and prepare to enter the commercial sector, graduate-level academic work or professional education in business, medicine or law. While such expectations exist, practice in this genre of writing, particularly in the personal statement, is not always readily available in existing coursework. &#8220;Presenting a Public Self&#8221; will introduce methods for developing and practicing your ability to communicate individual proficiencies and aspirations in written form, while bringing you in contact with a body of published work by public intellectual figures from the U.S. and other territories whose writing demonstrates an intertwining of personal narrative and public, professional identity, to engage readers of all stripes.  Throughout the term you will practice writing in the public yet personal vein through assignments like: self-portrait essay, to cultivate a first-person voice, an op-ed essay, to practice balance in argument from the position of a burgeoning expert in your disciplinary area, and a personal statement, where you will learn to combine articulation of a personal narrative and professional competency to argue why you are a strong candidate for a particular opportunity. Reading selections for the semester will include work produced by your peers, as well as published writers whose work combines personal and professional spheres, ranging from texts like Paul John Eakin&#8217;s Living Autobiographically to Mary Catherine Bateson&#8217;s Composing a Life to Spencer Nadler&#8217;s The Language of Cells: A Doctor and his Patients, amongst others.', '76-101', None), '76-272': Course('Language in Design', '76-272', 9, 'Language in design is a professional communications course for designers. During your career as a designer, you will be expected to produce written documents to supplement and accompany your design processes and solutions. In this course, you will learn the conventions associated with the types of writing that designers most often have to produce on the job, such as proposals, memos, and reports. Additionally, you will prepare a job packet (including a resume, a cover letter, and a portfolio) that you can use as you begin your job search. You will also refine your ability to talk about your projects to both expert and non-expert audiences. Ultimately, this course aims to prepare you for the professional communications situations that you will encounter in your design career.', '', None), '76-276': Course('Genre Studies', '76-276', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Fall 2012: Poe defined the short story as something that could be read at one sitting. While simple enough, the definition suggests a concern with concentrated form and unified artistic effect. in a sense, the short story has been around as long as people have been telling each other tales, to be sure, but as a literary form it came into its own in modern times, during the 19th century and it continues to be produced in considerable numbers. For many readers one of the great features is the one Poe pointed to: it is short. People who have never finished a novel by Henry James must be legion. So we can experience something with genuine literary merit, in an accessible form. Concentration, of course, can bring issues of comprehension and often short stories can seem puzzling or incomplete to the average reader. This class will attempt to develop our abilities to read with care and attention&#8212;and feeling&#8212;in order to make us better readers of any artistic text. The challenges of the short form turn out to be excellent opportunities for learning a lot, in a little space. We&#8217;ll make use of several inexpensive anthologies, and look at one or two central writers (Hemingway, for example) in more depth. The class will require the writing of a few short papers, engaging in online discussions on Blackboard, and three in class tests.', '76-101', None), '76-378': Course('Literacy: Educational Theory and Community Practice', '76-378', 9, 'Literacy has been called the engine of economic development, the road to social advancement, and the prerequisite for critical abstract thought. But is it? And what should count as literacy: using the discourse of an educated elite or laying down a rap? Competing theories of what counts as "literacy" - and how to each it - shape educational policy and workplace training. However, they may ignore some remarkable ways literacy is also used by people in non-elite communities to speak and act for themselves. In this introduction to the interdisciplinary study of literacy - its history, theory, and problems - we will first explore competing theories of what literacy allows you to do, how people learn to carry off different literate practices, and what schools should teach. Then we will turn ideas into action in a hands-on, community literacy project, helping urban students use writing to take literate action for themselves.  As mentors, we meet on campus for 8 weeks with teenagers from Pittsburgh\'s inner city neighborhoods who are working on the challenging transition from school to work. They earn the opportunity to come to CMU as part of Start On Success (SOS), an innovative internship that helps urban teenagers with hidden learning disabilities negotiate the new demands of work or college. (See Department for full description.)', '76-101', None), '76-469': Course('Advanced Screenwriting Workshop', '76-469', 9, 'This semester will begin with a review of the fundamentals of screenwriting, including character development, scene construction, dialogue, and story structure. Student work will include exercises that encourage writers to take creative risks with genre, tone, character, and structure, one collaborative project, and two short scripts. We will also view mainstream, personal, and experimental narrative films in both American and international cinema.', '76-269', None), '76-464': Course('Creative Nonfiction Workshop', '76-464', 9, 'This is an advanced writing course that has been specifically designed for the student who wishes to polish and practice the skills of prose writing while pursuing the intellectual challenge of this particular form, the personal essay. Professional writing majors were particularly considered as &#8220;clients&#8221; for this course. The form of the personal essay did not exist until Michel Montaigne &#8220;accidentally&#8221; invented it in the 16th Century. His speculative musings, observations of nature and, especially, himself came together to make a unique genre which engages any topic while the actual subject of the essay is the essayist&#8217;s mind, his or her thinking the subject through. To try to explore one&#8217;s mind on a particular question has become a favorite activity of writers ever since &#8211; all the way down to Emma Bombeck and Russell Baker. Essays by Montaigne will be read to see how he puts his thoughts together; was it a casual endeavor or a self-conscious craft? For us, the second method. Then, we will turn to more contemporary practitioners to study and enjoy their variations on the model. Meanwhile, students will put their writing skills to the test of this seemingly informal and arbitrary form. Some students will, at first, find it difficult not to make a point, not &#8220;to stick to the subject&#8221; the object here is to engage the full range of the mind&#8217;s capacity for speculation and observation, recall and realignment of opinions and information. And, the results of this self-inquiry expressed in disciplined, lively prose. Student essays will be work shopped in class. All papers are to be distributed to class members for a review via e-mail prior to their discussion in class. Schedules and deadlines are to be worked out between instructor and student. Please see English Dept. for full course description.', '76-260 or 76-262 or 76-365 or 76-460 or 76-265', None), '76-465': Course('Advanced Poetry Workshop', '76-465', 9, 'This workshop will primarily involve discussions of the poems produced by class members. Grades will be determined by the following:  - Regular attendance and workshop participation via blackboard and coursework. - Three essays on the selected poems of various contemporary poets. - A final poetry manuscript which includes a substantial number of revised poems.', '76-365', None), '76-372': Course('Topics in Journalism', '76-372', 9, "In this introductory class, taught by a working journalist, students will learn the fundamental skills of reporting, writing and copy editing. We'll start with the basics - judging newsworthiness, conducting research and interviews, then organizing the information into a concise, clear, accurate and interesting news story. Because the key to learning to write effectively is to practice the necessary skills, class emphasis - and much of your grade - will be based on seven writing assignments involving current events and covering various types of news writing. Through readings, assignments and class discussion, we'll tackle questions such as: What makes a story newsworthy? How does a reporter decide which points to emphasize? What are effective techniques for a successful interview? How does a journalist turn pages of scribbled notes into a coherent news story? : We'll do a lot of writing, but we'll also examine issues and trends affecting journalism today. We'll cover at least two live events and hear from local professionals about working in print, broadcast and public relations. We'll also look at how newer mediums - such as blogs, the internet, and cable news - shape and influence news reporting.", '76-101', None), '76-373': Course('Topics in Rhetoric: Argument', '76-373', 9, 'This course is an introduction to the theory and practice of argument. The session begins with an overview of major theories of (and approaches to) argument, along with short assignments to critically assess their value and relevance to the types of argument about which you, the student, are encouraged to investigate. You will choose a type or genre of argument upon which to focus your research. The argument type can be academic, practical, professional, and so forth, so long as it is understandable using terms and concepts covered by the course. During the second part of the session we will refine our understanding of argument, and you will develop your own approach to argument analysis. The last third of the session will be devoted to producing an original argument of the type you are researching.', '76-101', None), '76-460': Course('Beginning Fiction Workshop', '76-460', 9, 'Good writers know how to do two very different things equally well - write like a writer and think like one. Writing like a writer is about craft and means gaining absolute control over your material and your tools. It means, for instance, knowing when to use dialogue, when to summarize discourse, it means concentrating on the specific rather than the vague and abstract. It means anchoring your story in a particular time and place, and finding a narrative voice that best tells your particular story. Students will have a story due every week for the first half of the semester. We will workshop several of these stories concentrating our editorial comments on story, development, character, and voice. Your time after mid-semester will be devoted to rewriting and reworking these drafts into accomplished works.', '76-260', None), '76-375': Course('Magazine Writing', '76-375', 9, 'In this course, we will read substantial, ambitious articles from a variety of magazines, considering their appeal to wide audiences. Students will write their own magazine articles, working with both their own autobiography and subjects they engage as field researchers. We will also be considering on-line, oral narratives, as a way to expand the concept of what a &#8220;magazine&#8221; is, and students will have the opportunity to create narratives for oral presentation. In this course, you should expect to develop your ability to create a good narrative, to gain experience in the field as interviewer and observer of the world, to become a better editor of your own work and the work of others, and to learn about aspects of culture from a wide variety of contemporary magazine writers. The class is run as a discussion with emphasis on student participation.', '76-262 or 76-260 or 76-271 or 76-372 or 76-272 or 76-270', None), '76-462': Course('Advanced Fiction Workshop', '76-462', 9, 'This course will build on your work in the Survey of Forms: Fiction and Beginning Fiction Workshop courses, stressing a mastery of fiction techniques, along with the development of individual style. We will alternate critiques of student stories with analysis of published work from a range of short storywriters. Minimum of 35 finished pages of original fiction required, along with substantial revision.', '76-460', None), '76-377': Course('Rhetoric of Fiction', '76-377', 9, "Wayne Booth's book, The Rhetoric of Fiction, is one of the classic discussions of the ways in which fiction communicates, moves, or motivates us. It is a commonplace to assume that literature has a message, but it is still not at all clear just how an imaginative representation of the world does, or can, communicate. Booth had particular difficulty understanding how fiction could communicate a felt sense of life and value when there was doubt about narrative authority, or the 'reliability' of the author. So, postmodern fiction (from Joyce on) caused him problems. In an attempt to develop a postmodern rhetoric of fiction we shall be looking at texts that deal directly with issues of persuasion, or texts that seem directly to address the reader. Of particular interest will be texts that indirectly implicate the reader, and achieve a kind of implicit rhetoric even when they apparently frustrate normal expectations of communicative language (e.g. the apparent fact that the reader is also a character in Calvino's 'novel' if on a winters' night&#8221;). We'll consider the kinds of problems (and solutions to those problems) caused by excessive irony, by 'showing' rather than 'telling' and by the 'absent author,' in texts like Madame Bovary, Notes From Underground, Portrait of the Artist as a Young Man, etc.", '76-101', None), '76-385': Course('Introduction to Discourse Analysis', '76-385', 9, 'Discourse analysis places a primary focus on how things are said; and this close attention to the details of "language in use" can offer insight into a variety of questions posed by researchers across the humanities and social sciences. In this course, we will examine the way discourse is itself a form of social action that plays a fundamental role in organizing social, cultural, and political life. In addition to becoming familiar with a variety of approaches and topics in the study of discourse, a major aim of the course is for you to develop the tools and skills needed to analyze actual discourse data. This will involve learning how to read transcripts and transcribe data at different levels of detail, learning how to ask questions about the data based on different analytic interests, and developing a vocabulary of scholarly terms and concepts that will allow you to comment on discourse features as you formulate interesting and persuasive claims. The first part of the course will involve assignments with shared data to develop fundamental skills. In addition, seminar participants will be responsible for selecting pieces of discourse for mini data sessions throughout the semester. For the final assignment, you will choose and analyze a piece of spoken or written discourse of interest to you. In the end, you should come away from the course with an ability to think critically about the way discourse operates in the world.', '76-101', None), '76-390': Course('Style', '76-390', 9, 'In classical rhetoric, "style" is a term that refers not to what we write but how we write. Yet considerations about how we write - coherence, emphasis, concision, shape, diction, and elegance - can never be fully separated from an understanding of what, why, and for whom we are writing. Ideally, then, far from being an exercise in expressing personal idiosyncrasies, revising style means understanding a set of strategic choices and always weighing these choices in relation to questions such as, "Who is my audience?" and "What is my purpose?" This course will have two main objectives: (1) to help you develop a repertoire of stylistic options and a critical vocabulary for discussing those options, and (2) to give you the opportunity to put this knowledge into practice when revising your own writing and the writing of others. Two recurring questions for us will be the following: if style depends on both the rhetorical situation of a text and knowledge of specific guidelines, how can we ever say that we have achieved "good" style? Should stylistic rules or practical experience carry more weight in the decisions we make as writers?', '76-101', None), '76-391': Course('Document Design', '76-391', 12, 'Today, many professionals are responsible for the visual design of documents. This course provides students who have already learned the foundation of written communication with an opportunity to develop the ability to analyze and create visual-verbal synergy in printed documents. Students will be introduced to the basic concepts and vocabulary, as well as the practical issues of visual communication design through a series of hands-on projects in various rhetorical situations. Assigned readings will complement the projects in exploring document design from historical, theoretical, and technological perspectives. Class discussions and critiquing are an essential part of this course. Adobe Creative Studio (InDesign, Photoshop, Illustrator) will be taught in class, and used to create the assigned projects.', '76-270 or 76-271', None), '76-396': Course('Non-Profit Advocacy', '76-396', 9, 'Given the changes brought on by the information age, non-profit organizations, like all organizations, face an increasing diversity of audiences and media choices. What hasn&#8217;t changed is the need for effective arguments (print and digital) that respond to both the rhetorical situations at hand and the ongoing needs of a specific organization. In this course, designed for students pursuing careers in professional communication, we&#8217;ll examine the critically important practices of argument and advocacy. And while our central focus will be on non-profits, the arts, education, political advocacy and social causes, the techniques we&#8217;ll learn are also broadly applicable to communications careers in all sectors. Our main focus will be on how professional communicators design arguments and make media choices consistent with the &#8220;voice&#8221; of their organizations. Among other questions, we will ask, how can we adapt the genres of mass communication to meet our organization&#8217;s goals? What roles can social media play in non-profit advocacy, and how are those roles changing? How can we have impact while working with limited budgets? The end result will be a professional portfolio that demonstrates both relevant skills and a high-level theoretical understanding of what makes a public argument successful. Students will also gain experience in translating their technical expertise into language that potential employers understand and look for.', '76-372 or 76-373 or 76-271 or 76-270 or 76-272', None), '76-397': Course('Major Works of Modern Fiction', '76-397', 9, "This course focuses on the planning, writing, and evaluating of instruction of various kinds, especially instructional texts. It is particularly appropriate for professional and technical writers, but also a good option for anyone interested in fields that involve substantial instruction, such as teaching or employee training. In the first part of the course, we'll examine the recent history of instructional design and the major current theories. Then we'll take a step back and study the concepts of learning upon which these theories are based, with particular attention to their implications for how instruction is structured. You'll find that different learners (e.g., children, older adults) and goals (e.g., learning concepts and principles, learning to apply principles to solve novel problems, learning a procedure, learning to change one's behavior, etc.) require different types of instruction. In the second part of the course, we'll look in detail at models of how people learn from texts and what features (e.g., advanced organizers, examples, metaphors, illustrations, multimedia) enhance learning under what circumstances. We will study and analyze particular types of texts. Some possible examples include an introduction to the concept of gravity; a tutorial for computer software; a self-paced unit in French; adult educational materials in health care; a workshop on sexual harassment in the workplace; or a unit to train someone how to moderate a discussion. We will also look at various methods (concept mapping, think-aloud, comprehension tests, etc.) that are used to plan and evaluate instructional text. You will do a project, either individually or in a small group (2-3), in which you design, write and evaluate instruction.", '76-271 or 76-272 or 76-270', None), '76-394': Course('Research in English', '76-394', 9, 'In this course we will explore methods of researching, writing, and presenting original work in English Studies.  The field of English Studies is profoundly interdisciplinary. We will strive to understand not just traditionally used methods (such as text analysis), but also more recent developments borrowed from other disciplines (such as history and sociology, anthropology, and visual studies). We will cover methods for developing topics, constructing research plans, finding and using scholarly sources and conducting field research, organizing, writing, revising, and presenting a research paper of 20-25 pages.  Students will also learn how to situate their work in the context of scholarly conversation, by testing their hypotheses against alternative and presenting their research to audiences in the field of English studies. Throughout the semester, students will develop and work on an original research project. At the end of the semester, students will give a public presentation of their research to other students and English faculty.', '76-294', None), '76-395': Course('Science Writing', '76-395', 9, "This course will teach students how to write clear, well-organized, compelling articles about science, technology and health topics for a general audience. Students will learn how to conduct research on scientific topics using primary and secondary sources, how to conduct interviews, and how to organize that information in a logical fashion for presentation. For writing majors, the course will increase their understanding of scientific research and how to describe it accurately and completely to a general audience. For science majors, this course will teach them how to craft fluid, powerful prose so that they can bring their disciplines to life. The course is not intended just for those who want to become science journalists, but for anyone who may have the need to explain technical information to a general audience, whether it is an engineer describing a green building project at a public hearing, a doctor describing the latest research on a disease to a patient advocacy group, or a computer programmer describing new software to his firm's marketing staff. Students will get a chance to read several examples of top-notch science writing and interview researchers, but the primary emphasis will be on writing a series of articles - and rewriting them after they've been edited. The articles will range from profiles of scientists to explanations of how something works to explorations of controversies in science. Students should expect to see their writing critiqued in class from time to time, in a process similar to what journalists routinely go through. The goal will be clarity and verve; the ethos will be mutual learning and enjoyment.", '76-472 or 76-271 or 76-375 or 76-372 or 76-270', None), '76-486': Course('Argument Theory', '76-486', 9, 'The difficult part in an argument is not to defend one\'s opinion, but rather to know it." &#8212; Andre Maurois This seminar will be an in-depth exploration of theories of argument and assumes some prior knowledge or coursework in argumentation such as acquired in 76-373/773. As the above quote from Maurois suggests, we will take a broad view of the concept of "argument" and examine its role as a discursive means of truth seeking, knowledge creation, and decision-making, not just as the practice of using language to justify or refute a conclusion. The goal of the seminar is for participants to acquire the concepts needed to read the current research/scholarship on argumentation with understanding, to apply that research to the analysis of arguments, and to be positioned to contribute to that research. We will begin with a brief history of the classical Greek writings on logic, rhetoric and dialectic, especially the writings of Aristotle. There are questions from that tradition that endure to this day: What does it take for a conclusion to be well supported? What criteria should be govern acceptance of a conclusion? We will also examine two landmarks in the contemporary study of argumentation, Perelman and Olbrects-Tyteca\'s The New Rhetoric and Toulmin\'s The Uses of Arguments, both published in 1958. These works can be seen as taking the first steps toward studying argumentation functionally, as a linguistic activity that occurs in contexts. We will also look at theories of acquisition of argumentation skill and implications for pedagogical practice. We will then move to current questions in argument theory such as the relation between formal and informal logic, argument quality and cultural difference, and so forth. Along the way we will ask questions such as, "What should a theory of argumentation do?" (See Department for full description.)', '76-101', None), '76-487': Course('Web Design', '76-487', 9, "As the Internet has increasingly become an integral part of professional and technical communication in all organizations, writers entering the workplace are expected to have a broad range of web design skills to complement their expertise in writing and design for print. Thus, we've designed this course to help writers learn the broad range of skills needed to develop communication materials that are tailored for the web. In particular, the course focuses on the planning, design, and testing of the visual and verbal content typical of contemporary websites. As a member of the class, you&#8217;ll participate in a guided, semester-long web design project, which is scaffolded with a series of group and individual assignments. The project begins with an introduction to user-centered methods for understanding the audience (users), where you will learn and practice foundational user-centered design methods through readings and a series of hands on exercises, including interviews, and observation of actual users. You will also learn theories and methods for developing effective information architecture, including organizational schemes, navigational design, labeling, form design, and visual design. Working in groups with other students, you will, over the course of the semester, develop a prototype of a small website, which will be evaluated through user testing at the end of the semester. While we focus primarily on the activities described above, we&#8217;ll also discuss sound and animation, emerging technologies such as Web 2.0 and Mobile Web, and social media.", '(76-272 or 76-271 or 76-270) and (51-261 or 76-382 or 76-391 or 51-262', '76-488'), '76-482': Course('Comparative Rhetoric', '76-482', 9, 'This course serves a two-fold purpose. It attempts (1) to address the theoretical and methodological issues in cross-/inter-cultural communication from a rhetorical point of view and (2) to examine critically the way comparative studies of different rhetorical traditions/systems are currently conducted.  In particular, it is concerned with the rhetorical problems we encounter in trying to write, argue, and persuade across languages and cultures. And it aims to take a close look at the need for rhetoric to rethink its own identity, purpose, formation and agenda in an increasingly multicultural and globalized world.', '', None), '76-413': Course('19th Century British Literay and Cultural Studies', '76-413', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Fall 2010: In the early decades of the twentieth century, Irish and British writers transformed literary representation, abandoning the certainty of Realism to delve into representations of the human subconscious resulting in fractured narratives in keeping with the uncertainty of that historically pivotal time. As conceptions of national identity were called into question with traumas associated with the First World War, Modernist writers attended to the tensions between wholeness and disintegration in the individual and in collective bodies. In Irish and British Modernism we will explore the tensions between illusions of a whole associated with political movements like nationalism and fascism and the disorienting though sometimes liberating forces of disintegration that surfaced in the essays, poetry, plays, novels and short stories of four Modernist writers: James Joyce, Virginia Woolf, William Butler Yeats and T.S. Eliot. American Modernism will be offered in the spring, which will build off elements of this initial introduction to Irish and British Modernism. Requirements for this course will include active participation in class conversations, bi-weekly response papers and a fifteen to twenty page research paper.', '76-101', None), '76-481': Course('Writing for Multimedia', '76-481', 12, 'This course will focus on the global film and media industry from the late 1960s to our present. We will be motivated by two questions: what is a blockbuster and how has this concept changed as media has changed over the last forty years?  When Steven Spielberg&#8217;s Jaws was released in 1975 it radically changed the global distribution and marketing of film.  Spielberg&#8217;s film - like many cinematic blockbusters after it - was a mix of transgressive cinematic genres, advanced filmmaking techniques, classical Hollywood narrative and form. While this class is focused on &#8220;national&#8221; medias our approach to the blockbuster will attend to this aforementioned mix, which is the product of transnational and transhistorical economic and aesthetic forces. To that end the class will start with New Hollywood films such as Bonnie and Clyde and blockbuster television events like Roots. We will later move to blockbusters that come from other "national" film traditions such as Luc Besson\'s The Fifth Element, Bong Joon-ho\'s The Host and Rajkumar Hirani\'s 3 Idiots.  While the intellectual foundations of this course are in the film industry we will also look at how the blockbuster concept has migrated to interactive entertainment (video games), sports telecasts, the music industry and the Internet.', '(76-270 or 76-271) and (76-391 or 51-261 or 51-262)', None), '76-412': Course('18th Century Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-412', 9, 'This course approaches a range of literary texts performed and/or published between 1660 and 1800 through the lens of feminist, queer, and performance theories.  At least a quarter of our course readings will therefore ground us in these 3 theoretical approaches, while another quarter will be comprised of secondary criticism and history that will guide us in putting that theory in dialogue with this often perversely fascinating period of transition into modernity.  The balance of readings will be fiction and nonfiction prose and plays of the period, carefully selected for significance to the cultural history of gender and sexuality.  We will be looking at a small selection of canonical novels and plays, but we will also make room for some texts that, while well-known and important in the 18th century, have dropped out of sight in bookstores and theaters of today.', '76-101', None), '76-488': Course('Web Design Lab', '76-488', 3, 'Lab exercises for Web Design include the following: basic HTML, images, tables, animation, image maps, interactive forms, Web interfaces to databases, and basic Javascripting. All students must do the lab exercises. The exercises are designed so that those students who already know particular topics (e.g., basic HTML) do not need to attend the lab session. Students who would like guided practice in doing the lab exercises must attend the lab session. Lab sessions take place in a computer cluster.', '(76-271 or 76-270 or 76-379) and (76-383 or 76-382 or 76-391)', None), '76-367': Course('Genre Studies', '76-367', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Fall 2013: The early part of the 20th century is often compared to the Renaissance as a time of massive literary innovation and production. This class will focus on a few novels by writers at the center of the invention of the modern literary world. Our goal will be to sharpen our reading skills and our understanding of a variety of experimental techniques in the novel. Henry James is often thought to be the source of modern ideas about fiction writing and was a powerful influence on all significant writers who followed him. D.H. Lawrence was a passionate critic of traditional novel forms, seeking a form more appropriate to the experiences of modern life. With his collaborator Ford Madox Ford, Joseph Conrad developed the technique known as impressionism, a style intended above all, as he said, to make us see. He is known for the complexity of his narratives and his formal experiments. James Joyce is regarded as having perfected all of the formal possibilities of the novel, effectively exhausting the form. The reading list will include books of this sort: Henry James: The Bostonians, Joseph Conrad: Lord Jim:, D.H. Lawrence Lady Chatterley&#8217;s Lover, James Joyce: Ulysses, Virginia Woolf: To The Lighthouse (not the actual list, but like that).', '76-101', None), '76-365': Course('Beginning Poetry Workshop', '76-365', 9, 'In this course, you will be expected to take your knowledge of the principles and elements of poetry learned in the Survey of Forms: Poetry course and utilize them in workshop discussions, written analysis, and the composition of your own poems. In addition, readings of books by other poets will be required, along with participation in a book-making project.', '76-265', None), '76-364': Course('Readings in Forms: Fictions', '76-364', 9, "The Hero&#8217;s Journey is a pattern of narrative identified by the American scholar Joseph Campbell that appears in drama, storytelling, myth, religious ritual, and psychological development.  It describes the typical adventure of the archetype known as The Hero, the person who goes out and achieves great deeds on behalf of the group, tribe, or civilization. Since the publication of his book, The Hero with a Thousand Faces, Campbell's theory has been consciously applied by a wide variety of modern writers and artists. The best known is perhaps George Lucas, who has acknowledged a debt to Campbell regarding the stories of the Star Wars films. : This is a reading course in narrative and narrative structure.  We will study a variety of narratives in different media &#8211;film, fiction, and non-fiction using Cambell&#8217;s work as a touchstone for further exploration.", '76-101', None), '76-363': Course('Reading in Forms: Poetry', '76-363', 9, 'Spring 2013: The Poet in America: selected readings in Bradstreet, Emerson, Poe, Whitman, Dickinson, Frost, Stevens, Lowell, and Williams; concluding with a consideration of Berryman\'s "Homage to Mistress Bradstreet." Particular attention will be paid to the poet\'s conception of his or her own role and of the sources and function of poetry.  Fall 2012: This course will examine the role music plays as a theme and structural device in contemporary American poetry. The course will explore collections about musicians as well as collections written by musicians in genres that incude Blues, Jazz, Rock and Hiphop. Since class will be structured primarily around presentations, considered discussions and poetic responses, students should already be familiar with the major principles of poetry and be able to utilize them accordingly.', '76-101', None), '76-362': Course('Reading in Forms: Nonfiction', '76-362', 9, 'Here is a list of some of the books that have affected our civilization and which, as writers, we should read; even emulate. They are examples of important nonfiction. No particular order of reading them yet, but you have the summer to get acquainted: Silent Spring by Rachel Carson, The Rights of Man by Thomas Paine, Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee by Dee Alexander Brown, Speak Memory by Valdimir Nabokov, Goodbye to All That by Robert Graves, The Female Eunuch by Germaine Greer, A Room of One\'s Own by Virginia Woolf, Slouching toward Bethlehem by Joan Didion, Innocents Abroad by Mark Twain, The Symposium by Plato, Notes of a Native Son by James Baldwin. There may be an addition or two. Each book will be "reviewed" by a short response paper no more than two pages. There will be a larger paper at mid term, and then a final paper to be discussed. Three unexcused absences are grounds for failure.', '76-101', None), '76-361': Course('The Film Festival: Faces of Democracy in Contemporary World Cinema', '76-361', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Consult detailed course descriptions available from the Department each semester for details. Fall 2006: Students will take on the project of planning and managing a film festival that draws a college- and city-wide audience. The class members will collaborate on all aspects of the festival: selecting films, generating and distributing marketing materials, designing and scheduling events, arranging facilities and general logistics, coordinating internal and external public relations, organizing fundraisers, rallying the local communities &#8212; in short, all the aspects involved in making the event a spectacular/sensational success! The theme of 2006's festival is Freedom and Democracy. In examining some of the world's best feature films and documentaries on this theme, we shall emphasize countries in political transition: where the dilemmas of contemporary Democracy are most apparent, such as Israel, France; where the practice of Democracy is recent, such as Poland, Hungary, Czech Republic; where it is only now being introduced, such as Iraq, Afghanistan. A unique feature of this course-cum-festival will be several directors' participation as guest speakers on the democratic - and other - issues informing their films. Since this is not a typical academic class, there will be neither final exams nor research papers. Instead, the instructor will base grading on short papers, commitment to the project, and class discussion. The best papers as intro to the films will be published in one of the city papers.", '', None), '76-360': Course('Literary Journalism Workshop', '76-360', 9, 'Literary Journalism is a form whose tradition dates back to Dickens. It takes as its subject "ordinary people," and reveals lives fully, implicitly or explicitly making connections between the personal, political, and historical. The course will acquaint you with some classics of the form, along with contemporary work by writers who are writing this "literary" journalism using all the tools of the fiction writer. We will read books by writers who have spent considerable time in the field as researchers to bring us stories of so called ordinary people who might serve to enlighten or reveal something about the world. Students will be asked to do field research throughout the term addition to their writing and reading assignments. All students will also produce an oral presentation of one of these assignments.', '76-260 or 76-265 or 76-270 or 76-372 or 76-271 or 76-261 or 76-472 or 76-262 or 76-269', None), '76-245': Course('Shakespeare: Histories and Tragedies', '76-245', 9, 'We will be reading eight plays - three histories from early in Shakespeare\'s career and five tragedies from later - and some essays on tragic drama. We will try to see these plays: 1) in relation to the culture for which they were written and which they helped shape - the newly established public theater in London, prevailing notions about social class and gender, Puritan attacks on play-going, and the like, and 2) in terms of "what\'s in it for us" - how current audiences and readers can enjoy and interpret these plays. We will be considering what the plays have to say about the authoritative institutions and discourses of their time, and how they address us now that those institutions and discourses have been replaced by others. Students will be required to attend and participate regularly, submit brief responses to Blackboard, write three prepared essays, and take a final exam.', '', None), '76-247': Course('Shakespeare: Comedies and Romances', '76-247', 9, "Would coming to CMU and not studying Shakespeare seem like going to the Sistine Chapel and not looking up? In 1878, Andrew Carnegie left his growing steel empire to sail around the world.  Content to leave his business, he was not content to leave his 13-volume set of Shakespeare&#8217;s complete works. He later wrote: &#8220;I have read carefully eleven of Shakespeare's plays during the spare hours of the voyage&#8221;They are such gems. I&#8221;feel as if I have made new friends, whose angel visits will do me good in days and nights to come&#8221;every thing has its &#8216;environment,&#8217; and Shakespeare is the environment of all English-speaking men.&#8221;   Much has changed since Carnegie wrote those words, as Joss Whedon&#8217;s Much Ado About Nothing, for example, will surely attest.  But many still hunger for an introductory course like this one course on &#8220;the Bard.&#8221; Our reading list will include famous and exuberant plays such as Much Ado, A Midsummer Night&#8217;s Dream, As You Like It, The Merchant of Venice, Twelfth Night, Measure for Measure, Pericles, Cymbeline, The Winter&#8217;s Tale, and The Tempest. Othello, a tragedy, will help us give focused attention to questions of genre by way of counterpoint. Plots, jokes, conventions, and contexts&#8212;we&#8217;ll discuss them all. Students at the end of the course should expect to have a good grounding in the language, themes, and characters of Shakespearean comedy and romance and perhaps more importantly be equipped to think carefully about Shakespeare&#8217;s plays in relation to poetics, history, politics, and genre. In addition to regular short writing exercises of varying types, assignments will include one close reading paper, a longer research paper, and performance of a scene.", '', None), '76-241': Course('Introduction to Gender Studies', '76-241', 9, 'This course is designed to provide you with knowledge about important theories, issues, questions, and debates concerning the study of gender. Beginning with "second-wave" feminism, we will trace the theoretical and historical developments of gender to the present, to understand how it continually shifts and structures human behavior, identity, institutions, and power relations. Gender is an intersectional category, so we will be looking at how sexuality, social class, and race and ethnicity shape its meaning. We will use keywords and concepts acquired from academic sources to critically analyze representations of gender found in everyday life such as literature, art, film, music, television, the web, and advertising. Requirements for the course include regular participation and journal entries, a short paper, a presentation, and a final research paper.', '76-101', None), '76-479': Course('Marketing, Public Relations, and Corporate Communications', '76-479', 9, "Effective marketing and communications are essential to the success of businesses, non-profit agencies, academic institutions, public interest groups, and other entities that have a shared purpose and identity to promote. This course explores marketing and communications in organizational settings, where professional communicators manage relationships with a wide variety of constituencies: customers, investors, news agencies, employees, members, volunteers, local communities or government agencies. To succeed, communicators must be able to identify and articulate the communication needs of the organizations they represent, develop well-informed strategies for advancing organizational objectives, think and act quickly in high-pressure situations, and write clear and persuasive prose. In this course, you will develop the written and oral communication skills needed by a professional communicator in an organization. You will learn to identify and define a coherent, integrated strategy for all of an organization's communications and to devise and apply effective marketing and public relations tactics in traditional and social media for achieving business objectives. You will gain practice in writing op-ed essays, press releases, critiques of organizational communications, and marketing and communication plans.", '76-270 or 76-271', None), '76-472': Course('Advanced Journalism', '76-472', 9, "This course explores the craft of journalism in the context of the history, traditions and glory of journalistic nonfiction in the United States. It seeks to help you hone your writing and thinking skills as you produce pieces of substance that reflect those traditions and standards. As a published author, foreign correspondent and Pulitzer-Prize winning editor, the instructor has been a foot soldier in print journalism and media management for 30 years. The practical emphasis of the course reflects his extensive and varied background. The course focuses on the four stages necessary to any nonfiction story: idea, concept, reporting and writing. Subjects include how to make news judgments, gather evidence, make word choices, compose stories and interpret events, unpacking the language and vocabulary of the craft of journalism. As part of our exploration of advanced nonfiction styles, we examine the six major genres of journalistic nonfiction: the trend story, the profile, the explanatory, the narrative, the point-of-view and the investigative. We will read, critique, discuss and analyze examples of each genre, and students will produce work of their own in four of the genres. Students may substitute (for one of the four writing genres) independent research on a topic of their choosing. In addition, we explore journalism's glorious past and its role in the promotion and maintenance of democracy. The last segment of the course examines the evolution of journalism in the digital age and the impact that is having on the media landscape, particularly print. Students will be given assistance and encouragement as they seek outlets for their writings and connections in the media world that could lead to internships and employment.", '76-372', None), '76-476': Course('Rhetoric of Science', '76-476', 9, 'Though rhetoric of science can be traced back to Philip Wander&#8217;s 1976 article &#8220;The Rhetoric of Science,&#8221; the field came into its own in the 1980s with the work of Joseph Campbell and was expanded in the early 1990s through the efforts of Alan Gross, Jeanne Fahnestock, Carolyn Miller and others. Since then, the field has become a vibrant new area of research in the discipline of rhetoric. Rhetoricians of science study various aspects of science including the importance of language and argument to the development of scientific knowledge, the use of rhetorical argument in science, and the process of communication within and scientific disciplines as well as between scientists and the public.   : In this course, we take the broad view of the rhetoric of science. We will examine many facets of scientific communication including scientific audiences, visuals, and conventions for argument. By exploring these elements of science we will begin to develop the sophisticated understanding of scientific communication and argumentation necessary for undertaking complex rhetorical analyses. Specifically, we will be driven by questions such as:   &#8226;: How do scientists argue their case with one another?  &#8226;: How is scientific information and argument transformed when it is accommodated for popular arguments?  &#8226;: How does the social and historical context in which science is done shape the way that science is communicated and/or argued? &#8226;: In what ways do the language and style shape scientific knowledge and communication?  &#8226;: What argumentative solutions can visuals supply in science and what argumentative problems', '76-101', None), '76-474': Course('Software Documentation', '76-474', 9, "This course teaches best practices for creating software documentation for both internal audiences (use cases, requirements specifications) and end users (online help, user guides). You will learn the importance quality documentation plays in the success of a product and the user's experience, and the importance of understanding (and meeting) that user's needs. The course emphasizes quality task-oriented writing and focuses on the basic skills needed to educate and guide users, while introducing important industry trends like topic-based authoring, single sourcing and reuse, and DITA. Students will complete a series of short homework assignments and several larger projects to reinforce the principles and provide experience in all phases of creating software documentation, including peer review. Readings and published documentation examples will provide a bridge between theory and practice. No textbook required, but students may be required to purchase necessary software (a DITA editor).", '76-271 or 76-270', None), '76-389': Course('Rhetorical Grammar', '76-389', 9, 'This is a course in the grammar that characterizes relatively formal, relatively planned, often written English. As we develop and/or review a vocabulary for talking about the structural choices that are available to writers of English, we will practice analyzing and constructing sentences and parts of sentences. The course is meant primarily for people whose professional plans include writing or editing. Grades are based on 5 quizzes, midterm and final exams, homework assignments, and class attendance and preparation. Textbook: Hopper, Paul J. 1999. A Short Course in Grammar. Norton.', '76-101', None), '76-419': Course('Communication Revolutions &amp; Technologies', '76-419', 9, 'What does it mean to be living in today\'s communication technology "revolution?" In a time when many forms of communication are digitally based, traveling as bits at e-speeds on global computer networks? To begin answering that question, we will examine the origins and historical development of various communication revolutions&#8211;from the invention of writing, the printing press, the telegraph, and so forth&#8211;to the Internet. The discussions and readings will seek to provide a comprehensive overview of how so-called communication revolutions developed, with discussion of cognitive, social, political, economic and technological aspects. We will attempt to put the development of communication technologies in their historical context: How were new forms of communication received? How were they used? How did they affect communication? How did they influence political and social institutions? We will focus, however, on relating historical developments to current digital communication developments. We will take as case studies several new discursive digital formations: digital books, on-line newspapers, and possibly global non-government organizations (NGOs), such as non-profit environmental activist organizations. Along the way we will ask questions such as "What should a rhetorical theory that takes media into account do?" What are some of the challenges that new digital formations present to traditional rhetorical theories (e.g., How is "ethos" established when speakers are anonymous and globally distributed? How is the "public sphere" constituted when Internet search engines dynamically construct it?) (Please see English Dept. for full description.)', '76-101', None), '76-414': Course('19th Century British Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-414', 9, 'From Shelley\'s Frankenstein to Darwin\'s Origin of Species and H.G. Wells\'s The Time Machine, nineteenth-century literary and scientific writers electrified their audiences with narratives of deep time, speculative futures, and powerful evolutionary logics. Print media intensified the impact of these visions then, as the digital media may be doing again today. This course uses traditional print scholarship along with new methods currently emerging in the "digital humanities" to grasp the nineteenth century&#8217;s matrix of literary, scientific, and visual culture in a range of fiction and nonfiction texts. Two papers and one visual presentation will be required. (No previous experience in "digital humanities," which is an introductory topic in this course, is necessary.) Readings in Darwin, George Eliot, Robert Chambers, Samuel Coleridge, Mary Shelley, contemporary cultural historians of the sciences, and readings in the history of knowledge disciplines and humanistic studies.', '76-101', None), '76-145': Course('Freshman Seminar', '76-145', 9, "Topics will vary by semester.  Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings.  Fall 2011: What does it mean to be Indian outside of India? How is it possible to &#8220;live in the hyphen&#8221; as both British and Pakistani? In this course we will look at the writings and experiences of South Asians (people from the Indian subcontinent), living in such places as the United States, Britain, the Caribbean, the Middle East, and East Asia, who construct what Salman Rushdie calls &#8220;imaginary homelands.&#8221; We will examine the histories of migration and study how the experience of living between two continents has been theorized. In addition to examining the diaspora's past, the course will investigate present day South Asian Diaspora cultures including popular culture, film, music, dance, art, theater, and literature. Possible readings include works by V.S. Naipaul, Salman Rushdie, Jhumpa Lahiri, Hanif Kureishi, Meera Syal, Vijay Prashad, and Michael Ondaatje.", '', None), '76-144': Course('English Freshman Seminar', '76-144', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Fall 2013: What is the relationship between music and language, sound and text, lyric poems and song lyrics, narrative poems and song ballads?  This Freshman Seminar course will examine the role music plays as a theme and structural device in contemporary American poetry. We will discuss collections about music and musicians as well as collections written by musicians.  Our discussions will be paired in three categories: &#8220;Cover Poems&#8221; (where we&#8217;ll explore how poems cover [adapt, imagine, construct] the lives of musicians); &#8220;Musician Poems&#8221; (where we&#8217;ll explore how musician-poets differentiate song writing and poem writing); and &#8220;Musical Backdrops&#8221; (where we&#8217;ll explore the ways music can influence/impact the subject and structure of poems).', '', None), '76-143': Course('Freshman Seminar', '76-143', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Spring 2013: What is a university? In this course, we will look at some of the many definitions of what a university is, as well as some current reports on and data about higher education. We will also read a number of novels and view several films that portray college and try to discern what definition of the university they convey. Novels will include Stover at Yale, Wonder Boys, and Admission, among others. We will read them alongside historical and philosophical work about higher education. In addition, you will write a series of short papers relating to the history, image, and current problems of the university.', '', None), '76-387': Course('Narrative &amp; Argument', '76-387', 9, 'This course investigates information effects basic to the communication professional, generated primarily through structures of narrative and argument. We cover various genres supported by these structures, such as personal narratives, profiles, scenic writing, oral histories, information and instruction writing and policy argument. This course emphasizes both the production and the analysis of writing.', '76-101', None), '76-386': Course('Language &amp; Culture', '76-386', 9, 'This course is an introduction into the scholarship surrounding the nature of language and the question of how language shapes and is shaped by social, cultural and political contexts. We will begin by studying important literature in linguistics and language theory, both to introduce us to how scholars think about language and to give us a shared vocabulary to use for the rest of the semester. We will then move into case studies and theoretical works exploring the intersections of language use, individual and group identities, and the exercise of power, in its many forms. In particular, we will focus on the relationship between language and culture by asking, in what ways does language influence and constitute social change? How is social change reflected by changes in the way we use language? Over the course of the semester, you will work on applying the knowledge and theoretical tools you gain to your own analysis of a linguistic artifact that you choose.', '76-101', None), '76-494': Course('Healthcare Communications', '76-494', 9, "Healthcare Communications is a writing-intensive course designed for students interested in how healthcare information is developed by researchers, healthcare providers and writers and communicated to patients and their families, the general public, and other experts. Throughout the course, we will explore where people find medical information, how they use and evaluate it, and what challenges writers face in supporting informed healthcare decisions while communicating ideas that can be complex, provocative and sometimes frightening. We will read and discuss published literature dealing with issues in health literacy, clinical research, and patient care. We will also learn the basics of reading, understanding, and interpreting the research literature and communicating research findings to non-experts. Early in the semester, you'll choose a medical area of interest that you will research using sources such as journals, articles, books and web sites, as well as direct contact with appropriate medical, healthcare, and/or research professionals. For your final project, you will write and design materials that will meet a specific need or gap you identify in existing information. The final project could be a magazine article, a website, patient education material such as brochures or training materials, or another vehicle that emphasizes accurate, informative and engaging writing. In addition, there will be several short writing assignments to build the research and writing skills needed to effectively communicate healthcare information. A background in health, medicine or science is not necessary for this course, but a willingness to learn about these areas is essential.", '76-395 or 76-270 or 76-271 or 76-272', None), '76-491': Course('Rhetorical Analysis', '76-491', 9, 'Students in this course will learn various approaches to analyzing discourse artifacts from a rhetorical point of view. Early in the course, students will identify an artifact or artifacts they wish to analyze. From there, students will be encouraged to explore their own methods of analysis based on two required books for the course and reviews of literature. For the midterm, students will create an annotated bibliography of five specimens of criticism taken from a single journal. For the final project student will first present and then hand in a polished 15 page piece of criticism based on one or some combination of methods. The presentation and final paper count 50% of the grade, with the mid-term, class attendance, participation, and homework making up the final 25%.', '76-101', None), '76-492': Course('Rhetoric of Public Policy', '76-492', 9, 'In traditional public policy approaches, each step of the policy process from defining a problem to making a case for its solution is assessed in reference to rational models of economic and political actors. This course, however, takes a less conventional rhetorical approach to public policy which focuses attention on the values, beliefs, and argument structures associated with issues as a means of assessing them and as a method for moving forward with effective arguments towards their resolution. Towards this end, we will be studying the theories and analytic methods of both classical and modern rhetoric as well as modern public policy theory. Over the course of the semester, we will combine knowledge and techniques from both fields to examine the development of the public policy debate over the safety and efficacy of nuclear power as a solution to the current environmental and energy security challenges faced by the United States. No previous experience with public policy or knowledge about nuclear power is necessary for this course. Those with experience are welcome.', '76-101', None), '76-313': Course('19th Century Literature', '76-313', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Spring 2012: This course approaches nineteenth-century British literature by way of three controversial topics&#8212;evolution, capitalism, and culture&#8212;and their advocates or critics. Readings in Charles Darwin, Karl Marx, and Matthew Arnold on evolutionary sciences, wage labor and capital, and the arts of culture. Additional readings include the prose and poetry of Oscar Wilde (on art and socialism), William Morris (on utopia and design), H. G. Wells (science fiction), Christine Rossetti (on sexuality and the market), Charles Dickens and other writers who will show us the connections between class warfare, sciences of nature, and the arts.', '76-101', None), '76-311': Course('18th Century LIterary and Cultural Studies', '76-311', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Spring 2010: Writing in 1542 Bartolome de las Casas "observed that not a few of the people involved in this story had become so anaesthetized to human suffering by their own greed and ambition that they ceased to be men" and in 1972 Aime Cesaire notes that "colonization, dehumanizes even the most civilized man." Writing 400 years apart both men reflect an anxiety towards the social and economic effects of imperial expansion, which stands in sharp contrast to the pro-expansionist attitude of many including government officials and merchants. The aim of this course is to explore the competing understandings of Britain as a nation and an empire, which were expressed throughout the eighteenth and early nineteenth century. We will examine the influence of the British imperialism in the works of authors as diverse as Daniel Defoe, Jonathan Swift, Olaudah Equiano, Jane Austen, and William Makepeace Thackeray. In addition, we will explore theories of nationhood by Srinivas Aravamudan, Michael Hardt, Antonio Negri, and Edward Said.', '76-101', None), '76-317': Course('The History of the Novel', '76-317', 9, "This course will survey the English and American novel from the 18th century to the present. We will look at texts such as Henry Fielding's Joseph Andrews, Jane Austen's Pride and Prejudice or Emma, Charles Dickens' Great Expectations, Frank Norris's Octopus, James Joyce's Dubliners, Virginia Woolf's Mrs. Dalloway, and others. We will also read critical texts explaining the rise of the novel and assessing the place of fiction in modern life.", '76-101', None), '76-314': Course('19th Century British Literary and Cultural Studies', '76-314', 9, 'Topics vary by semester. Consult the course descriptions provided by the department for current offerings. Example, Fall 2011: Changes in industry and education in the Victorian period affected women deeply; many women began to actively explore their options outside of the domestic arena, seeking access to education, careers, contraception, voting and alternatives to marriage and motherhood. These early feminists became known as &#8220;New Women,&#8221; and from around 1870 to 1900, discourse by and about them flourishes. The New Woman both exhilarated and terrified. Was she a signifier of England&#8217;s progressive health or was she a monstrous harbinger of the decline of proper English society? How did she both redefine and entrench gender ideology in the late-nineteenth century? We will read short stories, journalistic articles and several novels that address the New Woman, including Sarah Grand&#8217;s The Heavenly Twins, Grant Allen&#8217;s The Typewriter Girl and Bram Stoker&#8217;s Dracula. Cultural narratives about gender, sexuality, science, industry and empire will inform our discussions.', '76-101', None), '76-318': Course('Communicating in the Global Marketplace', '76-318', 9, 'In this day and age, some of the most exciting employment opportunities are with multinational and international corporations and non-profits. But are you prepared for the challenge of working with professionals from all over the world? Even as more people around the globe learn English, specific cultural values, beliefs, and assumptions continue to influence the way in which they communicate. Often, behind a foreign accent, we encounter an entirely different worldview. The same word or phrase in English might actually carry very distinct connotations for someone whose native language is French, German, Russian, or Japanese. Can we learn to anticipate, understand, and become sensitive to these connotations? How can we mend potential miscommunications that might arise due to these conceptual differences? This course is designed as an introduction to international professional communication. We will talk about the way in which culture influences communication, about the job of translators and interpreters, and about specific communicative norms for the global marketplace. We will look at many concrete example of communication in the international arena, acting as problem- solvers and communication consultants who are focused on understanding and designing plans of action for navigating communicative obstacles. We will also have the opportunity to speak with professionals who are experienced in the field, and we will cover case studies ranging from corporate business to global activism and advocacy. The requirements for this course include a take-home exam, a short paper, and a final project.', '76-272 or 76-271 or 76-270', None), '76-319': Course('Environmental Rhetoric', '76-319', 9, 'How people think and talk about the environment matters; it reveals what they value and shapes what they do. We will look at how competing discourses define man&#8217;s relationship to the natural world, frame environmental problems, and argue for public action. As we compare the environmental rhetoric of naturalists, scientists, policy makers, and activists, we will trace an American history that has managed to combine mystical celebration with militant critique, and scientific research with public debate. Equally important, this course will prepare you to act as a rhetorical consultant and writer, studying how writers communicate the three &#8220;Rs&#8221; of environmental rhetoric: relationship with nature, the presence of risk, and the need for response.', '76-101', None), '76-453': Course('Postcolonialism Theory', '76-453', 9, 'Topics will vary by semester. Spring 2013: Critic David Attwell once characterized a novel about empire as focused on "that moment of suspension when an empire imagines itself besieged and plots a final reckoning with its enemies." The same might be said of late-nineteenth and early twentieth-century British literature, which was shaped by events taking place outside as well as inside of national borders. Even in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries, with international trade and slavery supporting the manor house and plantations abroad providing the cotton for British looms, the "England" of English literature spanned the globe. By the first half of the twentieth century, this empire had begun to collapse in upon itself, a process witnessed by writers inside Britain and its colonies. This course will investigate a broad spectrum of British literature within the international context of global imperialism. We will be reading representative works from different periods of British literature; our own study will be supplemented by several guest lectures by experts in different literary historical periods. Readings include William Shakespeare\'s The Tempest, Aphra Behn\'s Oroonoko: or the Royal Slave, Mary Shelley\'s Frankenstein, Wilkie Collins\'s The Moonstone, Joseph Conrad\'s Nostromo, and E.M. Forster\'s A Passage to India. These literary works will be read alongside postcolonial theory, including articles by Edward Said, Chinua Achebe, Anne McClintock, and Gillian Beer.', '76-101', None), '76-452': Course('Patterns of Engish Usage', '76-452', 9, 'Patterns of English Usage is for both graduate and undergraduate students a research course. This means that for all students there is an emphasis on carrying out investigations at first hand and reporting your results. The course is intended to provide experience in recovering data on patterns of English usage from a corpus. It is an introduction to "corpus linguistics," a set of techniques for studying the distribution of words and phrases as they are actually used in discourse (as opposed to how we might think or imagine they are used without reference to texts). Corpus linguistics is a new field. It incorporates methods and concepts that have only become possible since the advent of large-scale data storage and high-speed search software. It challenges normative grammar by asking whether we are entitled to say that words and phrases have dictionary meanings that are distinct from their uses in discourse. It takes grammar away from authorities and places it in the mouths and pens of users of the language. We will be using the Cobuild (Collins/Birmingham University International Linguistic Database) corpus. By the end of the semester you will have learned the conventions for entering a well-formed Cobuild query, including various wildcard and category-dependent searches, and some elementary corpus concepts such as "collocation" and "transitional probability." You will also have learned about some aspects of conventional approaches to English grammar (structural grammar, generative grammar) with which to compare and contrast the corpus approach.', '', None), '76-393': Course('Rhetorical Traditions', '76-393', 9, "Rhetoric has traditionally been the study of the relationship between words and action, with persuasion as its central concern. As one of the oldest academic disciplines in the West, rhetoric has provided concepts, models, and systems for understanding how we use words to do things. In this course, we will examine various approaches to rhetoric in light of recurring questions about its definition, legitimacy, function, and methods. Specifically, we will be interested in some of the following questions: How does persuasive communication take place?  How is persuasive communication influenced by various cultural, social, and political phenomena? How can we apply rhetorical concepts to current social and political problems? We will also be interested in how these questions relate to particular examples of rhetorical practice, such as Gorgias's Encomium of Helen, Thoreau's Civil Disobedience, and more recently, Michael Moore's film, FAHRENHEIT 9/11. Assignments will include a take-home midterm and final, as well as a final paper.", '', None), '76-428': Course('Visual/Verbal Communication', '76-428', 9, 'People create a wide range of communicative artifacts that integrates visual and verbal elements&#8212;newsletters, product brochures, web pages, graphical novels, journal articles, resumes, software references, yellow stickies, etc. Yet, such visual-verbal discourse has only recently attracted the serious attention of research communities. Some of the relevant research questions include: Why do visual variations exist across different contexts? (e.g., Popular science looks different from Discover.) Why and how do visual styles change over time? (e.g., Magazines from the 1950s don&#8217;t look like present day magazines.) Do visual elements have persuasive power? If so, what roles do they play in shaping an argument? How do people learn to communicate using visual-verbal artifacts?  : In this seminar, we will address these and other questions through readings and discussions on various threads of studies around the analysis of communicative artifacts that integrate visual and verbal expressions. We will review key research publications concerning visual-verbal communication from relevant disciplines, including professional &amp; technical communication, rhetoric, argumentation, and literacy. Particular attention will be paid to descriptive methods (e.g., social-semiotic analysis, visual argument, and rhetorical structure theory) and the types of questions these methods can help us answer. Throughout the semester, students will be encouraged to explore the visual-verbal communication artifacts found around them and use those to connect class discussions to the practice of design. Required assignments include a brief bi-weekly response to the readings, several short analysis papers, and a longer term paper with a topic chosen by students based on their professional or research interests. Please see English Dept. for full course description.', '76-101', None), '76-420': Course('Process of Reading and Writing', '76-420', 9, "This course is an introduction to the thinking, meaning-making process that underlies reading and writing. It asks: what are the social and cognitive processes, what are the conscious and unconscious problem-solving strategies we use: to comprehend and interpret text, to construct and communicate our own meanings, and to project or discover our readers' responses? In the first half of the course we look at writers and designers as thinkers and problem solvers&#8212;facing the challenge of equally creative, meaning-making readers and their own constructive, interpretive processes of comprehension. Understanding (and user-testing for) how readers actually interpret texts is critical to many kinds of writing, from informative websites and PR work, to persuasive applications and powerful arguments. An introduction to the research and theory on reading and writing as a social/cognitive process lets us explore the why behind the what readers do. For instance, you will learn how memory networks, cognitive schemas, and meta-knowledge can shape and are shaped by language and discourse as socially constructed mediating tools. At the same time you will develop a portfolio of methods that track the constructive, inferential process of readers' comprehension. In the second half of the course we turn to you and your own writing as a thinking process engaged in the constant effort to juggle competing goals. You will gain insight into your current problem-solving strategies and develop new ones for doing reader-based writing and design. The final project (which studies your own process on a current writing task) will expand your portfolio of methods into a toolkit of expert strategies for 1) both composing and communication and for 2) user testing and inquiry into the comprehension of real readers that uncovers how others actually interpret what you thought you said.", '76-101', None), '76-422': Course('Theories of Sexuality and Gender', '76-422', 9, 'Emphasis falls on the "and," the copula between Sexuality and Gender; that is, those theories which either attempt or perhaps are just inevitably drawn into thinking about how the two are related.  We will read canonical theories of sexuality&#8212;such as Freud&#8217;s Three Essays on Sexuality and Foucault&#8217;s Introduction to the History of Sexuality&#8212;and canonical theories of gender&#8212;such as Rubin&#8217;s "Traffic in Women" and Butler&#8217;s Gender Trouble.  But we will be particularly attentive to those texts that try to understand connections and disconnections between the construction of the two in theory and in practice.  To that end, and to ground our theoretical investigations in social historical context, we will focus on two discursive sites: the feminist "sex wars" of the 1980s and more recent preoccupations of feminists with sexuality, such as work by and on sex-workers, and the theory and practice of "trans"&#8212;both gender and sexuality&#8212;from the early modern and contemporary periods.   Possible readings in the former area might include Pat Califia, Amber Hollibaugh,  or Alice Echols; our "trans" cases might include Henry Fielding&#8217;s Female Husband, Foucault&#8217;s Herculine Barbin, Sandy Stone&#8217;s and Susan Stryker&#8217;s theoretical work in this area or the biographical writing of "gender warriors" such as Leslie Feinberg.', '76-101', None), '76-425': Course('Science in the Public Sphere', '76-425', 9, "Topics will vary by semester. Spring 2013: Ever since the dawn of the Industrial Revolution and the rise of the technological exhibition in the nineteenth century, there has been a growing presence for science and technology in the lives of everyday citizens. In some cases, these phenomena have sparked the public's imagination and their promise has stirred their confidence in a better future. In other cases, they have kindled fears and generated protests over the risks of new technologies and the threats of novel scientific ideas to prevailing social, cultural, economic, and political orders. This course examines the complex dynamics in the relationships between science, technology, and society. Towards this end it engages with questions such as: How do we decide who an expert is? To what extent do scientists have an obligation to consider the social and ethical consequences of their work? Is public education about science and technology sufficient for addressing social concerns about risk and controversial scientific ideas? We will grapple with these and other questions by exploring modern public debates in which science, technology, and society play a primary role such as the AIDS crisis, global warming, and the autism vaccine debate. With the help of analytical theories from sociology, rhetoric, and public policy, we will develop a general framework for thinking about argument and the dynamics of the relationship between science, technology and the public. In addition, we will look to these fields for tools to assess specific instances of public debate and to complicate and/or affirm the prevailing theories about their relationship.  (See Department for full description.)", '76-101', None), '76-301': Course('Internship', '76-301', 9, "This course is designed to help you explore possible writing-related careers as you gain workplace experience and earn academic credit. You&#8217;ll work on- or off- campus as an entry-level professional for 8-10 hours per week in a field of interest to you. You might, for example, intern with a local newspaper or magazine or radio or TV station, work for a publisher or political campaign, or do research and promotions for a non-profit agency associated with a cause you feel strongly about. Other possibilities include local hospitals, museums, theatre and other arts groups, software documentation firms and other groups needing technical writers and communications specialists, PR and ad agencies, law-related sites, and just about any place you can think of that requires writing and communication skills. Most of your class time for the course will be completed through work at your internship site &#8211; a minimum of 120 hours (8-10 per week) over the semester for 9 units of credit. As the academic component of the course, you'll keep a reflective journal and meet periodically with the internship coordinator to discuss your internship and related professional issues. You will be responsible for finding your own internship, but it is recommended that you set up a meeting with the instructor to talk about your interests and what opportunities are open to you. You should do this before registration week.", '', None), '76-300': Course('Professional Seminar', '76-300', 3, 'This weekly, 3-unit seminar is designed to give professional writing majors an overview of possible career and internship options and ways to pursue their professional interests. Each session will feature guest presenters who are professionals working in diverse communications-related fields such as web design, journalism, public relations, corporate and media relations, technical writing, medical communications, and working for non-profits. The visiting professionals talk about their own and related careers, show samples of their work, and answer student questions. The course is required for first-year MAPW students and is open to all English undergraduates, who are urged to participate in their sophomore or junior years to explore options for internships and careers.', '', None), '76-302': Course('Global Communication Center Practicum', '76-302', 9, 'This practicum prepares students to tutor and conduct research in a communication center serving a range of disciplines and communicative modes. Students will be exposed to a variety of tutoring methods and will gain experience analyzing and responding to academic genres in various disciplines. In addition, students will learn to support oral, visual, and collaborative modes of communication alongside more traditional written genres. All students in the practicum will pose a researchable question about an unfamiliar academic genre, tutoring method, or online delivery of tutoring; to answer their questions, students will collect primary and secondary data to design and complete a research project. Students should expect to receive extensive feedback from faculty and peers on their tutoring methods. Readings will address theories of tutoring, responding to student writing, academic literacy, and communication across the disciplines.', '76-101', None), '76-306': Course('Editing and Publishing', '76-306', None, 'Note: Registration in this course is by permission only. Students must contact Prof. Costanzo directly. In this course students will work closely with the editors of Carnegie Mellon University Press to learn many of the facets of producing books. These range from business management and marketing to the elements of editing, book design, and production.', '', None), '76-227': Course('Comedy', '76-227', 9, 'We can\'t, of course, expect to come up with an absolutely complete definition of the comic, but for our purposes we can consider it as an embodiment of the opposite of "gravity." Comedy is characterized by its levity.  This does not mean, of course, that it is any less "serious" than tragedy, even if&#8212;or especially&#8212;because it tends to favor the superficial over the profound. Indeed, if tragedy is adolescent, then the mature, adult mode is the comic, being more social and rational. A key characteristic of comedy is wit&#8212;or simply intelligence. Comedy involves a lot of pure play of the mind.  It turns out that there have been a few notable attempts to help us understand just why comedy is the "social" genre beyond all others, why the comic attitude is the civilized, urbane, mature view of life. And we\'ll consider some of those theories while trying to understand why some things are comic and some are not. We\'ll consider several classical works of comic literature, beginning with Aristophanes, Shakespeare, and moving on to more recent examples, including some films.', '', None), '76-225': Course('Topics in Rhetoric', '76-225', 9, 'Topics vary semester to semester. Consult Department for most recent topic. Summer 2012: This course interrogates the identity of the US military and its members through media representation, and how that identity affects rhetorical situations involving US military and civil relationships. After a sociolinguistic examination of how military members create identity, and are in turn represented in media, we&#8217;ll look for implications of that identity in real world contested issues. For example, how do identities like soldier and Marine affect decisions to allow women to serve in combat, or for gay, lesbian and transgendered citizens to serve as military members? How do popular, influential works like the book and mini-series Generation Kill, or the Turkish film Valley of the Wolves address and impact rhetorical situations like the Abu Ghraib torture? In addition to course readings and discussions, students in 76-3XX will be asked to analyze and then synthesize journalistic, literary, and critical sources in a short interpretive paper, and then a longer research paper that addresses an issue topical to the course. Course Rationale: This course fills several English department programmatic goals, and will be of interest to students because of high current interest in the US military. This is a timely course given US involvement in war and the possibility of another war with Iran. As the UK Independent Postgraduate Edition pointed out in 2010, renewed interest in military subjects mean universities need to address this topic.', '', None), '76-221': Course('Studies in Classical Literature: Books You Should Have Read By Now', '76-221', 9, "It may seem more and more difficult to get a good classical, liberal education these days. The demands of professional training force many of us to skimp on our understanding of major artistic achievements. So, this class is for those people who should have read some of the best books around, but haven't managed to yet - books you should have read by now. Kurt Vonnegut's character Kilgore Trout sings the praises of Dostoevsky's The Brothers Karamazov, pointing out that it contains everything you need to know about life. He then ruefully adds that unfortunately that's not enough anymore. It may not be enough, but it might be a place to start. Each book will be considered in itself for whatever it might offer by way of understanding the world, then and now. Each one can be seen as a useful foundation point for understanding an important period of history (Machiavelli and the Renaissance, for example). Finally we shall use the idea that literature is equipment for living as a way of understanding and evaluating our experiences.", '76-101', None)}